Everybody always talks about the poor homeless orphan waifs, but what about the homeless fathers? The time has come to call the fathers home from the stale curbstone shores. Sometimes they're bad and Take No Prisoners. But who then do they finally hurt but themselves? And when they give of themselves, they reaffirm what great art has always been: an act of love toward the whole human race. Then it becomes time to give at least a little love back.

Lou Reed is a prick and a jerkoff who regularly commits the ultimate sin of treating his audience with contempt. He's also a person with deep compassion for a great many other people about whom almost nobody else gives a shit. I won't say who they are, because I don't want to get too schmaltzy, except to emphasize that there's always been more to this than drugs and fashionable kinks, and to point out that suffering, loneliness and psychic/spiritual exile are great levelers.

The Bells isn't merely Lou Reed's best solo LP, it's great art. Everybody made a fuss over Street Hassle, but too many reviewers overlooked the fact that it was basically a sound album: brilliant layers of live and studio work in a deep wash of bass-obsessive noise. Most of the songs were old, and not very good, with a lot of the same old cheap shots.

The first indication that we've got something very different here is the no-bullshit cover art; the second, a cursory listening to the lyrics. Immediately, one notes the absence of mirror shades, needles and S&M. Lou Reed is walking naked for once, in a way that invites comparison with people like Charles Mingus, the Van Morrison of "T.B. Sheets" and Astral Weeks, and the Rolling Stones of Exile on Main Street. The Bells is by turns exhilarating ("Disco Mystic," an exercise in churning R&B that should be a hit single, if there's any justice), almost unbearably poignant (all of the lyrics) and as vertiginous as a slow, dark whirlpool (the title opus).

Throughout, the sound is dense, as dense as Street Hassle with at least double the content. When Reed began to move toward jazz on Rock and Roll Heart, I just figured he was going to close his career with the same shuck that people like Stanley Clarke used to open theirs. I underestimated him. There's a real band on this record, and these musicians are giving us the only true jazz-rock fusion anybody's come up with since Miles Davis' On the Corner period. They're often doing several interesting, unusual things at once: on cuts such as "Stupid Man" and "Looking for Love," they swing with a vengeance. "City Lights" teems with little whistles, bells and noises that buzz around each other like sad fireflies. And all through the LP, Reed plays the best guitar anyone's heard from him in ages.

As for the lyrics — well, people tend to forget that in numbers like "Candy Says," "Sunday Morning" and "Oh! Sweet Nothing," Lou Reed wrote some of the most compassionate songs ever recorded. Though Reed's given folks reason to forget, every lyric on The Bells offers cause for recollection. This album is about love and dread — and redemption through a strange commingling of the two. To have come close to spiritual or physical death is ample reason to testify, but it's love that brings both fathers and children, artist and audience, back from that cliff, and back from the gulf that can sometimes, in states of extreme pain, be mistaken for the blue empyrean ever. In "Stupid Man," someone who's been self-exiled too long, "living all alone by those still waters," rushes home to his family, desperate not to have lost the affection of his little daughter. Like all of Reed's people on this record, he's looking for love. A tune with that same title emphasizes how jet-set stars, hustlers and kept professionals (and middle-American boys and girls) may be united by a common longing. It's a nation of rock & roll hearts. "City Lights," one of three songs coauthored by Nils Lofgren, isn't only about Charlie Chaplin but about a lost America, the implication being that, in these late modern times, all the lights in the world might not be enough to bring us together.

On side two, everything coalesces in unmistakably personal terms. "Don't you feel so lonely/When it's in the afternoon/And you gotta face it/All through the night/Don't it make you believe/That something's gonna have to happen soon" is simply the story (perhaps too close for comfort) of most of the people any of us seem to know right now. But later, "All through the Night" reveals itself as Lou Reed's version of Mick Jagger's "Shine a Light." Reed sings:

My best friend Sally 
She got sick 
And I'm feelin' mighty ill myself 
It happens all the time 
All through the night 
I went to St. Vincent's 
And I'm watchin' the ceiling fall 
Down on her body 
As she's lyin' on the ground 
And I said, "Oh babe 
You gotta suffer with it babe 
All through the night"

And I sat and cried

All through the night 
And I said, "Oh Jesus...."

"Families" is most personal of all. A friend described this and certain other parts of The Bells as "the gay outsider's occasional yearning for the straight life and its conventions," but that's inaccurate. "Perfect Day" was Reed's maudlin streak, yet sexual preference really has nothing to do with the anguish behind such lines from "Families" as:

And no no no no no I still haven't got married 
And no no no there's no grandson planned here for you... 
And no Daddy you're not a poor man anymore 
And I hope you realize it before you die... 
There's nothing here we have in common except our name... 
And I don't think that I'll come home much anymore.

What Reed may not realize is that, through this very song, some reconciliation is effected, because he's fulfilled a promise that very few of us are ever able to keep by finally being able to forgive and love in spite of all the tragedies that go down in every family.

The title track is quintessential Seventies music, not Reed's "Radio Ethiopia" but his analogue to Miles Davis' "He Loved Him Madly." A nine-minute mass in the void, "The Bells" is built around a three-note descending bass tiff, synthesizer murk, piano notes falling like tears of mercury, and Don Cherry's and Marty Fogel's horns. Cherry's trumpet and Fogel's tenor sax curl around the flames as slowly as a New Orleans funeral procession, while low, toneless voices mutter ominously. And they're talking about you. All this builds through looming dread to a poem:

As he fell down to his knees 
After soaring through the air 
With nothing to hold him there 
It was really not so cute 
To play without a parachute 
As he stood upon the ledge 
Looking out he thought be saw a brook 
And he hollered, "Look there are the bells" 
And he said, "Now, here come the bells."

With "The Bells," more than in "Street Hassle," perhaps even more than in his work with the Velvet Underground, Lou Reed achieves his oft-stated ambition — to become a great writer, in the literary sense. More than that I cannot say, except: Lou, as you were courageous enough to be our mirror, so in turn we'll be your family. We promise to respect your privacy. (It's like what Tennessee Williams said to Dotson Rader when, as described in Rader's Blood Dues, the latter made an anguished confession about wanting children. Williams just touched the head of a young artist sitting nearby and said: "These are my children.") You gave us reason to think there might still be meaning to be found in this world beyond all the nihilism, and thereby spawned and kept alive a whole generation whose original parents may or may not have been worthy of them. If one is to be haunted by ghosts, who's to say they're not specters of love pouring back from dead angels and living children?


Styx is an arena band from the progressive school. Every gesture's writ huge to the point of flatulence, their pomp is highly circumstantial (it's the only way to get the last row's attention) and around every chorus lurks a whirring synthesizer, if not a pipe organ hauled in from a genuine cathedral. The strategy becomes obvious: Dennis DeYoung's synthesizer (though sub-Rick Wakeman fluff all the way) is crucial because without its bubblicious curlicues, Tommy Shaw's and James Young's guitar work would have to stand alone as more played-out, heavy-metal plod and Jethro Tull Jr. acoustic jive. No one of these parts amounts to much on its own, but when smeared together, each contributes to the kind of fantasy-land effects that groups like this run on. Which at least makes Styx tight. Tight as a tissue.

 

Young, DeYoung and Shaw all compose, and while the music's nothing to speak of (if you've heard Yes and Queen, you've heard it all), the lyrics are a little more interesting. It's not insignificant that only one of Pieces of Eight's ten tunes is about loving somebody else — and even that includes a line like "And as your surrogate leader I'm bound in your search for the truth." Like an album-long suite based on Queen's "We Are the Champions," what these songs say — and what a lot of bands such as Styx have been saying for some time — is this: we are hot shit. Not just because we're badass guitar heroes, not because we've got soul or play so great, not even because we're rock stars. No, we are hot shit because, beyond even the divine right of synthesizers, we are aristocracy, we are noble, we are kings. (If you don't believe it, look at all our money, not to mention our regal vestments.)

This point of view is most explicitly expressed in "Lords of the Ring," which is no more offensive to J.R.R. Tolkien (who might even deserve it) than any of the many monstrosities perpetrated in his name by other groups: "And now the message is clear/For I became a lord this year." "Blue Collar Man (Long Nights)" looks back to a time when his liege Tommy Shaw was actually on the unemployment line; even against "impossible odds," he asserted then that he would work and win because "I've got the power and I've got the will. I'm not a charity case." "I'm O.K." shows Styx basking in self-satisfaction at the end of their long struggle for upward mobility, while both "Great White Hope" and the title track depict nothing less than a troubled ruling class: "I'm just a prisoner in a king's disguise."

What's really interesting is not that such narcissistic slop should get recorded, but what must be going on in the minds of the people who support it in such amazing numbers. Gall, nerve and ego have never been far from great rock & roll. Yet there's a thin but crucial line between those qualities and what it takes to fill arenas today: sheer self-aggrandizement on the most puerile level. If these are the champions, gimme the cripples.

Who has not been waiting for the next great Van Morrison LP? Whether you thought his last masterpiece was Veedon Fleece or Tupelo Honey or even (what I think) Moondance, you certainly were never prepared to write him off. Nobody's going to write him off because of Wavelength either, but it's obviously not the album he is still destined to make.

Something comes clear here. Ever since Moondance, Van Morrison has staked his claim to the rare title "poet," mostly on the basis of what amounts to a bunch of autumn leaves. Look at those records lying there—Tupelo Honey, Hard Nose the Highway—the best as good as the worst, and all of 'em slowly turning brown. You wanta kick 'em just like a pile of crumbly leaves? Well, go ahead and do it. And kick Van Morrison too. Because he's a saint. Yeah, that's exactly why he needs the boot.

Morrison's got a beautiful obsession with something he can't quite state, and we've got a beautiful obsession with Morrison. Which is fine for him, but what are we to do? We are to sing the chorus, that's what:

Dum derra dum dum diddy diddy dah dah
Dum derra dum dum diddy diddy dah dah
Dum derra dum dum diddy diddy dah dah
Dum derra dum dum diddy diddy dah dah
Dum derra dum dum diddy diddy dah dah

At least that's what it says on the lyric sheet.

And make no mistake, we're supposed to notice the lyric sheet—the only other Morrison LP that had one was Hard Nose the Highway, itself a rather pointed statement regarding leaves and such. "Such": that's what Van Morrison's interested in—roamin' in the gloamin' and divers other top-hat autumnal falderal. Linden Arden stole the highlights, but where did he take them? Way back home, that's where. Leaving us with another album of furry-nosed nuzzlings in the fleece. But about this time, one begins to wonder: nowadays does this artist ever come bearing anything other than said fleece? Naught.

Wavelength is a very nice record. I'm sure all the people at Warner Bros. are pleased with it. Ditto the DJs. It probably would also be really groovy for somebody's idea of a wine-and-joints, Renaissance-fair garden party. It makes a lovely sound, breaks no rules and keeps its grimy snout (or, rather, that of its maker) out of the dark places that mainstreams step correctly over. Rigid. The singer has a nifty little band here, what with Bobby Tench, Peter Bardens from the original Them and even great googamoogah Garth Hudson sittin' in on various instruments. Well, take me back to Orpheus Descending!

Because it's obvious that Morrison ain't playing out no dramas here. Nor has he been for some long while now. Perhaps he is more interested in apprehending the exact configuration of an ace of sunlight and presenting it to us. A lost or stolen moment in time, when meaning went rollin' by like the trains on the tracks, like the breeze through a door. But the question is: DO WE CARE? Obviously the man is possessed, obviously he is driven to seek some definition in the most mundane curbstone air, certainly he is a mystic whose light shines for he and thee and all of us, but he flat-out refuses to say anything but the patently obvious and then calls that poetry—which it is.

So maybe we should knight Van Morrison poet-errant of the New Drowse. Meaning, don't ever ask him what his beautiful obsession is actually about. Because if you do, he'll come out with embarrassing sludge like:

Men saw the stars at the edge of the sea
They thought great thoughts about liberty
Poets wrote down words that did fit
Writers wrote books
Thinkers thought about it.

No, obviously we're far better off with a solid wall of dum derra dum dum diddies. Which actually makes just as good sense as anything else being dished up these days. Still, though, it do confound how such a monumental talent can mire himself in such twaddle, fine as some of it may be.

There is a kind of resolute silliness about a lot of the stuff Van Morrison's been doing for the last few years: he wants to make records for cookouts, we keep probing for his bardic soul, and the whole mess is ridiculous because he was actually only specific for one very tight stretch there, enclosing "T. B. Sheets" and Astral Weeks. As for the rest—i.e., the main body of his work—he truly delights in the glancing perception and all the filigree in the world. (But what kind of perverted universe reigns—and what kind of bray-orbed, Fellini-trite monstrolas might issue forth—when filigree becomes the body?) What, finally, are his beloved, infinitely extensive out-choruses but filigree? The last half of "Madame George" may be the all-time tightrope act, but, on Wavelength, he really gets down to it and dubs the endless out-choruses of "Santa Fe" a whole new song.

So I guess he has finally achieved what he maybe set out to do in the first place: make the edge the center. The result, unfortunately, is a perfect bubble of smoked cheese. It'll do for the party, but it leaves certain sorta primal questions so far from resolved that—well, no, we never quite give up, do we? It is damn well roundabout known that Van Morrison records about four times as much music as he releases. Some of these great, edgy, eternity-shale, sax-bitten pieces leak out occasionally, and that's just fine. We're gonna deserve something beautiful to listen to in our old age.

Remember P.F. Sloan? Sure you do. It was back when every folk rocker worth his harmonica holder was flushed with Dylan fever and seeing how many syllables he could cram into every involuted couplet. There was Tandyn Almer, of "Along Comes Mary" fame ("The psychodramas and the traumas hung on the scars of the stars in the bars and cars — something like that), and David Blue had his own Highway 61 too, but absolutely none of 'em could beat ol' P.F. He started out writing surf songs, but shook the world by the throat with his masterpieces "Eve Of Destruction" and "Sins of a Family," and all his best material was just brimming with hate.

Boy howdy, the first thing the world needs is a P.F. Sloan for 1973, and you can start revving up yer adrenaline, kids, because he's here in the person of Bruce Springsteen. Old Bruce makes a point of letting us know that he's from one of the scuzziest, most useless and plain uninteresting sections of Jersey. He's been influenced a lot by the Band, his arrangements tend to take on a Van Morrison tinge every now and then, and he sort of catarrh-mumbles his ditties in a disgruntled mushmouth sorta like Robbie Robertson on Quaaludes with Dylan barfing down the back of his neck. It's a tuff combination, but it's only the beginning.

Because what makes Bruce totally unique and cosmically surfeiting is his words. Hot damn, what a passel o' verbiage! He's got more of them crammed into this album than any other record released this year, but it's all right because they all fit snug, it ain't like Harry Chapin tearing rightangle malapropisms out of his larynx. What's more, each and every one of 'em has at least one other one here that it rhymes with. Some of 'em can mean something socially or otherwise, but there's plenty of 'em that don't even pretend to, reveling in the joy of utter crass showoff talent run amuck and totally out of control:

"Madman drummers bummers and Indians in the summer with a teenage diplomat/In the dumps with the mumps as the adolescent pumps his way into his hat" begins the very first song, and after that things just keep getting more breathtakingly complicated. You might think it's some kinda throwback, but it's really bracing as hell because it's obvious that B.S. don't give a shit. He slingshoots his random rivets at you and you can catch as many as you want or let 'em all clatter right off the wall which maybe's where they belong anyway. Bruce Springsteen is a bold new talent with more than a mouthful to say, and one look at the pic on the back will tell you he's got the glam to go places in this Gollywoodlawn world to boot. Watch for him; he's not the new John Prine.

In spite of 1972 being one of the stalest years in the history of popular music, the spate of reissues from all the major record companies and countless minor ones picks up more speed all the time, and the results (uneven as they are) are generally encouraging. All four of these albums represent attempts both at recapitulating the contributions of three black titans and cashing in on the belated widespread recognition of those contributions. Curtis Mayfield had a long string of hits with the Impressions but it took Super Fly to make him a household name. Ray Charles may have been bigger in the late Fifties and early Sixties than he is now, but he was more vital then, too. His earlier work deserves the endless repackaging. As for B.B. King, I can still remember the first time I saw a couple of kids in a department store line, audibly opting to chance $3.50 on an album called Lucille because some Limey speedfreaks had made it hip, and I'm sure that both they and I are glad they did, but B.B. King's career didn't begin when the royalties began pouring in from flash guitar covers and he was invited to tour with the Rolling Stones, so a thoughtful collection of vintage King is imperative.

Ray Charles doesn't have as many hits these days as he used to, but he's more renowned than ever before anyway. He's become something of a national institution, like the Duke Ellington of R&B; even Pres Nixon has made an official declaration of Charles fandom. But the Pres ain't exactly the type to do back-flips for "What'd I Say" or "The Right Time," and Ray's been hacking his way ever deeper into the tissue veldts of MOR for a full decade now. He still makes a good record every once in a while, but in his prime he was raunchy enough to split your skull and rock you into fundamentalist frothing fits. He created rock 'n' roll as much as Berry or Little Richard or anybody; he practically drew up the blue-prints for an entire era of gritty Stax R&B, and nobody ever wrenched their way deeper into the soaring terror of the blues. If you want to hear him really rip the joint apart and put it back together again with a cry, go back to those great Atlantic sides. The essence is on three albums: The Genius of Ray Charles. The Genius Sings the Blues and The Greatest Ray Charles. Or, for a fantastic overview, Atlantic's four-record compilation The Ray Charles Story.

Ray's move from Atlantic to ABC made him rich and, initially at least, the musical rewards were probably as bountiful as ever and an idiomatic breakthrough besides. In search of a buck-grabbing formula, ABC sent him through albums like The Genius Hits the Road ("Georgia on My Mind," "Mississippi Mud," "Carry Me Back to Old Virginny" etc.), and miraculously he came up with brilliant, deeply soulful amalgams of gospel roots and mainstream pop. But the real turning point was a record called Modern Sounds in Country & Western Music, which was released about 12 years ago, at which time it promptly became the Number One album in America and changed the face of the milder strains of radio pop as irrevocably as his early work had done for rock 'n' roll. All through the Sixties the marriage of C&W to blues or bluesy euphemisms reigned, and whether you picked up on Glenn Campbell or Lee Hazelwood or any one of the rest of the multitude exploiting this new form, it all began with Ray Charles.

Ray himself exploited his innovation till the power of the original purveyor began to pale, and not everything on All-Time Great Country & Western Hits is great. But enough of the prime is here to make it worthwhile, especially if you haven't picked up any of the many previous Charles reissues. "I Can't Stop Loving You" was his first big move at this amalgam, and it's still as tearfully puissant today as it was in 1961. Add the occasional C&W standard rendered in R&B style fully as uncompromising as any early Charles (the boiling "You Are My Sunshine" being the earliest and most potent example here), and you have a record as profound and essential as anything out today.

Lots of people think the Super Fly soundtrack the best soul album of 1972, but those unfamiliar with the Impressions owe it to themselves to discover what Curtis Mayfield was up to in the times before the most vital expression of black music was almost forced to deal with heroin death. "Freddie's Dead" is already a Seventies standard, and His Early Years with the Impressions is a fine reminder that Mayfield possessed a consistent gift for creating hits destined to become classics all through his career. The vocal harmonies of the Impressions could be as mellow a balm as anything by Smokey Robinson and, like Robinson, Mayfield was never saccharine.

In fact, this late rehearsing of his past achievements impresses you firmly, even if you missed it first time around, with the fact that Mayfield was a groundbreaker in the nascent status of black popular music as a direct expression of the changes in black consciousness. When "Keep On Pushing" was a hit it was fairly easy to find shadings of meaning in its lyrics which formed as clear a link between the oldest gospel message and something far more topical, as it was to revel in the perfect evolutionary link between the purely musical freight carried out of church and the AM soul stylings which reached their summit in the mid-Sixties.

"It's All Right" illuminates the same historic junction, and "We're A Winner" takes it out of the realm of ambiguity, straight across the threshold of blatant backbeat radio anthem. Meanwhile, if you're only familiar with things like "Gypsy Woman" in the eviscerated cover versions of white fluff-boys, get ready to be moved to the shoals of your soul by a whole other, more masterful and authentic type of vocal dramatics.

Again, the packaging is pretty bland, and another caveat is that lots of this stuff has been observed in the original albums selling for far less in bargain bins around the country (plus the fact that lots of those original packages were a joy in their very crassness, like that great Keep On Pushing cover observed among Dylan's most conspicuously prized possessions on the Bringin' It All Back Home jacket). But if Super Fly was your introduction to Curtis, you'll want to make a point of picking this up before his pre-soundtrack solo albums, which qualitatively fall way below both what preceded and followed them.

B.B. King has in his belated flush of success become almost as frustrating for the aficionado of the Real Shit as Ray Charles. B.B. plays Vegas now, no fault there, and hits both the colleges and TV talk shows. So he's finally out of the scuffle, at late long last. Unfortunately, his music has also gotten less interesting with each successive album. Vintage King wasn't just something for punks to prove they could tell a good blues guitar solo from a bad one; it was stark, evil stuff. Troubled and troubling.

The difference between these two B.B. albums is the difference between chills and chips, between hearing a raw edge that makes Back in the Alley more than just a good colorful title, and satisfying your curiosity about how B.B. King would work in the context of a standard Leon Russell Hollywood camp meeting.

And it's not just a matter of backalleys vs. proximity to pop-stars: There is just no way a cut from the legendary Live at the Regal album, which molded countless Sixties guitarists and stands alongside things like James Brown at the Apollo as one of the all-time classic in-person R&B disks, there is no way something like that is not gonna shut down a pleasantly perfunctory session cut at Cook County Jail two or three years after Johnny Cash made it both righteously hip and fiscally sound to jam for jailbirds.

Actually, the chronological distance between the two albums is not all that great. Back in the Alley begins in 1964 and leaves off just short of where The Best of B.B. King picks up, but the difference in mood and meat is sufficient to make the choice clear, even if Best Of does have the incredible "The Thrill Is Gone." It's the fine line between a man playing with total commitment to an audience he has probably had for years which can savor his peaks and bear an off night, and a man playing for people who've been sold his legend and will love anything because they know they're supposed to. But you don't have to be any kind of connoisseur to tell the difference.

That Elvis sure is a card! Just when you think he's cashed his last chip and sold so low he can't get no crasser, he comes along with something like this and proves that he and Colonel Bogey are still one jump ahead of the rest of us would-be Barnums. You gotta love him for it; it makes him matter, and even if that don't matter, his exploi-expertise is his charm.

Since the Big EP had just cut his most gutsy single in a skunk's age, causing some fools to drool on spec 'bout how he just might be about to make that big authentic album — well, if you were Elvis, what would you do? Cater to these cretins who've missed your point for over a decade? No! You wouldn't make that album now even if you'd had some hankerin' to, because they don't deserve it besides which you just feel like being ornery.

What you would do instead is take this monolithic taco and put it out as the centerpiece on a whole lazy susan of the same old shit you been blurping out for years. In fact, you wouldn't even bother to record new same old shit, you'd just put on a blindfold and take some darts and toss 'em at a few of yer old tripe faces, then you'd take out your whittlin' shiv and slice out the cuts with the dart holes in 'em and sluice 'em right on down to RCA Camden, the Victor empire's cheapo scrapyard, and sell the whole cuddly kaboodle for 2/3rds to half of what an official new EP set on the mother label would cost. Takes smarts to make hay in muzak biz, Junior! Keep your eye on that man.

But you! You don't have every Elvis album, so you got no excuse for passing up Burning Love and Schlocko-plus, because I bet you're one of these hip dips who never bought a single Elvis soundtrack in all your born days. In which case you don't know what you're missing — some of the goofiest gruel this side of Kathryn Kuhlman. It's like watching a really shitty cartoon on TV: You know that Augie Doggie and Doggie Daddy eat pud flakes, but you'll sit there and watch it anyway because you're sick and tired of all this never ending barrage of significance pounding away at your prefrontals. Who but a snot-hip dud could resist Elvis prattling away at the mandolin-dripping proto-quaeso sea chanty "I Love Only One Girl" ("... in every town/ The one I've got my arms around." Bet Joe Dallesandro don't score that heavy!)

Or the soggy enchilada emoting of "Guadalajara" from Fun in Acapulco where Elvis tries out his Latin accent while the rurales yip at him proving that even South of the Border and in foreign climes Elvis is always good for a bellylaugh. "Santa Lucia" is more of the same, and rightly so, while "No More" is a wahine-melting hula-samba from Blue Hawaii, and "Tender Feeling" is a limpoid makeout ballad from El's Ozark epic Kissin' Cousins. Damn me to a turnip if this record don't overflow with more international and ethnic goodwill-by-eclecticism than any platter since the Longines Symphonette used to placebo the Cold War by cramming 30-second versions of folksongs from every nation on the globe into one two-record set. Fuck them protest kooks — Elvis' heart is in the right place and if you don't buy this album you're a Commie!

Besides, we gotta support RCA Camden and make sure it stays in business. This is the best album they've released since TV Action Jazz! by Mundell Lowe and His All Stars and that came out in 1958, so their history has been somewhat spotty, but given the people Papa Vic is signing today their future literally glitters: just image cheapo racks full of albums like Lou Reed's Golden Gutter, or David Bowie, the Moonlight and You. The future's as bright for us as Elvis' past!

Well, here's another Jefferson Airplane album, and if you thought the last one had them baked into the mold of an absolutely stereotypic Airplane Sound, you may not even care to hear Long John Silver. It's not that they aren't capable of exciting music — the fires that fused albums like Baxter's and Crown of Creation will burn here, though the years have taken their toll. You can still get your rocks off on the Airplane, and those who thought Bark a bit too low-key and eclectic will be happy to know that Long John Silver mostly consists of one churning vat of fury after another. But the fury has gotten so predictable as to drive you to heights of frenzied indifference. Jorma and Jack are still one of the best lead-bass teams in the business, and the Airplane consistently delivers restless, fulminating songs because they're always mad about something. We can depend on 'em for that — in this album alone they take on both Christianity and vegetarianism. But their rage and their sarcasm are freelance, and the incredible gaucheness with which they sometimes put them over, combined with Grace's and Paul's overbearing pretensions combine to make even the staunchest Airplane fan a bit leery by now.

The packaging of Long John Silver is the first tipoff that the Airplane have lost a lot of what can only be called class. As elaborate as Bark, the box-jacket lies on the same level of puerility as Cheech and Chong's dope jokes — cornball and inane, and the music inside, in its very efforts at profundity, often comes off just as mawkish.

Kantner himself has gotten into a rut, and it wouldn't even be so bad if he didn't try to tackle some vast and weighty subject every time out. The night I got this album, I fell asleep on the couch while watching The Dick Van Dyke Show and dreamed that Paul Kantner was Dick Van Dyke and that "Alexander the Medium," the second to last cut here, was a plate piled high with rotting fish heads, and in every head the eye was staring at me. I wish the cut was that compelling, instead of a typically dull Kantner social-mythic melodrama. Sounding like one of the lesser tracks on Sunfighter, it is the longest song here, and reveals that instead of blasting off into outer space in a wooden starship, the chosen People are going to be walking around under the sea.

"Twilight Double Leader" and "The Son of Jesus" are also super-predictable Kantner stuff. The latter is an exercise in confused mythology calculated to be a mindblowing revelation: "Jesus had a son by Mary Magdalene ..." Ah, shaddup.

And if the almost uniform dullness of the songs wasn't enough, Grace's singing seems to be slipping drastically. The vocal in "Long John Silver" is off, strained more than usual (though Jack and Jorma are still tusslin' strong as ever). By the time we reach the last cut, "Eat Starch Mom," Grace is just delivering a harangue, although the backup is ferociously good and you can certainly dig the sentiments of a song which tells the vegetarians that machines will eat them. In "Easter?," as in "Eat Starch," Grace continually lapses into spoken sections of the most melodramatic sort, like: "I thought he said ... I could've sworn he said it was a sin." Alice Cooper made stuff like this work in "The Ballad of Dwight Frye," but the element of burlesque saved all those histrionics — Grace is serious. "Ah, stupid Christian" comes off unbearably self-righteous even to somebody who hates Christianity, and lines like "I think his [the Pope's] holy story is a mess" and "No more brains in the Christian" are as topically pretentious as anything on the latest John and Yoko album.

Still, the album is not as bad as it might sound. The instrumental work is consistently fine, and Papa John Creach is simply one of the most brilliant, subtle violinists alive. The main problem seems to be the material the musicians are given to work with. There is not one true standout track on this album, and certainly nothing on it as good as the best of Sunfighter or even Blows Against the Empire. Some essential spark is gone, and what remains is a rote scream. But it is the most furious muzak available, and if you're really stoned it might even seem as good as the old days.

Janis Joplin is gone, by now just one more we've seen succumb in the public arena of the pop marketplace. It's not just that this kind of early death has become a fact of life that is disturbing, but that it's been accepted as a given so quickly. We're getting to the point where we merely anticipate between exits, idly wondering which will be the next among our "heroes" to go. And caring less all the time.

I don't know which is worse, the cannibalistic impulse of the public and the pop music industry which mutually encourage artists in disintegration because that's the flash and we really do think that someone else can live our lives and deaths for us, or the sickly, not to say sickening, spate of "Eulogies" and "Memorials" and "Remembrances" which sweep the pop press as soon as another star done gone. But perhaps they are the same thing.

Because as soon as another Name's dead, the slick magazines and tabloids alike get out their plumes and their crying towels and indulge in all sorts of disgusting bathetic paeans to the deceased. But unfortunately, they almost invariably pay tribute not to the actual person but to the self-consuming myth, the larger-than-life persona which had no more than a marginal existence in the first place and ballooned so that eventually it dwarfed the person carrying it around: The composers of the Memorials make sure that we will keep on worshiping exactly that lie which contributed so heavily in almost every case to the desperate, self-consumption which killed the Name. They almost never write, on the other hand, and the public almost never comes to understand, anything about the real, different, scared individual behind the flash and its bluff. Maybe it just doesn't make good copy.

Janis Joplin was the most tragic example of this; even if you didn't much care about her music, her death came as a shock. Following so close upon the heels of Hendrix's undoubtedly had something to do with it. But there is something more, namely the fact that Janis Joplin was almost totally helpless, a true waif adrift in the world, and after a certain point anyone with enough interest in the pop scene to read this paper could have sensed it. Many did, I suppose. Others just remarked on how her singing got worse, more raspy and out of control all the time, and wished that damn yammering bitch would just go away. After all, we were the ones who had her hype splashed in our faces, Janis The Spirit Of The Blues, Janis The Spirit Of Bessie Smith, Janis on the cover of Newsweek magazine and represented inside as what We ("we"?) were all about. Janis Suffering, Drinking, Going Through Changes And Searching For The Right Band and The Right Man, her every swig and sigh duly recorded and preserved for the Fans who like to saturate themselves in it.

Those of us who didn't and might also have been rather hypersensitive about having our noses rubbed in hype for months on end, well, it was only natural that we should resent her to some degree. Except that she had nothing to do with it. She was as helpless as we were, no, far more so, and as the nebulous machine manipulated us both for the sake of a little mythic diversion and a lot of money, something eventually had to give. We finally tossed our papers aside, not having to live anything except our own obscure (and thus free) lives any way but vicariously, and Janis went on for as long as the private life and body behind the giant manikin could hold out.

When she died, it suddenly became obvious not only that we had collaborated greedily with the media in the cannibalization of the living star, but that that happened quite naturally, and would happen again, because that is the way the business works. There are people who live public lives and use themselves up with the full knowledge of what they are doing and why. They understand the dynamics of self-destruction and the roles they are expected to play, and acquiesce in the process to whatever degree they find comfortable. They know they are going to lose themselves, but don't care, because they've shed enough of their humanity to be totally objective about it. But Janis never knew when she was losing herself because she was never sure that she had herself in the first place.

Janis had a capacity to feel which would ensure that she was never quite as numb, hence never riding as easy, as so many of the others–those stars who have handled themselves with the kind of terrible coldness summed up in remarks made by Jerry Garcia and the Grateful Dead to this magazine on the night she died. Garcia opined that it wasn't as bad as it looked, because death was just another phase, like life, and everybody knew she was going to die and besides everybody dies sooner or later anyway. Pigpen, on the other hand, declared that he was going to have a one-man wake in her memory at some indeterminate point in the future, and just get some Southern Comfort and get righteously fucked-up, because that's how Janis would have wanted it.

From talking with people who were around her at various times, one gets an impression far different from that conveyed by the press before and after her death. Far from being a romantically doomed figure, she is described as a nervous, insecure young girl, dazed, giddy, unable to sit still for more than a few seconds at a time or, often, maintain a conversation with anyone. One gathers she was constantly vacillating between noisy attempts to make sure that she would remain the center of attention wherever she was, and recoiling in defensive fright when she was that center. She often responded to whomever happened to be around her, whether they wanted anything from her or not, with random insults and jerky bursts of nervous emotion and random hostility whose expression was never quite completed, and hardly needed to be rationalized. Certainly she was not like this all the time, but it was a part of her makeup, and was just as much Janis Joplin as the flamboyance, drinking and total submergence-in-blues myth.

The latter was simply easier to meld–more marketable–while the former person, well, fuck, the public doesn't wanna know from that. They can see it at home, and even if they can't it would only be a bringdown, and the point of the whole lifestyle and the business interests around it is to prevent bringdowns at all costs. Charlie Perry's ROLLING STONE account of Winterland on the night she died is one of the most telling documents on the counterculture, recording not only the Dead's priceless reactions but the picture of a room full of hip cultural leaders and Janis' friends as well, where the only person crying was a reporter from a straight daily, and he was asked to leave because he was "bringing everybody down."

It seems certain that whatever else she might have been, Janis was unquestionably a victim. And not even in the sexual-politics sense of "Women Is Losers," though that too. She was a victim of her own confusion, the inhumanity of money and the inhumanity of the hip culture which is every bit as cold as that which it's self-righteously rejected.

Joplin in Concert is probably going to be the last Janis Joplin album, and I for one am glad. Because for the most part it is not pleasant to listen to, not because the music is bad (although much of it is rather second-rate), but because listening to it you can remember and see a person disintegrating before your very eyes. Her erosion is graphically represented on these two discs. When side four is finished, you look again at the pictures of Janis on the jacket, distinctly non-tragic pictures which capture perfectly her image as one of the People With Style who held sway at a certain time and seemed to be everything we believed in and wanted to be: exciting, colorful, high, moving easily through various strata of society, living with true flair. And not only is it saddening to remember believing in that, but it's impossible now to believe even in the single person you see here, to believe that this was Janis. A face of Janis, a poster of Janis, a part of Janis, but so disturbingly counterbalanced by the picture of the complete individual which has begun to emerge since her death, as to be at best irrelevant, at worst to give you the creeps.

On the record, we hear her as she gradually passes from the tailend of the initial exuberant phase with Big Brother, through the jarring difference between that on-stage persona and what emerges immediately in the Full-Tilt Boogie Band tapes, on which we hear a disoriented and thoroughly pathetic individual and a music whose raggedness is made even less palatable by the breakdown and sense of strain behind it. The most unsettling part of all is the between-song raps, nervous but exhilarated and riding the crest with Big Brother, disjunct and disparate with the Boogie Band, working unhappily at playing a role that was obviously eating her alive but was, after all, the only one she had.

* * *

Big Brother opens the album with a bang, a rush of metal thunder in "Down On Me," recorded at the Grande Ballroom in Detroit. Everyone is having a ball no matter how sloppy the music gets; in fact its sense of errant energy with no place to go but up is part of its power. Janis, the band, the audience, all feeding off of each other and giving back as much as they can of what they get. James Gurley's guitar solo is one of his best on record, as searing a storm of noise as that in "Ball and Chain" on Cheap Thrills, but speeded up, directed with a kind of joyous fury at an audience who couldn't get enough of it.

"Piece of My Heart," also from the Grande tapes, is just as good: ragged but right. In some ways Janis' delivery of this song here lacks the concentrated fire and pain of the earlier tak

I just don't understand, as Ann-Margret once sang, why an exciting band like Deep Purple, who consistently hit the top of the charts in Merrie Olde and have taken Europe by storm, remain a comparatively unknown quantity to American audiences. Especially when said audiences have wholeheartedly embraced bands with similar musical aims and not one more ampere of excitement.

It's a shame, but Deep Purple themselves are at least partially to blame. Their first two American albums on Tetragrammaton were mostly uninspired, despite some good cover versions of songs like "I'm So Glad" and "Hush." The basic problem seemed to be that the group hadn't really learned to write yet, so the covers were the best way to grow without losing the audience. Except that no self-respecting late-Sixties rock band wants to put out an album with nothing but covers on it, so we were left with a bunch of boring originals, half of them instrumental. When, that is, they weren't indulging in long "improvisational" forays such as their first album's bolero rendition of "Hey Joe." Jon Lord was the main culprit here, having a background of extensive formal keyboard training which tended to make his solos at least a bit Emersonic and at most positively pompous. The pretentious side of Deep Purple found its fullest expression in their first album for Warner's, Concerto For Group and Orchestra, written by Lord and performed with the aid of Malcolm Arnold and the "Royal Philharmonic Orchestra."

It was an atrocity. A "movement" would begin with a few minutes of "symphonic" mush, then abruptly the orchestra would stop and the band would start to play, build until you thought they were just about to really start cooking, and then — whoosh — drowned in string sections again. A recent Lord-Arnold collaboration on Capitol called Gemini Suite was just more of the same miscegenation.

Fortunately, the band has seemingly realized that that sort of thing can get out of hand, because their last three albums have finally found a comfortably furious groove for them to work in, making them prime contenders among the most searingly loud and heavy bands on both sides of the Atlantic. Deep Purple in Rock was a dynamic, frenzied piece of work sounding not a little like the MC5 (anybody who thinks that all heavy bands put out thudding slabs of "downer" music just hasn't gotten into Deep Purple). Fireball was more of the same, if not quite as frantically effective. Machine Head bears strong similarities to both its immediate predecessors, lying qualitatively somewhere in between the two.

And like both of them, though it delivers the Sound, the rushing, grating crunch of the hard attack, it has its ups and downs compositionally. "Highway Star" is a great opening track, quite similar both structurally and thematically to "Speed King" and "Fireball," the openers of the two previous albums. The pace is blistering, almost too fast for comfort, with lyrics that take the primeval cargirl equation and turn it into something as breathtakingly homicidal as Alice Cooper's "Under My Wheels": "Nobody gonna take my car/I'm gonna race it to the ground/Nobody gonna beat my car/It's gonna break the speed of sound/Oooh it's a killing machine/It's got everything ..."

"Space Truckin'" is just as good, a sci-fi boogie that's the perfect answer to all the Kantnerian pomposities and turns out to be the missing link between them and things like Wild Man Fischer's "Rocket Rock" (lyrically) and the Doors' "Hello I Love You" (musically). Once again the lyrics are ace, and never let it be said that Deep Purple don't have a sense of humor: "We had a lot of luck on Venus/We always have a ball on Mars/Meeting all the groovy people ... We'd move to the Canaveral moonstop/And everyone would dance and sway/We got music in our solar system/We're space truckin' round the stars."

In between those two Deep Purple classics lies nothing but good, hard, socking music, although some of the lyrics may leave a bit to be desired. It says on the liner that "This album was written and recorded in Montreux, Switzerland, between 6th and 21st December, 1971," and much of it sounds like it was conceived on the fly, what with deathless lines like "You're lazy you just stay in bed/You don't want no money/You don't want no bread." There's even trials getting Machine Head recorded: it seemed that some local arsonist burned down the best recording studio in town but luckily the Rolling Stones' mobile unit was on hand to get the new D. Purple out on schedule.

Frankly, I am not offended at all by the offhand nature of those songs. Rather than either condemn or apologize for their triteness, I will merely refer you to the current issue of Who Put the Bomp magazine, where Mark Shipper makes note of the fact that Sky Saxon wrote "Pushin' Too Hard" for the Seeds in ten minutes while waiting for his girl to get out of a supermarket — and comments that he'd rather not publish a review of any album that contains a song that took longer than ten minutes to write.

Now, I can't be that much of a purist, because I'm sure that "Highway Star" and "Space Truckin'" took at least 20 minutes each to compose, but I do know that this very banality is half the fun of rock 'n' roll. And I am confident that I will love the next five Deep Purple albums madly so long as they sound exactly like these last three.

"Said the Mama to the baby in the corn:/'You are my first-born/That shall hereon in be known/As the Spotlight Kid.'" That's how the title song of this album begins, and one glance at the picture on the cover — Cap natty in Las Vegas jacket, with a knowing almost-smile on his face — reveals a man with the self-understanding and self-confidence to bill himself as a new-generational hero with no false pride.

And make no mistake, it is definitely to the new audience, the ones that teethed on feedback and boogie, that Captain Beefheart belongs. He has been called everything in the past from a man wasting the clear ability to be the world's greatest white blues singer, to an impossibly complex musician who may or may not be the real avant-garde, but is certainly an elitist taste. While I have always held to the opinion that there's been nothing playing on the face of the earth as far out as Beefheart for about 3 or 4 years now, I also recognize that his former style was a bit beyond the attention span or interest of the average listener. Which is certainly not to slight mass tastes, either; after all, why should things have to be as far out as possible all the time?

This album is Captain Beefheart's answer to that question. It is the most accessible thing he's recorded since Safe As Milk (remember the single of "Diddy Wah Diddy"? Captain Beefheart makes hits!), and goes back to his most primal roots for much of its inspiration, proving once and for all that not only is Captain Beefheart almost certainly the supreme white blues singer of our era, but he knows how to take that gift and combine it with his supra-blues musical vision sliced down to bone basics, and come up with vital, immediate, funky rock 'n' roll.

Its originality is almost complete, although the Captain is treading waters these days adjacent to those where some of his mightiest contemporaries strut. For instance, for verbal and vocal mysterioso effects, he sounds in some parts of this album even more like Doctor John than Sly Stone does on There's a Riot Goin' On. Throughout, however, the Beefheart wit and genius manifest themselves. "I'm Gonna Booglarize Ya, Baby" is a song riding in on a tense, edgy riff, telling a story about Vital Willy and Weepin' Milly driving around and around in Will's car in the night (the first line is "The moon was a drip on a dark hood"), looking for a secluded place to park. Finally, in desperation, Milly tells Willy that they can go to her house, and Beefheart comments: "Tush! Tush! You lose your push/When you beat around the bush!"

While hints of eclecticism creep in at odd moments, it is blues and the raunchier forms of R&B which lie at the heart of this album. "White Jam" opens with a Chinese-sounding marimba riff, like porcelain raindrops breaking on a sill, then shifts with perfect organic logic into a sawing boogie with great understated harp and high Beefheart falsetto. "When It Blows Its Stacks" is an ominous song built on a basic guitar riff worthy of Mark Farner. With each chorus, the guitar builds from its initial simple advance to wirier, more complex backups for Beefheart's stark, threatening vocal that seems to be about some angry god: "When it blows its stacks/He don't pussyfoot around/Hide all the women ..."

On side two Beefheart gets more deeply into something akin to traditional blues, especially with the last three songs; the Captain has never sounded more like Howlin' Wolf than he does here, and he's always had Wolf's growls and howls down to a point of virtual transcendence. The best thing on the album, wisely chosen for a single b/w "Booglarize You," is "Click Clack." This is real train music, with trestles in the drums and whistles in the guitar and harp: "One [train] goin'/And the other one comin' back," as Cap sings. The rhythm is insistent and propulsive, in the great tradition of such songs as "Train Kept A Rollin' " and Lou Reed's "Train Round the Bend." The mutated Chicago South Side harp heard throughout much of the album enters, the guitars begin pushing at riffs' edges, and "Train was goin' up the track/You was leavin'/I could see you wavin' yer handkerchief" is described in a hyponotically redundant guitar riff like the obsessive replay of an old memory.

There comes a time in the career of every pop musician who also happens to be a serious artist when he realizes the need for a balance between the most intensely personal type of statement and music of mass appeal. If he can strike that balance without compromising his integrity, he is probably a greater artist than even his staunchest fans previously suspected, and with any exposure at all the public would pick up immediately on the truth and beauty of what he is doing. With this album, Captain Beefheart has struck that balance with total success, and I wouldn't be surprised if he were a major star a year from now. Though you may have been a great shadow hovering over our music for half a decade now, Don, it can be said that in 1972 you've really arrived.

Like all the true rock superstars to rise in the Sixties, Alice Cooper is a consummate master of imagemanipulation. He continually sees to it that new configurations are born in his studiedly outrageous stage persona and the spirit-force of his sound, with the end in mind of putting both himself and his audience through a steeplechase of changes and keeping everybody alert at gut-level. Whether the myth has much at all to do with Alice Cooper the man behind the role is highly debatable, but even if it's mostly fiction it doesn't matter all that much anyway. Alice is not that much more a self-invention and technician of forms and poses than Bob Dylan has always been. And if you think that's a far-out comparison, just listen to "Be My Lover" or "Desperado" on this album.

Killer (Warner Bros. 2567) is without a doubt the best Alice Cooper album yet and one of the finest rock & roll records released in 1971. It brings all the elements of the band's approach to sound and texture to a totally integrated pinnacle that fulfills all the promise of their erratic first two albums, and beats Love It To Death's dalliance with Thirties flick "spooky" cornball riffs by the sheer sustained impact of its primal rock and roll jolt. And it's necessary to emphasize those three bludgeoned-into-loam words because there has always been some question of priorities in regard to this band, viz. whether they wanted most to rave up the wang dang doodle or promulgate a kind of concentrated Ringling Brothers sideshow whose essential context and importance were extramusical.

You remember these guys, how they set back straights and hips alike by wearing makeup and throwing chickens to the mercy of the more illiberally aggressive sections of the audience. Well, I think the reaction to the latter freaked even them (Alice Cooper) out, and the other night I saw a fine and rather mainstream —sounding Northern California band called the Wackers do an "Ooooh"-perfect rendition of the Beatles' "She Loves You" from behind as much rouge and blue eyeshadow as Alice and the boys ever piled on. It gets harder to be avant-outrageous all the time, what with everybody so jaded and I even hear the next catch-phrase to drop from the Max's dens of iniquity into the Newsweeks is "gay chauvinism," so what the fuck are you gonna do short of copping a riff not even new when Gilles de Rais laid it down four or five centuries ago and taking to actually disemboweling virgins and infants on stage?

Sing about dead babies, that's what. Alice's material, as opposed to his stage business, was never that lurid in the past, but as the shock value of the live show has ebbed with the tides of history he has begun to think about injecting or impregnating the songs with more weirdities, fetishes, decadence and degeneracy in the form of archetypes derived from TV, pre-Wertham comic books, and the pages of paperback textbooks on deviation authored by spurious PhD's and selling for two or three dollars in liquor stores in every suburb.

You can take all this seriously if you want to, but it was not for nothing that Alice told interviewers from an underground paper in Texas that one of the things that turned him on the most was jacking off. Not that there's anything wrong with jacking off, either; rock musicians, audiences and critics have been doing it over themselves and each other for years. Alice Cooper is not half as depraved, fortunately or not, as he'd like you to think he is, but he has brought the Hollywood manipulation of fantasies and attitudes to brilliant new levels of cheerful cynicism. Some regard it as contemptuous, nihilistic exploitation and even accuse him of having a vested interest in the status quo and the fucked-up nature of American life because its absurdity turns him on, but I think he's one of the most upfront stars we've ever known and his using up of what was implicit in the appeal of rock stars ever since the Fab Four first shook their pretty mops can only be healthy for all concerned.

And on another level he is talking about himself in all these songs, and more on this album than ever before, because this album deals, by turns graphically and surrealistically, with how Al and confreres feel about their sudden ICBM ascent from semiobscure weirdo band to the glamour and unreality of stardom. Kind of like James Taylor in Mud Slide Slim, except that for all they sing about rage and aggression and death, these dudes are feeling no perceivable angst, believe you me (which may be an ultimately lethal form of hubris). Where the earlier "Caught in a Dream" had them "tryin' to catch a ride on a Cadillac," the very first thing Alice does here is declare that he's got the whole fat world "Under My Wheels."

Like all of the material on the album, "Under My Wheels" is full-throttle, hard-driving rock & roll. While not as wayward or dissonant as much other Alice Cooper material, it has a singleminded, straight-ahead intensity reminiscent of the Stones' best singles, and it's a car song to boot, so it's inconceivable why it hasn't become a hit. It even utilizes the current fashionable Delaney & Bonnie Stax- or Muscle-Shoals-derived sax riffings.

If "Under My Wheels" is a Stones classic translated into Alice Cooper's obsession with machines and technology, "Be My Lover" sets Stones-like lyrics dealing with a sexual situation to a bedrock guitar riff straight from Lou Reed's "Sweet Jane." This may be the best vocal Alice's ever recorded, and Mike Bruce's words reflect the strutting, smug feeling of the nascent Superstar perfectly: "And with a magnifyin' glance I just sorta look her over/We have a drink or two, well maybe three/And then she starts tellin' me her life story."

Later there is a great moment hilariously reminiscent, whether intended as parody or not, of "Honky Tonk Women": "I told her that I came from Detroit City/And I played guitar in a longhaired rock & roll band" and here Glenn Buxton's guitar takes off in a great swooping flight set at reduced volume level so you don't quite catch it at first "She asked me why the singer's name was Alice/And I said 'Listen baby, you really wouldn't understand.'" The name and the self-conscious sense of charisma will recur later, when he throws in a "This is Alice speakin'!," and even if you've never experienced the pandemonium of a live show you know that this man is a hero to countless battalions of American kids, and he knows it too. And each song on this album finds him in a different role in the endless movie he is projecting on them.

One of the strangest faces of his heroism is found in "Halo of Flies." The song begins with an effectively mesmeric moog pulsation and a series of circumfluent guitar solos that remind me of movie sound-track music somewhere between James Bond themes and old films about aristocratic chicanery in the courts of Renaissance Europe. The first line of the song is "I've got the answers to all of your questions," and it moves through a humorous sequence where the lyrics "daggers and contacts and bright shiny limos ... glimmering nightgowns, poisonous cobras" are set to the melody of Rogers & Hammerstein's "My Favorite Things." to a Spanish-sounding interlude where Alice might be parodying Rod Stewart: "And what a middle-Asian lady/She really came as no surprise But I still did destroy her," but the next line is "And I will smash halo of flies."

Alice is creating absurd and outrageous collages of idiomatic borrowings combined with a distinctly teen-age sense of the morbid. The song ends in a flurry of guitar-and-moog screams, and it is almost a relief to come down from its rococo intricacies to "Desperado," which is nothing more nor less than a Hollywood Western turned into a rock & roll song, as Love did with "Singing Cowboy," except that here Alice sounds more than a little like Jim Morrison, which is supremely appropriate for lines like "I'm a killer and I'm a clown." And some of the best stanzas in recent music appear in this song, just as effulgent Dmitri Tiompkinish violins stream over the rhythms like a sunset: "You're as stiff as my smokin' barrel/You're as dead as the desert night/You're a notch and I'm a legend/You're at peace and I must hide."

"You Drive Me Nervous" is a great addition to the august line of rock & roll songs and Alice Cooper songs about frustration and anxiety, with some of the most searing double guitar work on the album and lyrics that seem at first to be an extension of "Eighteen's" adolescence riff into a shriek at parents but reveal themselves eventually to be a message to a confused and footloose lover: "You run upstate/Yer thrown in jail/Yer mama 'n' papa comes up and sez: 'Honey we ain't for sale!'" The last line is spoken in a deep caricaturial voice, exactly like Eddie Cochran's "I'd like to help ya son but you're too young to vote" in "Summertime Blues."

Alice knows from whence he comes (even if he seems to come from everywhere), and almost as if they were consciously moving through the history of rock & roll, the next song is called "Yeah Yeah Yeah" and despite another arrogant Stones-like role ("You can be my slave and I'll be the stranger") runs in its last half through some harmonica and Springfield-Moby Grape type riffs reminiscent of folk-rock at its best. Followed of course by psychedelia circa Chocolate Watch Band, a touch of Ray Davies in the vocal and certain words, and a pervasive sense of general unwholesomeness in "Dead Babies." The key line is "Dead babies can take care of themselves"; I find this song a little repulsive myself, but then maybe that's exactly the idea. Although if Alice Cooper thinks the idea of dead babies is somehow cute, then he's ... he's ... he's succeeded, I guess, although there are all kinds of motives and ways of offending people, some less justified than others. In any case, the song's arrangement is incredible, an almost cinematic sound, with beautiful use of french horns a la "Penny Lane." After that the only way to finish the album and the side's seeming rock cycle is with more Morrisonics and some almost Procol Harumish organ work in the title song, which seems to have more in common texturally with the material on side two of Love It To Death than most of Killer.

Alice Cooper has come a long way and used up a lot of gimmicks and poses to get to this stunner of an album, but it was all worth it and at this point I can hardly wait for the next one. Love It To Death was still in the Top 100 just before this one was released, and with the help of another hit single Killer should be even more of a giant, because in every area of conception and plain instrumental and vocal tightness it excels. One thing is for sure: this is a strong band, a vital band, and they are going to be around for a long, long time.

It would be nice to be able to call it something like The Rolling Stones' Golden Decade, for the Stones have been the most enduringly prolific highwire act of their time, both reflecting and surpassing the era with a deadly accuracy that can make them seem more dangerous than they really are. But somehow this album merely falls into that venerable Stones tradition of supra-throwaway albums, collections like December's Children and Flowers that by their very slapdash cynicism validate themselves and charm us into feeling that they're as sure a representation of the Stones ethos as brand-new and more unified efforts like Let It Bleed.

Hot Rocks (London 2PS 606-7) is even crasser than Flowers and Children, because it's the first Stones album on which every track has been represented on albums previously released in this country. Some of them, in fact, like "Let's Spend the Night Together," are on their fourth go-round. So in part Hot Rocks is, however beautifully packaged, a purely mercenary item put together by the Stones' former record company to cash in on the Christmas season and wring some more bucks out in the name of the Mod Princes they once owned.

As historical document of Greatest Hits culling, Hot Rocks takes almost no chances, and if the Stones or London sometimes display an unexpected sense of what may be the band's most important statements (as in the inclusion of "You Can't Always Get What You Want"), there is also much left out. The absence of "Lady Jane" makes sense in the light of its being on three albums already and not that good in the first place, and considerations of space make "Not Fade Away"'s freezeout seem reasonable until you reflect on how severely the derivative but vital R&B (their best work, really, until Let It Bleed) of their first five albums has been under-represented here. Maybe it's sensible to cut "The Last Time" in favor of its flip side "Play With Fire," but the absence of "It's All Over Now" fairly glares at you.

Either "She's a Rainbow" or the great, roaring "Have You Seen Your Mother, Baby, Standing in the Shadow" would have been more fun than the always lame "As Tears Go By" and the socially incisive but musically slight "Mother's Little Helper," both of which were included. And "We Love You," the brilliant "jail-single" of the summer of '67 which may be the most musically adventurous thing the Stones have ever recorded, has never been on an album released in this country (There are also the great B sides like "Who's Drivin' My Plane," "Child of the Moon" and "Sad Day," but they deserve a different sort of album. Maybe someday they'll get it.)

So when we look past the magnificent cover depicting the Stones in their numerous roles as ragtag rougues of Merrie Olde, Tangierian travellers, fashion plates, etc., what do we find? The evolution of a rock & roll band from superlative interpreters of mostly borrowed R&B in a style that was never far from pop, to being pop artists, philosophers and social commentators couching their vision and fantasies in a style that seldom gets all that far away from R&B.

The Stones have never been far from Chuck Berry stylistically, and in the beginning he was as predominant an influence as Ray Charles was for the early Eric Burdon and Joe Cocker. But the Berry-Diddley-Jimmy Reed phase of the Stones' genesis is overlooked in favor of two songs deriving much more from the traditions of uptown soul and pop. Nevertheless, "Time is on My Side" and "Heart of Stone" are vintage Stones, with the arrogant persona that is largely the subject of the first half of their career and the first half of this album already emerging unmistakably, and cemented in "Play With Fire," first entry in the Stones' continuing sometime dalliance with the folk traditions of their native land. "As Tears Go By" derives from those traditions too, but in much more cornball fashion, and one imagines the Stones could have only recorded it to prove they could carry it off, Delsey tissue strings and all.

The crucial thread running through almost all of the Stones' early work, and much of what has followed, is the tension in the alternation of themes of utter arrogance and disdain, and of the sense of ennui and frustration deriving from living, however highly, in these desperate times. "Get Off Of My Cloud" brought the former razzberry to a pinnacle of derisive noise that many, including Jagger himself, found excessive, while "I Can't Get No Satisfaction" was, of course, the primal and perhaps still definitive statement of the latter condition. The balancing of these two senses is at once the strength and limitation of the Stones: strength, because nothing is more universal now than boredom and dissatisfaction and the Stones' particular brand of charismatic swagger has been affected by more adolescents than any other posture of the generation: limitation, since yesterday's outrageous strut is today's cornball signal to get the hook, and keeping a sure grasp on the shifting modes in malaise o' the day is one of the most difficult feats for any artist to maintain in this fast-mutating era.

The Stones have maintained, of course, radiating a semblance of constant change while mainly just reworking the most tried-and-true elements in their arsenal. Along the way, they've juiced up the process by turning now and then from their narcissistic role to cast a caustic eye at the society around them, as in "Mother's Little Helper," and borrowing whatever was handily trendy, from the sitar in "Paint It Black" to the Memphis horns in "Brown Sugar" and Sticky Fingers, to garnish their basic sound. And, in "Let's Spend the Night Together" they brought the stud role to a double-entendre — whether the song is actually about sex or about being too wired to make it and knowing that nothing needs to be proved anyway — as brilliant as the utter sexist dominance of "Under My Thumb" is devastating. "Let's Spend the Night Together" also represented the apotheosis of noise evolved into an arrangement of perfect clarity and unorthodox form, and effortlessly pushing, pulsating, almost mechanical sound that could go on forever.

It's on the second record of Hot Rocks, however, that the big thematic shift in the Stones' music becomes unmistakable. Almost all of the previous songs had been in a more or less tangible sense autobiographical, but now the ongoing persona ballooned into something at once stranger, more surrealistic and yet perhaps more universal. "Jumping Jack Flash" was unmistakably Mick Jagger, but also a creature of myth, a new mask to wear. "Sympathy For the Devil" cemented this process, of course, and helped give the Stones the "bad-vibes" patina which led so many to lay the blame for Altamont solely at their feet.

Always theatrical, the Stones had found a way of molding their basic profile into and out of various synonymous figures. We always sensed that they were basically lower-class street-punks who used to get out and mix it up on Friday nights, even if it may not have been entirely true, but not until "Street Fighting Man" did they take the trouble to play out the role in the most overt fashion possible, and what was even better was that the time was ripe for them to do it in the fashionable context of revolution. They can hardly be blamed for not following through politically, since, just like Dylan and most of the other giants in this business, they are basteally involved in finding roles, playing them out and projecting them, and then moving on to new ones. And at least they never pretended, as Lennon does today, to be doing more than that. Listening to "Midnight Rambler" still gives me chills today, but I hardly think Mick Jagger thinks of himself as "a proud Black Panther."

So the Stones, beginning with Beggar's Banquet, moved into a strong new phase where they are beginning to let their fantasies run free, and, if something like "Memo From Turner" from Performance is any indication, Jagger may have even darker dreams than "Midnight Rambler" in store. Unhealthy, perhaps, but undeniably pertinent.

The other, and even more important, recent phase is the Stones' interest in songs, the kind of triumphs hinted at in "Satisfaction" and "Mother's Little Helper," that deal in searingly explicit terms not just with sexual conceits and power fantasies, but with the conditions under which all of us are living today. "Gimme Shelter" and "You Can't Always Get What You Want" may be the two most crucial and enduring things ever laid on wax by this band; certainly they demonstrated an unprecedented maturity, a view of the world as it is and a promise that the Stones' most vital work may well lie ahead of them. And even the much maligned "Brown Sugar" is an almost perfect crossbreed song in the new Stones vocabulary, combining a forceful picture of colonial racism with another Jagger fantasy which has offended some people but strikes with undeniable power.

The direction of the Stones' future is clear, though perhaps less predictable than ever before. I doubt if they'll ever stop writing songs like "Bitch" and "Live With Me" any more than they'll ever stop copping licks from Chuck Berry. It doesn't matter. They are the most creative and self-sustaining rock & roll band in history, and, despite what some observers say, not tired at all yet. "Gimme Shelter," "You Can't Always Get What You Want," and "Brown Sugar" point the way, and if Jagger & Co. are perhaps the most decadent or even, in the words of some, evil of our heroes, they also have the surest grasp of who we are and where we are going. The Stones will not quail from reflecting it; it's up to us to do something about it.

The second-generation rock audience (that is, those who went steady to "I Wanna Hold Your Hand" and got serious with Highway 62 Revisited) suffer mightily wrestling with the phenomenon represented by Grank Funk and Black Sabbath. If nothing else, though, both Funk and Sabbath are for all their monotony at least supremely consistent — as opposed to schtick collectors with no personal vision like Deep Purple. And since when is monotony so taboo in rock & roll, anyway? Rock has been — some of the best of it too in large part monotonous from the beginning, hypnotically so, as rightwingers would say. As far apart as they are, Black Sabbath is only slightly more monotonous than James Taylor or Joni Mitchell, and any Stooges or MC5 fan who disdains Black Sabbath is just bigoted.

The thing is that, like all the best rock & rollers since the Pleistocene era, Black Sabbath (and Grand Funk) have a vision that informs their music with unity and direction and makes their simple structures more than they might seem. Grand Funk's vision is one of universal brotherhood (as when they have spoken of taking their millions to the White House with a list of demands), but Black Sabbath's, until Master of Reality anyway, has concentrated relentlessly on the self-immolating underside of all the beatific Let's Get Together platitudes of the counter culture.

Their first album found them still locked lyrically into the initial Spiritualist-Satanic hype and was filled out mostly with jamming, while Paranoid reflected that theme only, in the great line in "War Pigs": "Generals gathered in their masses Just like witches at black masses." The rest of the album dealt mostly with social anomie in general, from the title track's picture of total disjuncture (rendered with authentic power too) to "Iron Man's" picture of an unloved Golem in a hostile world, the stark picture of ultimate needle-freak breakdown painted in the philippic "Hand of Doom," and finally the unique "Fairies Wear Boots": "I went walkin' late last night Suddenly I got a fright/I looked in the window, was surprised what I saw/Fairies in boots dancin' with the broads!"

Not all of this, incidentally, was rendered in La Brea sinks of lugubrious bass blasts — several of the songs had high wailing solos and interesting changes of tempo, and "Paranoid" really moved. If you took the trouble to listen to the album all the way through.

Master of Reality both extends and modifies the trends on Paranoid. It has fewer songs, if you discount the two short instrumental interludes, but it is not that the songs are longer than the first record — the album is shorter. The sound, with a couple of exceptions, has evolved little if at all. The thick, plodding, almost arrhythmic steel wool curtains of sound the group is celebrated and reviled for only appear in their classical state of excruciating slowness on two tracks, "Sweet Leaf" and "Lord of This World," and both break into driving jams that are well worth the wait. Which itself is no problem once you stop thinking about how bored you are and just let it filter down your innards like a good bottle of Romilar. Rock & roll has always been noise, and Black Sabbath have boiled that noise to its resinous essence. Did you expect bones to be anything else but rigid?

The rest of the songs, while not exactly lilting, have all the drive and frenzy you could wish for in this day and age. Thematically the group has mellowed a bit, and although the morbidity still shines rankly in almost every song, the group seems to have taken its popularity and position seriously enough to begin offering some answers to the dark cul-de-sacs of Paranoid. "Sweet Leaf," for instance, shows that Black Sabbath have the balls to write a song celebrating grass this late date, and the double entendre, if you can even call it that, is much less tortuous than it would have been in 1966, with an added touch of salvation from grosser potions: "My life was empty forever on a down/Until you took me, showed me around ... Straight people don't know what you're about..."

Unfortunately, the religious virus also rears its zealot head, in "After Forever," which is a great Yardbirds-type arrangement nevertheless and despite its drubbing us over the head with "God is the only way to love" it does have the great line "Would you like to see the Pope on the end of a rope?"

And besides, isn't all this Christian folderol just the flip side of the Luciferian creed they commenced with and look back on balefully in "Lord of This World"? And for those of us, like me, who prefer the secular side of Black Sabbath, there's "Solitude," a ballad as lovely as any out of England in the last year (with flute yet), and "Children of the Grave": with "Revolution in their minds the children start to march Against the world they have to live in Oh! The hate that's in their hearts They're tired of being pushed around and told just what to do. They'll fight the world until they've won and love comes flowing through."

I'm not saying that either that or the arrangement it's set in is the new "My Generation," but it is a rocking, churning addition to the long line of defiant, self-affirmative and certainly a little defensive songs that goes right back to the earliest whap and wail of rock 'n' roll. It's naive, simplistic, repetitive, absolute doggerel — but in the tradition. Chuck Berry sang in more repressed times. "Don't bother us, leave us 'lone/Anyway we almost grown." The Who stuttered "hope I die before I get old," but the MC5 wanted to "Kick Out the Jams" or at least escape on a "Starship," and Black Sabbath have picked up the addled, quasi-politicized desperation of growing up in these times exactly where they left off: "Freedom fighters sent out to the sun Escape from brainwashed minds and pollution/Leave the earth to all its sin and hate/Find another world where freedom waits."

The question now is not whether we can accept lines as obvious and juvenile as that from a rock & roll record. They should be as palatable to anyone with a memory as the stereotypic two-and three-chord structures of the songs. The only criterion is excitement, and Black Sabbath's got it. The real question is whether Black Sabbath can grow and evolve, as a band like the MC5 has, so that there is a bit more variation in their sound from album to album. And that's a question this group hasn't answered yet.

Jefferson Airplane have been a subject of some contention ever since they abandoned their Summer of Love posture for music that aspired at once to both topicality and a degree of experimentation. If you love them, you know that they are one of the four or five most consistently vital American bands. If you hate them you're at least partially justified on any rational man's terms, given the rather squishy politics and pretentiously inane sense of humor. And if you're one of those unfortunate souls caught between the staunch Planeiacs and tooth-grinding critics, then each new Airplane album is an exercise in manic depression, hamstrung between the fire of the Kaukonen-Casady combination (one of the great lead/bass juxtapositions of all time, in the context of the Airplane) and the bombastic excesses of the Slick-Kantner axis, who, after all, write most of the songs and have increasingly stamped the group's identity with their own sensibilities, as Marty Balin receded, finally to hightail it for good.

Bark, the first post-Balin album and first really new release in two years, has gotten some bad press and provoked yawns even among some Airplane cognoscenti. Maybe it's just that people built their hopes up so high that Bark could only prove anticlimactic. In fact, it's a fine album that may lack somewhat the musical vehemence of earlier works, but largely checks as well the Kantner-Slick compulsion toward adrenaline filibusters.

As usual, the actual music is delivered wrapped in some of the most dunder-headed drool that ever served as a hip flack-pak. But once you've hacked your way through the thickets of excelsior, the music stands out both from most recent releases and the Airplane's previous work. A cartoon trailer named "War Movie" is Kantner's only real indulgence in the celebrated wheeze against the Big E, although similar themes appear in terms more mature and both musically and lyrically restrained in the quietly powerful "When the Earth Moves Again," and Grace wanks away at her own Righteous Indignariff with "Law Man," wherein a hapless flatfoot has barged in just moments after Grace and Paul or whoever have finished balling and finds this hippie broad Wagnerianly bawling those classically intimidating lines: "My old man's gun has never been fired but there's a first time!" Say one for me, Grace!

The rest of the music mostly finds some graceful detour around such heavyhandedness, although "Pretty As You Feel," by Joey Covington, Casady and Kaukonen, is a banal bit right out of 16 magazine enjoining their own and ladies everywhere against polluting their pores with plastic goo. Some will call it sexist; I just call it mawkish, which is all right because so is much of the best pop music from grooves immemorial, and besides the purely musical part of it is just about as lovely as "Feel So Good" with its lyrics of perfect simplicity and fine falsetto breaks at the ends of the lines.

This may be the most consciously un-stentorian Airplane album since Surrealistic Pillow, and even at its most fatuous this new-found and distinctly relative humility gives us "Thunk," a near-acapella Covington opus that's so absurd I can't resist it: it represents the Airplane's special brand of humor epitomized by "Juff Gleento" and the peanut butter and jelly sandwich in Volunteers in the best possible way. Though not nearly so well as Grace's "Never Argue With a German If You're Tired or European Song," an essay in something below Pig German ("Sticken in mine haken ... fugen mine gas mit mine auss pucken") set to abstracted choral lappings, which gasses the prurient gonads a lot better than that Ogden Nash trash about "Woman with a greasy heart Automatic man" and just cries out for a Grammy.

If you ask me, Bark is the 'Plane's most magnuminious opus since After Bathing at Baxter's, and even if its woof and whissshh ain't quite as supersonic as some of their other platters, it'll getcha there on time just like an amyl nitrate TV Dinner garnished this time with a little Valium. And the zingy rush that Jorma's and Jack's reps rest on streams as strongly as ever just a bit below the surface of the music with a motion seconded in places by the always judicious application of Papa John's sweet gypsy-blue fiddle.

Those three are the band's nexus of strength, and it should stand to reason that they would be at least as invigorated on their own, but as we all know, it's reason's right to get falling-down drunk every so-so, so heed the words of a non-paying auditor when I tell you to steer clear of the new Hot Tuna set. It may not be as presumptuously vitiated in its cabaret blues as the first one, but unless you're just crying for some muzak so mellow it's fucking work to hear it, First Pull Up. Then Pull Down ranks as prototype Dentist's Waiting Room fare, or maybe, in line with the title, the Executive Washroom at a Consciousness III Corporate Enterprise. Stick with the original accept no substitute.

Earth, Wind and Fire is a R&B tentet from Chicago with several vocalists, horn players that are polished but not too much, and a heavy Sly influence. Which is no denigration, because Sly's riffs are showing up (in sometimes peculiar contexts) in a large percentage of the albums appearing today, from Redbone to your latest funky-bucolic rock band. Sly pacesetters like "Thank You" are written all over such songs as "C'Mon Children" and "Moment of Truth." Which is not to say that they're not good listening. What they lack, though, is Sly's sense of derision and irony. The lyrics, unwisely printed inside, are as preachy and lovepeace cloying as anything Motown has done recently.

The Fifth Dimension also show up, in the smooth harmonies and intermittent lack of tension, and, to a much lesser degree, the voices of East Harlem, in certain loose whoops that well up from the distance of primal chaos to intrude on these facile surfaces. Leader Reese White is thoroughly a pro, with background citations a yard long, and maybe that's why the hand he keeps on the reins is a bit heavy. Earth, Wind and Fire may become vastly popular, though they will have to show more originality than is evidenced here if they do, but I'd like to hear more of the burning sax solo cut so short in the last part of "Fan the Fire," or the great marimba work which gurgles and flashes like Caribbean foam through the beginning and end of "Bad Tune." The joy there deserves dilation.

Mandrill, another new R&B based group, have a lot more sass and youthfulness, and their music makes it from juke jive to jazz riffs right out of some of the great albums Herbie Mann made in the early Sixties. This is party music, and comes more out of Chicago and especially Santana than Sly. Unfortunately, it also derives somewhat from the Chambers Brothers, so a suite called "Peace and Love" gobbles the second side, and while it has real musical interest where its Chambers antecedent had none, it still suffers by the pompous lyrics and general sense of pretension and ersatz gimmickry. But it works well enough that you don't really mind, and some rippling flute streams early on and the humor and highball bop of the rest more than compensate. Besides, the cover bears the proud face of one of old Willie B.'s very own purple-assed baboons, suitable for framing. What more could we ask?

Captain Beefheart still plays to a relatively minor following, but most of them believe, as I do, that he's one of the four or five unqualified geniuses to rise from the hothouses of American music in the Sixties, an innovator whose instinctive idiomatic syntheses and wildly original approach to composition and improvisation preview an era of profound changes in popular music. Statements like that would be extreme anywhere else, but only Cap has managed to fuse the loose ends of rock, jazz and blues so effortlessly.

 

Because of all that, most people who will buy one of his albums at all would come close to buying absolutely anything he took a notion to put out, no matter how bad the critics or grapevine said it was. Now, with Decals just beginning to wear off, Mirror Man comes along and surprises us all. Recorded live in Los Angeles in 1965, it's strictly a fan's album, but those fans will find it an invaluable link in comprehending the man's stylistic evolution, fitting neatly between Safe As Milk and the great AM "Bootleg Album" which went out to the press and others too busy to listen to it. bore "Diddy Wah Diddy" and three other very early singles, and should have been marketed.

Mirror Man is all of six years old, but sounds less dated than most other records, especially live sets, from its period. Amazingly enough, the personnel listed here is substantially the same as that of Cap's current group. Only Alex St. Claire Snouffer has wandered from the fold (you've gotta watch that "Antennae Jimmy Simmons" character, because he's given to fabricating new noms du disque with each album). At the time of this recording they were playing music with all the potential for the kind of free-flying excursions they're into now, but just hadn't broken through yet. Thoroughly blues-based, the four songs on this album sound much like the playing on Strictly Personal (released in 1968) stretched to extremes of prolixity usually unsuitable for records. "Tarotplane" runs 19 minutes, the title track 15, and the other two are longer than most groups can sustain interest on record even under the most carefully-planned studio conditions. None of them really build in intensity or end up anyplace other than where they started, and would most likely prove intolerable to anyone already a bit put off by Beefheart's work.

All that said, there are certain other factors favorable enough to justify the album's release and the real enthusiasm with which some folks will greet it. One is that, no matter how excessive the time signatures, Captain Beefheart in this "formative stage" was still more instrumentally adventurous and verbally inspired ("Automatic Sam told Eveready Betty told Prestone Millie with the long black wavy mane...") than most band-leaders of today. Sounding like a slice of unusually authentic Delta blues run through a clattering steeplechase of staggered rhythms and wildly idiosyncratic vocals, this must have been mighty heady stuff in '65, and I imagine the audiences were absolutely dumb-founded. Although it may sound better now than it did then, because psychedelia generally seems to improve with age as it takes on a somewhat quaint charm we couldn't see in its heyday. The extreme length of the songs diminishes that charm a bit here, but the album is still worth getting if you like period pieces or vintage psychedelia or any kind of long blues jam. If all those millions settled for Cream throttling "Spoonful" for 16 minutes, their attention spans shouldn't have any trouble with this, which is not only better blues jamming but actually has more variety. On the other hand, anybody once galvanized with the Beefheart vision, who did handstands to Trout Mask and whooped at the rafters when Decals finally arrived, probably won't even notice the timings till the side's over.

Anyone performing avant-garde music is laying themselves open to a certain amount of hostility and derision at the outset. And if that person also happens to be Yoko Ono, who has not only displayed a gift for hyping herself with cloying "happenings" but also led poor John astray and been credited by more than one Insider with "breaking up the Beatles," why, the barbs and jeers can only be expected to increase proportionately. Not only do most people have no taste for the kind of far-out warbling Yoko specializes in; they probably wouldn't give her the time of day if she looked like Paula Prentiss and sang like Aretha.

On the other hand, not much of her recorded product inspires any sympathy. What it mostly inspires is irritation, even in hardened fans of free music and electronic noise. Two Virgins, Unfinished Music No. One, and the distinctly uncatchy Peace jingles on Wedding Album were the ego-trips of two rich waifs adrift in the musical revolutions of the Sixties, as if Saul Bellow had suddenly discovered the cut-ups of William Burroughs and recruited Lenore Kandel to help him forge them in the void.

Dilettante garbage, simply. The electronic/collage stuff, like the radio bit and the silent grooves, was a John Cage takeoff equaled by precocious teenagers with tape recorders everywhere, and the screaming had been explored much more effectively by Abbey Lincoln in Max Roach's 1960 We Insist: Freedom Now Suite (ditto Yoko's pre-/ post-coital sighs) and Patty Waters in a weird 1965 ESP-Disk recording (a classic rendition of "Black Is the Color of My True Love's Hair" which found her shrieking the word "black" through every possible disten-tion for 15 minutes).

It wasn't until the long freak-out on the back of the live Toronto LP that Yoko began to show' some signs that she was learning to control and direct her vocal spasms, and John finally evidenced a nascent understanding of the Velvet Underground-type feedback discipline that would best underscore her histrionics. That record began to be listen-able, even exciting, and the version of "Don't Worry Kyoko" on the back of the "Cold Turkey" single was even better.

Now Yoko finally has an album all her own out, and it bodes well for future experiments by the Murk Twins along these lines. For one thing, Yoko has excellent backup this time: one track features an Ornette Coleman quartet, and the rest find John, Ringo and bassist Klaus Voormann working out accompaniments that are by turns as frenzied as Yoko herself and quite restrained. It always sounds thought-out, carefully arranged, appropriate; and with Yoko's music that's saying something.

Another strong plus is that all the songs are kept relatively short, make distinct statements, and seldom degenerate into the kind of pointless, prolix yammering Continued from preceding page that characterized her earlier work. In a way, the track with Coleman is the weakest: Yoko is into her "Ohh, John!" riff, and Ornette's band is laying down the kind of a rhythmic noodling that seldom finds them at their peaks. It was a rehearsal tape anyway; what would be really nice would be to hear Yoko with new madmen the likes of Gato Barbieri and Mike Mantler.

The other tracks, however, are something else again. John's guitar is strong and sizzling, a crazed file cutting through with some of the most eloquent distortions heard in a long time. He's really learning this language now, and his singing high notes and gut-teral rhythms speak with the same authoritative voice he showed with the Beatles. And when he suddenly shifts down from those flurries into an expertly abstracted guitar line straight out of Chuck Berry (as in "Why"), it just takes your breath away.

There are also two experiments in electronics here: Side One closes with a haunting juxtaposition of "Tomorrow Never Knows" guitar and vocal sounding like one of the modal choirs off the Music of Bulgaria album electronically distorted; and "Paper Shoes" opens with tides of noise and railroad clacks, then moves into a sequence where Yoko's voice, cut up by machine and melted into itself, flashes in wierd echoes around the trestles.

This one will grow on you. They haven't ironed out all the awkwardness yet, but this is the first J&Y album that doesn't insult the intelligence in fact, in its dark confounding way, it's nearly as beautiful as John's album. Give it a try, and at least a handful of listenings before your verdict. There's something happening here.

Anyone performing avant-garde music is laying themselves open to a certain amount of hostility and derision at the outset. And if that person also happens to be Yoko Ono, who has not only displayed a gift for hyping herself with cloying "happenings" but also led poor John astray and been credited by more than one Insider with "breaking up the Beatles," why, the barbs and jeers can only be expected to increase proportionately. Not only do most people have no taste for the kind of far-out warbling Yoko specializes in; they probably wouldn't give her the time of day if she looked like Paula Prentiss and sang like Aretha.

On the other hand, not much of her recorded product inspires any sympathy. What it mostly inspires is irritation, even in hardened fans of free music and electronic noise. Two Virgins, Unfinished Music No. One, and the distinctly uncatchy Peace jingles on Wedding Album were the ego-trips of two rich waifs adrift in the musical revolutions of the Sixties, as if Saul Bellow had suddenly discovered the cut-ups of William Burroughs and recruited Lenore Kandel to help him forge them in the void.

Dilettante garbage, simply. The electronic/collage stuff, like the radio bit and the silent grooves, was a John Cage takeoff equaled by precocious teenagers with tape recorders everywhere, and the screaming had been explored much more effectively by Abbey Lincoln in Max Roach's 1960 We Insist: Freedom Now Suite (ditto Yoko's pre-/post-coital sighs) and Patty Waters in a weird 1965 ESP-Disk recording (a classic rendition of "Black Is the Color of My True Love's Hair" which found her shrieking the word "black" through every possible distention for 15 minutes).

It wasn't until the long freak-out on the back of the live Toronto LP that Yoko began to show some signs that she was learning to control and direct her vocal spasms, and John finally evidenced a nascent understanding of the Velvet Underground-type feedback discipline that would best underscore her histrionics. That record began to be listenable, even exciting, and the version of "Don't Worry Kyoko" on the back of the "Cold Turkey" single was even better.

Now Yoko finally has an album all her own out, and it bodes well for future experiments by the Murk Twins along these lines. For one thing, Yoko has excellent backup this time: one track features an Ornette Coleman quartet, and the rest find John, Ringo and bassist Klaus Voormann working out accompaniments that are by turns as frenzied as Yoko herself and quite restrained. It always sounds thought-out, carefully arranged, appropriate; and with Yoko's music that's saying something.

Another strong plus is that all the songs are kept relatively short, make distinct statements, and seldom degenerate into the kind of pointless, prolix yammering that characterized her earlier work. In a way, the track with Coleman is the weakest: Yoko is into her "Ohh, John!" riff, and Ornette's band is laying down the kind of a rhythmic noodling that seldom finds them at their peaks. It was a rehearsal tape anyway; what would be really nice would be to hear Yoko with new madmen the likes of Gato Barbieri and Mike Mantler.

The other tracks, however, are something else again. John's guitar is strong and sizzling, a crazed file cutting through with some of the most eloquent distortions heard in a long time. He's really learning this language now, and his singing high notes and guttural rhythms speak with the same authoritative voice he showed with the Beatles. And when he suddenly shifts down from those flurries into an expertly abstracted guitar line straight out of Chuck Berry (as in "Why"), it just takes your breath away.

There are also two experiments in electronics here: Side One closes with a haunting juxtaposition of "Tomorrow Never Knows" guitar and vocal sounding like one of the modal choirs off the Music of Bulgaria album electronically distorted; and "Paper Shoes" opens with tides of noise and railroad clacks, then moves into a sequence where Yoko's voice, cut up by machine and melted into itself, flashes in weird echoes around the trestles.

This one will grow on you. They haven't ironed out all the awkwardness yet, but this is the first J&Y album that doesn't insult the intelligence—in fact, in its dark confounding way, it's nearly as beautiful as John's album. Give it a try, and at least a handful of listenings before your verdict. There's something happening here.

Frank Zappa is a genius. Right. Frank Zappa probably knows more about music than you and I and 3/4 of the other professional musicians in this country put together. Right. Frank Zappa has made an incredible contribution towards broadening the scope of the average American kid's listening habits. Absolutely. Frank Zappa has certain possibly dangerous Machiavellian, manipulative tendencies. Yeah, probably so, but so what? Frank Zappa is a snob who underestimates his audience. Hmmm. Think so, huh?

After giving all credit where credit is due, we have to start asking some other questions. When Zappa dissolved the Mothers, he explained that they were going to "wait for the audience to catch up" with them. Whatever that meant at the time, it takes on increasing irony as the passing months bring new Zappa and old Mothers. Uncle Meat was a good album, but not nearly as involving as the three that preceded it. I seriously doubt if very many members of the Mothers' audience had trouble with bits like "God Bless America at the Whiskey" and "Louie Louie at Albert Hall." And the jazz on there, "King Kong" and others, was good

about as significant a movement from Coltrane's shadow as the work of, say, Charles Lloyd. As for the more "serious" material, I suppose you could say that it adds to the 20th Century Classical tradition without borrowing too obviously from any one source, but without being worked into structures more pointedly vernacular it loses its force

interesting, but hardly compelling as both Edgar Varese and Little Richard are compelling.

Most of the albums released since then have been insubstantial, even allowing for the fact that something like Burnt Weenee Sandwich is something of a Mother's sampler. Hot Rats was brilliant, filled with fine, strong solos most of which could easily stand beside the current work of some of the best jazzmen in America, even if Zappa's guitar solos were carrying too few ideas through too many minutes, just as they had in "Invocation of the Young Pumpkin."

Burnt Weenee Sandwich sounded to me like a collection of Hot Rats rejects and warmups, groping, relatively simple and obvious improvisations which never really got off the ground. And Weasels Ripped My Flesh didn't stand up very well, either

a couple of good songs, some lukewarm jazz (what a chance was blown when "Eric Dolphy Memorial Barbecue" failed to communicate any of that great musician's ideas to people who were in grade school when he died!), and some pointless, pretentious electronic noise. Lots of people gave these albums good reviews, and lots of others bought and listened to them solemnly, I suspect in a dutiful spirit akin to: "Well, now Uncle Frank's gonna sit us down again and teach us something else about that great wide world of music we don't know anything about because we've been fucking off listening to rock 'n' roll all these years."

The fact is, though, that a lot of people are picking up on some very challenging music these days, the likes of Pharoah Sanders and Miles Davis and Roland Kirk, and they are turning from those listening experiences to things like Burnt Weenee Sandwich and coming away with a yawn. The public may not be quite as ignorant or as debased in its tastes as Zappa possibly thinks, and I suspect a lot of them are going to be even more let down by Chunga's Revenge than they were by the last two albums. It doesn't have the long boring solos, but the grab-bag Weasels feeling remains.

Briefly, "Transylvania Boogie" is a melodramatic Spanish/Oriental guitar solo that sounds like a studio man trying to combine the kind of scales and tonal colorings Gabor Szabo was into a few years ago with John McLaughlin - type approach. It doesn't work.

The other instrumentals are pretty standard Zappa fare, except for the pleasant, moody "Twenty Small Cigars" and some excellent guitar choruses that break up the boring drum solos in "The Nancy & Mary Music." Most of the vocals are pale reflections of lodes Zappa's mined too often: greaser rock ("Would You Go All the Way," "Sharleena"), the Absolutely Free look-at-all-those-drunk-businessmen - aren't - they - repulsive riff ("Rudy Wants To Buy Yez a Drink"), and why he would even consider recording something like "Road Ladies" (a groupie song set to The World's Oldest Blues Riff: "Don'cha know it gets lonesome

When yer way out there on the road/etc") is beyond me. It would certainly never have made any of the Mothers' first albums.

Zappa can go on putting out dull records like these indefinitely and always find somebody who'll buy them, out of respect for his name if nothing else. And it is a name worthy of much respect. The original Mothers of Invention were a significant force in the music of our time. But these diddlings are not only insignificant, not only do they suggest that one genius is not at present working towards anything in particular, but they also smack of a rather cynical condescending attitude towards a public that may be getting ready to pass Zappa by.

After spending his childhood making up instrumentals on the piano, the mysterious A2 got his hands on the bedroom music software FruityLoops aged 13. “I always had a real love for music, from car rides with my mum and sister, listening to soul, R’n’B, reggae and jungle,” he says. As a teenager he went on to discover rap and grime but most of all developed a love of slow jams, which has filtered through into his own sultry sound. “I never had one bit of training,” he says. “But my mum always told me to find a trade, so I made music outside of my studies.” He went on to balance his music with a part-time job, but started fully focusing on making tracks at 21. “I was scared of not having something to enjoy in life,” he says. “The one thing I had hunger and passion for was music, so why not go for it and focus on it 100 per cent?”

Bat For Lashes has shared the video for her new single 'In God's House'.

Natasha Khan previously unveiled the song 'I Do' and confirmed details of her new album release, 'The Bride'.

'The Bride' follows 2012 album 'The Haunted Man' and her recent Sexwitch collaboration with Toy. It will be released on July 1.

Watch the video for 'In God's House' below. The dramatic clip sees Khan in anguish next to a neon-lit hearse. 



'The Bride' was written to coincide with I Do, a short film written and directed by Khan that will premiere at New York's Tribeca Film Festival in April.

A press release states that the album "follows the story of a woman whose fiancé has been killed in a crash on the way to the church for their wedding. The Bride flees the scene to take the honeymoon trip alone, resulting in a dark meditation on love, loss, grief, and celebration".

Like many a nascent YouTube star, Alessia Cara had no idea her hobby could change her life. She began singing into a webcam aged 13, though it was another four years before the music industry came a-knocking when she uploaded her cover of The Neighbourhood’s ‘Sweater Weather’ (its dream-pop morphed into a crisp, latin-influenced acoustic number).

Judging by ‘Four Pink Walls’, one of the most distinctive tracks from her debut album ‘Know-It-All’, the 19-year-old is still coming to terms with pop-star status. Driven by brittle trip-hop percussion, the song pays tribute to her childhood home in Ontario, near Toronto, while she admits to feeling overwhelmed by burgeoning fame: “Waking up in a different bedroom every day/Living up in the clouds, thinking of how it all changed… Amazed by the limelight”.

For all this uncertainty, the record is incredibly assured, with deft touches such as the sound of a DJ scratching that interrupts the otherwise languid ‘Four Pink Walls’ echoing the conflict in Cara’s life. Lead single ‘Here’ expertly exploits a string sample from Portishead’s ‘Glory Box’, its swooning refrain as disorienting as the scene she describes in the lyrics, which find her lost and alone at a party gone bad: “I ask myself – what am I doing here?”. Highlight ‘I’m Yours’ is a stone-cold pop banger that offers an incisive take on the fear of handing yourself over to love and its inherent perils.

Some tracks can feel overladen with production – take the escalating bleeps that crowd ‘Seventeen’, on which she grapples with approaching adulthood. Yet a song as confident as ‘Outlaws’, with its ‘Back To Black’- inspired drumbeat (Cara’s a big fan of Amy Winehouse) and doo-wop vocals, suggests she has this pop-star thing under control.

The title of Primal Scream’s 11th album might sound like something band leader Bobby Gillespie dreamt up while under the influence, but ‘Chaosmosis’ is actually a highfalutin reference to French psychotherapist Félix Guattari. His 1992 book of the same name argues human subjectivity is shaped by phenomena outside the “faculties of the soul”, specifically language, mass media and technology. Applying that idea to these songs is an almighty stretch, but more pertinent is Gillespie’s own definition of the word as wisdom gleaned from madness – and ‘madness’ is surely how the Primal Scream of yore would’ve dismissed the notion of making a record about sobriety and recovery.

Back in 2013, as the band’s late-career renaissance was getting underway with ‘More Light’, a newly abstinent Gillespie confessed that drink and drugs had “put my life in chaos” and the music had suffered for it. ‘More Light’ turned out to be the Scream’s best, most intrepid work since 2000’s ‘XTRMNTR’, but while ‘Chaosmosis’ is a worthy successor, it’s a very different beast. Where the former opened with the nine-minute jazz-rock apoplexy of ‘2013’, the latter does so on the melon-twisting exuberance of ‘Trippin’ On Your Love’, which borrows the piano riff from Happy Mondays’ ‘Step On’ and features Haim as a kind of six-legged Rowetta surrogate. Not for the first time, you’ll want some of what Bobby’s having.

Then again, maybe not. Instead of projecting its ire outwards, ‘Chaosmosis’ frequently gazes inwards. ‘Where The Light Gets In’, a pulsing electropop duet with Sky Ferreira, might declare that “peace begins within” but it’s also a place where uncomfortable truths present themselves, as they do on the self-excoriating ‘(Feeling Like A) Demon Again’ or ‘Carnival Of Fools’. It’s strange to hear Gillespie’s famously acidic tongue turned upon itself on ‘Private Wars’ (“Thorns grow in your heart/ Poisoned from the start/ Angry still at everyone/ Time to let it go”), while a breathy backing vocal from Rachel Zeffira (best known for Cat’s Eyes, her project with Horrors frontman Faris Badwan) needles away like the better angel of his nature. Over the course of a 35-year career defined by excess, reinvention and the occasional brush with genius, Primal Scream have made all sorts of albums, but not one quite like this.

PJ Harvey has unveiled her new video for 'The Community Of Hope'.

Harvey recently returned with the song, which is lifted from her new studio album, 'The Hope Six Demolition Project'. That album is the follow up to 2011's 'Let England Shake' and will be released on April 15. 

The clip was shot around Washington, DC, the area which inspired the song. 

DC politicians recently criticised Harvey for the song's lyrics. Former mayor Vince Gray said: "I will not dignify this inane composition with a response", while his campaign treasurer added: "PJ Harvey is to music what Piers Morgan is to cable news."

On Sunday night (March 20), Kano will play at the BL-NK venue on a line-up that includes Elijah & Skilliam and Seani B. Earlier this month the grime icon released ‘Made In The Manor’, a brutally honest album about the east London MC’s journey so far. He’ll perform tracks from the record, show a documentary about its making and speak on a panel.

What’s the ‘Made In The Manor’ message?
“It’s just my story. It’s me telling my truth. It covers the last 10 years, from my start in music and even further back from that, from when I was a kid. My upbringing and my family. All my experiences growing up have worked their way into this album.”

Did you worry about giving too much of yourself away?
“I think that’s an artist’s job. Everyone feels comfortable at different stages of their life to open up, and mine is just now. It’s a living, breathing thing, this album. I’ve had people call me since the album was released saying ‘I didn’t know you felt that way’ and we’ve started speaking again.”

Wiley, Giggs, Jme and Damon Albarn appear on the album. How do you choose who you work with?
“Firstly I need to be a fan of them. I looked up to Wiley when I was young. I’m a good friend of Giggs and I’ve got a close relationship with Damon – I respect him as a musician. It’s also about who I could create something good with. Collaboration makes things exciting.” 



Explain the ‘Made In The Manor’ documentary to us.
“I wanted to put some visuals to the story. I mention 69 Manor Road [his childhood home] on the album, and I wanted people to see what this place that means so much to me looks like. It helps bring people closer to the story.”

As a first-wave grime artist, how do you feel about MCs like Stormzy and Novelist coming up?
“I feel good – I feel like I’ve played a part in creating what grime is today. I feel like we’ve got a strong identity; we’re in a good place. This is the first generation that’s grown up to our music and it’s inspiring – I’ve inspired them and they’ve inspired me back. There was a time when everyone wanted to be somebody else and looked to America but these kids growing up now look up to Wiley and Dizzee and it’s amazing.”

NME columnist, Katherine Ryan's got something to say. This week - why her over-analysis of song lyrics ruins her enjoyment of music.

"If you had a twin, I would still choose you.” Thanks, Drake. It’s definitely worthy of highlighting through your guest spot on Rihanna’s ‘Work’ that you’re not prepared to leave me for the brother or sister with whom I shared a womb. Good job you won’t be destroying my family today. Our hypothetical mother didn’t raise us to be the kind of siblings that fight over a man! Though twins, we have very different tastes and she made a point of never dressing us alike. What makes you think we’d both be after you in the first place? I imagine that in the unlikely event the two of us shared romantic feelings for the same person, we’d agree to mutually abandon that pursuit. HOW DARE YOU sing these words to Rihanna, sullying her Jobcentre anthem.



This is why I can’t enjoy music properly. I get caught up in the real-life application of the words. I ended a three-year relationship over a country song once. I don’t want to blame the whole thing on cowboy crooner Brad Paisley, but let’s just say his good intentions put a true fan out on the street. We were driving around my small hometown in my then-boyfriend’s Chrysler PT Cruiser (reason enough for dismissal, by the way). He was smoking with the windows up, nearly two decades after that shit was acceptable. Paisley’s ‘The World’ came on the radio and he lovingly sang along to me: 

To the teller down at the bank
You’re just another checking account
To the plumber that came today
You’re just another house
At the airport ticket counter
You’re just another fare
At the beauty shop at the mall
Well you’re just another head of hair

This dude was gazing at me so sincerely while he sang it I had to interrupt him to keep his eyes on the road. “This is my song for you,” Mr Small Town proudly announced as we cruised over a possum. Excuse me? The bank teller knows me well. My dad’s best friend is our plumber. I don’t fly much, but a lady called Sue cuts my hair and I’m sure she enjoys my visits. This song is just a series of needless slams. Boy, country music had taken a dark turn. Why was he singing that nobody liked me? He continued:

To the world
You may be just another girl
But to me
Baby, you are the world

Ohhh, so I’m supposed to be grateful that even though I’m utterly insignificant in the eyes of everyone who meets me, there’s a boy in a straw hat who fancies me a whole bunch. I tried to explain how hurtful the song was and he rolled his eyes, saying: “Katherine, there’s something seriously wrong with you if you see this writing as anything other than a declaration of love.” (It did reach the top of the Billboard Hot Country Songs chart.) That boy is married now with four kids and a wife who’s invited me to play Candy Crush Saga 80 trillion times. If he had a twin, I would still choose me.

George Hull, the co-founder of annual dance bash Bloc Festival, has blamed "uptight" and "spineless" hipsters for his decision to quit promoting raves.

The final Bloc Festival, which Hull founded with Alex Benson in 2007, took place at Butlin's in Minehead earlier this month (March) with sets from Thom Yorke, Four Tet and Holly Herndon, among others.

"After more than ten years, though, we've regretfully decided to close down," Hull has now written in an article for the The Spectator. "And here's why: young people these days just don't know how to rave. They are too safe and boring."

Lamenting the fact that the more hardcore ravers of the 1980s and 1990s have now become middle-aged, Hull wrote: "Instead we have hipsters — a subculture so spineless that it had to borrow its name from its parents. Hipsters are an uptight bunch. They like dance music, but they lack the sense of abandon that made raving so much fun."

"Hipsters drink less and look after themselves," Hull added later in the article. "While I'm thankful that their puritanical leanings reduce what we call 'welfare provision', I cannot help but think they're missing the point."

Hull then concluded his article by writing: "Under the hipsters' watch, dance music has become tedious and diluted. A monstrous cabal of overpaid circuit DJs titillating a precious and unimaginative bunch of wimpy pseudo-hedonists at a carefully designed 'safe space'. In broad daylight. If that's your idea of raving, you can keep it. I'm out."

From Thursday March 17 to Tuesday March 22, adidas Originals is taking over the BL-NK venue on Curtain road in east London and creating futurehouse: six days of music, film, talks and workshops with Wretch 32 & Avelino, Blossoms, Kano and more. Tickets are available from myfuture.is. Prepare to be inspired.

Tomorrow night (Mar 18), Blossoms will play at the BL-NK venue on a line-up that includes Crows, Bradley Zero and Phil Taggart. The Stockport band – and creators of giant tunes ‘Charlemagne’ and ‘Cut Me And I’ll Bleed’ – have just finished their biggest ever tour. Frontman Tom Ogden recounts five lessons learned on the road.

1: Always better yourself
“Our last tour was the best yet. There were people jumping up and down everywhere. If you’re appealing to a mass audience like we want to, you get young kids jumping around as well as musos who come because they’re hearing something they loved before. There were 350 people watching us in Aberdeen, which is kind of mad. We are a force, but you can always better yourself.”

2: Friendships are unbreakable
“It feels like we’re at home wherever we are. We’re best mates and that feeds into the performances. We’re five happy lads. Me and Joe [Donovan, drums] have been friends for 12 years. We had a season ticket together at Manchester City – we watched them win the league and ran on the pitch and then suddenly we’re in Tokyo gigging.”

3: Emulate your heroes
“When we started, Catfish And The Bottlemen’s tours seemed to be rammed and we wanted to do as much as them. They slept in the van and all that, and we felt like we were coming from a similar place. We’re not dead fancy – we have a Pizza Express and listen to Luther Vandross and Drake’s ‘Hotline Bling’ before we go on.”



4: Rough it out
“You’ve got to do the tours where you sleep in the van. You have to rough it out, play to two people, drive all night to get home – it keeps you grounded. One time Joe nearly cried when we got back, the drive was that intense. You think: ‘What have we signed up for?’”

5: Gig non-stop
“We came from a scaffolding yard in Stockport. Now it really feels like we’re starting something. The more you play, the more confident you are. We’ve done 18 months on the road. When more people watch you it gives you that impetus to put on a good show – you feed off it.”

Whoever thought when that dirty little quickie Wild in the Streets came out that it would leave such an imprint on the culture? First the Doors (who were always headed in that direction anyway) grinding out that famous "They-got-the-guns-but-we-got-the-numbers" march for the troops out there in Teenland, and now this sweaty aggregation. Clearly this notion of violent, total youth revolution and takeover is an idea whose time has come — which speaks not well for the idea but ill for the time.

About a month ago the MC-5 received a cover article in Rolling Stone proclaiming them the New Sensation, a group to break all barriers, kick out all jams, "total energy thing," etc. etc. etc. Never mind that they came on like a bunch of 16 year old punks on a meth power trip — these boys, so the line ran, could play their guitars like John Coltrane and Pharaoh Sanders played sax!

Well, the album is out now and we can all judge for ourselves. For my money they come on more like Blue Cheer than Trane and Sanders, but then my money has already gone for a copy of this ridiculous, overbearing, pretentious album; and maybe that's the idea, isn't it?

The set, recorded live, starts out with an introduction by John Sinclair, "Minister of Information" for the "White Panthers," if you can dig that. The speech itself stands midway between Wild in the Streets and Arthur Brown. The song that follows it is anticlimactic. Musically the group is intentionally crude and aggressively raw. Which can make for powerful music except when it is used to conceal a paucity of ideas, as it is here. Most of the songs are barely distinguishable from each other in their primitive two-chord structures. You've heard all this before from such notables as the Seeds, Blue Cheer, Question Mark and the Mysterians, and the Kingsmen. The difference here, the difference which will sell several hundred thousand copies of this album, is in the hype, the thick overlay of teenage-revolution and total-energy-thing which conceals these scrapyard vistas of cliches and ugly noise.

"Kick Out the Jams" sounds like Barret Strong's "Money" as recorded by the Kingsmen. The lead on "Come Together" is stolen note-for-note from the Who's "I Can See for Miles." "I Want You Right Now" sounds exactly (down to the lyrics) like a song called "I Want You" by the Troggs, a British group who came on with a similar sex-and-raw-sound image a couple of years ago (remember "Wild Thing"?) and promptly disappeared into oblivion, where I imagine they are laughing at the MC-5.

Mediocrity doesn't tutor greatness often — when it is influential at all, its progeny usually achieve even ranker nadirs. But in rock, one of whose founding principles is that glorious mistakes can open out into amazing new styles, anything can happen. Thus the Cream phenomenon, which is far from dead even now. Although they were essentially an egotistical group of lazy artisans who ified their considerable talents by swallowing their own hype, raking in fistfulls of cash and flying by the unflattering light of day, they left a whole raft of studious imitators who are setting sail, visions of superstardom dancing in their heads, to this day.

Gun and Black Sabbath are two recent additions to the troops, both from England, and they well typify the paradoxes and possibilities inherent in serving time in such a school. This is Gun's second album, a distinct improvement over the first, but it still suffers by the familiarity of its derivation. The leads are always powerful, often overdubbed to escape the limitations of the trio format, sounding at times as if lead guitarist Adrian Curtis has taken several Clapton riffs and set them whirling around each other — compelling, but not quite new.

It's no accident that the best tracks are at least partially acoustic. "Oh, Lady You," for instance, is a tender ballad of extreme simplicity, rather like the Beatles' "Long Long Long." In another refreshing touch, the song is bounded by two short uptempo flamenco bridges that are just sanguinely appropriate.

But the real standout here is "Angeline," a sorrowful ballad with strings and some beautifully melancholy piano work that sounds like the cat had been listening hard to old masters like "Las Vegas Tango" on the great long-lost Individualism of Gil Evans album. The lyrics are especially poignant, handling the touchy subject of a "straight" individual combing the underground in an anguished search for the girl he loves: "Look at you/What a state you're in/What you been doing? / Where's that place you've been?" Not until the end of the song do you realize that the man is not a lover but the father of the girl he's seeking, pleading to another young runaway as if she were his own daughter. The theme could easily be used for a snide put-down of the old folks, but the maturity of the handling here reveals Gun to have musical invention and lyrical insight only beginning to emerge.

Over across the tracks in the industrial side of Cream country lie unskilled laborers like Black Sabbath, which was hyped as a rockin' ritual celebration of the Satanic mass or some such claptrap, something like England's answer to Coven. Well, they're not that bad, but that's about all the credit you can give them. The whole album is a shuck — despite the murky songtitles and some inane lyrics that sound like Vanilla Fudge paying doggerel tribute to Aleister Crowley, the album has nothing to do with spiritualism, the occult, or anything much except stiff recitations of Cream clichés that sound like the musicians learned them out of a book, grinding on and on with dogged persistence. Vocals are sparse, most of the album being filled with plodding bass lines over which the lead guitar dribbles wooden Claptonisms from the master's tiredest Cream days. They even have discordant jams with bass and guitar reeling like velocitized speedfreaks all over each other's musical perimeters yet never quite finding synch — just like Cream! But worse.

As much as the recorded product, the rock and roll concert scene seems mighty unhealthy these days. I hardly ever go to see name bands anymore myself, because most of them are so incredibly boring. Standards of performance are very low, and those few artists with enough talent or interest to put on a credible show often end up turning in performances so professionally, predictably competent that you walk out with the palest satisfaction and few memories. In the past year I have watched Ten Years After stumble through a set equal parts plodding monotone and splintered noise, Crosby, Stills, Nash & Young invoke Woodstock to compensate for boring everyone to tears, and the Band and Creedence Clearwater recite their albums to such perfection that I fidgeted. I had to draw the line of most resistance when Led Zeppelin hit town last month for a 2-1/2 hour tour-de-force. But I asked a friend with more fortitude how it was, and he raved: "Oh, shit. I took eight reds and just sat there thinkin' the Zep was gonna play forever — man, I felt so good!"

Into this depressing scene ripped the Rolling Stones barnstorming their way across America last fall for a tour which left most audiences satisfied and well-nigh spent, but got reviews mixed and ultimately perplexed because few of us were sure what to expect or, once the hysteria of the actual performance had drained away, how to react. In 1965, caught up in a hurricane of bopper shrieks, we accepted the whole thing as sort of a supernatural visitation, a cataclysmic experience of Wagnerian power that transcended music. In 1969 they were expected to prove themselves as a stage act, but the force of their personalities and the tides of hype and our expectations cancelled all our cynical reservations the moment Mick strode out and drawled hello to each home town. There they were in the flesh, the Rolling Stones, ultimate personification of all our notions and fantasies and hopes for rock and roll, and we were enthralled, but the nagging question that remained was whether the show we had seen was really that brilliant, or if we had not been to some degree set up, pavlov'd by years of absence and rock scribes and 45 minute delays into a kind of injection delirium in which a show which was perfectly ordinary in terms of what the Stones might have been capable of would seem like some ultimate rock apocalypse. Sure, the Stones put on what was almost undoubtedly the best show of the year, but did that say more about their own involvement or about the almost uniform lameness of the competition? Some folks never did decide.

Liver Than You'll Ever Be, appearing last spring, provided a partial answer. It was a good album, as live rock albums go — "Carol" and "Midnight Rambler" especially shone. Some people were enthralled by it, but I found the musical interest of most of the songs mighty ephemeral, and in general preferred the clattering thunder of Got Live If You Want It, which in terms of looseness, energy and general right-on shagginess could make a fair bid for being the rock concert album of all time. There are more important things than playing on-beat and on-key, and that fine line between slam-bang exorcism and unedifying noise is what would seem to make a great live LP.

All of which is why Get Your Ya-Ya's Out is such an unfettered delight. This album, at last, proves the fears of those who cared to fear groundless. More than just the soundtrack for a Rolling Stones concert, it's a truly inspired session, as intimate an experience as sitting in while the Stones jam for sheer joy in the basement. It proves once and for all that this band does not merely play the audience, it plays music whose essential crudeness is so highly refined that it becomes a kind of absolute distillation of raunch, that element which seems to be seeping out of Seventies rock at a disturbing rate. Where most live efforts seem almost embarrassing in their posturings and excesses, and even The Who Live at Leeds held tinges of the Art Statement, Ya-Ya's at its best just rocks and socks you right out of your chair. You can not only love it for what it is, you can like it for what it isn't.

The set opens with a brief collage of MC introductions from all their tour stops, and then rolls right into a solid, methodical "Jumpin' Jack Flash." Neither it nor the next three songs on side one quite match the energy level reached in "Midnight Rambler" and sustained through all of side two, but subsequent playings reveal the live "Jack Flash" to have a certain fierce precision which the studio single lacked and which makes the latter sound almost plodding by comparison. Here the bottom is full and brooding and the group as a whole has a bite as sharp as a pair of wire cutters.

Next comes Mick, teasing the little chickies: "Uh oh, I think I bust a button on mah trous-ahs ... you do' want mah trousahs to fall down, now do ya?" I had a friend once who nearly provoked me to fisticuffs when he remarked that Mick's appeal was "perverted." Now, the thing that strikes me here is how essentially positive and even wholesome, in terms of what's in the wind in 1970, Mick's onstage stud-strut is. Jim Morrison makes like The Flasher and screams "Love your brother!," Iggy practically turns the mike into a dildo, but Mick just flaps his lips, grinds his hips and chortles: "This is me, honeys — yearn!"

"Carol" is fine but definitely weaker than the version of Liver, and for me "Strange Stray Cat" and "Love in Vain" provide the low points of the album, the former by a certain clutter and the latter by not being that inspiring a vehicle in the first place.

But all traces of disinterest or disappointment skedaddle with the first swaggering chords of "Midnight Rambler." Mick can hardly wait to get started, flinging out rippling harp riffs and muttering lyrics before the others even begin, and certainly this great song made to be done live, has never been rendered with more purging viciousness. Every riff in it is so pristinely simple, yet so directly and deliberately placed that its locomotive rushes and icy invective take on more power the closer you come to learning them by heart. Let It Bleed's version seemed sinuous, somehow cool and detached in its violence, like one of Norman Mailer's Fifties hipsters. Here the song's celebratory rage comes bursting with a juggernaut wallop, Mick wrenching inchoate nonverbal vocalisms from his throat in the stop-time middle section, the audience roaring back (one crazed cat hollering "God damn!" in between), and the final frosting some wiry, lunging new riffs from Keith that build magnifiicently to the crashing climax.

The second side opens with another great audience riff — an insistent chick yells "'Paint It Black,' you devils!" and the Stones answer with an airborne "Sympathy For the Devil" that beats the rather cut-and-dried rendition on Beggar's Banquet all hollow, and spotlights a ringing Richard solo that's undoubtedly one of his best on record.

From there on out the energy level of the proceedings seems to soar straight up. "Live With Me" is just great ribald jive, but "Little Queenie" as done here is alltime classic Stones. Just strutting along, leering and shuffling, the song has all the loose, lipsmacking glee its lyrics ever implied. This kind of gutty, almost offhand, seemingly effortless funk is where the Stones have traditionally left all competitors in the dust, and here they outdo themselves. I even think that this is one of those rare instances (most of the others are on their first album) where they cut Chuck Berry with one of his own songs.

"Honky Tonk Women" is just a joy, after Liver's half-realized run-through and Joe Cocker's hack job, gutbucket rock and roll flowing out fine and raucous as a river of beer, but "Street Fightin' Man" takes the show out on a level of stratospheric intensity that simply rises above the rest of the album and sums it all up. Keith's work here is a special delight, great surging riffs reminiscent of some of the best lines on the first Moby Grape album, or the golden lead in Stevie Wonder's "I Was Made to Love Her." I don't think there's a song on Ya-Ya's where the Stones didn't cut their original studio jobs, and this one leaps perhaps farthest ahead of all.

The Seventies may not have started with bright prospects for the future of rock, and so many hacks are reciting the litany of doom that it's beginning to annoy like an inane survey hit. The form may be in trouble, and we listeners may ourselves be in trouble, so jaded it gets harder each month to even hear what we're listening to. But the Rolling Stones are most assuredly not in trouble, and are looking like an even greater force in the years ahead than they have been. It's still too soon to tell, but I'm beginning to think Ya-Ya's just might be the best album they ever made. I have no doubt that it's the best rock concert ever put on record. The Stones, alone among their generation of groups, are not about to fall by the wayside. And as long as they continue to thrive this way, the era of true rock and roll music will remain alive and kicking with them.

Morrison Hotel opens with a powerful blast of raw funk called "Roadhouse Blues." It features jagged barrelhouse piano, fierce guitar, and one of the most convincing raunchy vocals Jim Morrison has ever recorded. This angry hard rock is that at which the Doors have always excelled, and given us so seldom, and this track is one of their very best ever, with brooding lyrics that ring chillingly, true: "I woke up this morning and I got myself a beer/The future's uncertain and the end is always near."

From there on out, though, the road runs mainly downhill. It's really a shame, too, because somehow one held high expectations for this album and wanted so badly to believe it would be good that one was afraid to listen to it when it was finally released. The music bogs down in the kind of love mush and mechanical, stereotyped rock arrangements that have marred so much of the Doors' past music. "Blue Sunday" and "Indian Summer" are two more insipidly "lyrical" pieces crooned in Morrison's most saccharine Hoagy Carmichael style. "Maggie M'Gill" is a monotonous progression in the vein of (but not nearly as interesting as) "Not to Touch the Earth," and "You Make Me Real" is a thyroid burst of manufactured energy worthy of a thousand mediocre groups.

Admittedly, these are the worst tracks, and the rest ranges from the merely listenable to the harsh brilliance of "Roadhouse Blues" or the buoyant catchiness of "Land Ho!", a chanty that sets you rocking and swaying on first listen and never fails to bring a smile every time it's repeated.

This could have been a fine album; but the unavoidable truth — and this seems to be an insurmountable problem for the Doors — is that so much of it is out of the same extremely worn cloth as the songs on all their other albums. It's impossible to judge it outside the context of the rest of their work. Robbie Kreiger's slithery guitar, and Manzarek's carnival-calliope organ work and whorehouse piano are the perfect complement to Morrison's rococo visions. But we've all been there before, not a few times, and their well of resources has proven a standing lake which is slowly drying up. Perhaps if they recombined into a different group the brilliant promise of the Doors' first album and sporadic songs since might begin to be fulfilled, but for now they can only be truly recommended to those with a personal interest.

This recording brings together a set of mostly little-known talents that whale the tar out of every other informal "jam" album released in rock and roll for the past two years. If Hot Rats is any indication of where Zappa is headed on his own, we are in for some fiendish rides indeed.

In the past both Zappa's high-flown "serious music" and his greasy Fifties routines grew heavy-handed, but this album suggests he may be off on a new and much more individual direction, inspired by Captain Beefheart, who is featured prominently on Hot Rats and whose Trout Mask Replica set him several frontiers beyond anything we've heard from Zappa. Beefheart is one of the true originals of our day, and his raffish dadaism is an excellent tonic for a Zappa too often pre-occupied with polemics — his influence shows clearly in much of this record, whether he's actually performing or not.

The new Zappa has dumped both his Frankensteinian classicism and his pachuko-rock. He's into the new jazz heavily; same as Beefheart. and applying all his technical savvy until the music sounds a far and purposely ragged cry from the self-indulgence of the current crop of young white John Coltranes. Ian Underwood's reed work in particular is far more advanced than anything he did with the Mothers.

The album's instrumental highlight comes on "The Gumbo Variations," spotlighting the wildest, most advanced piece of Free-form electric violin playing I've ever heard (who is "Sugar Cane Harris"?), a slithery performance that sings with the rusty purity that only the most corrosive music can muster.

Zappa himself has an extremely long guitar solo on "Willie the "Pimp," but as past numbers like "Invocation of the Young Pumpkin" have shown, he's really not a jazz improvisor, and his repetitious and surprisingly simple patterns get boring before he's half-way through. But those words! The wily Beefheart spirit strikes again: "I'm a little pimp with my hair gassed backÃƒÆ’Ã‚Â Man in a suit with a bow-tie neck/Wanna buy a grunt with a third-party check/Standin' on the porch of the Lido hotel/Floozies in the lobby love the way I sellÃƒÆ’Ã‚Â "

If you're eager for a first taste of Beefheart or interested in the new approaches to instrumental style and improvisational technique being developed these days, this is as good a place to start as any; a good stepping stone to folks like Ayler, Don Cherry and Cecil Taylor-the real titans these cats learned it from.

The Allman Brothers are a rather heavy white blues group out of Muscle Shoals. They look like the post-teen punk band rehearsing next door, and there is little in their music that we haven't heard before. And both they and their album are a gas.

For all the white blooze bands proliferating today, it's still inspiring when the real article comes along, a white group who've transcended their schooling to produce a volatile blues-rock sound of pure energy, inspiration and love. The Allmans have learned their lessons well, and they play with the same drive and conviction as their mentors. When I first put this album on the driving instrumental that opens it began the clean, ringing guitar riffs in "It's Not My Cross to Bear" made that battered 12-bar blues form seem fresh again. The Allmans know what they're doing, and feel it deeply as well, and they communicate immediately.

One of the virtues of a simple, standardized form like the blues is that when played right it's such a comfortable place to return to. The whole album is like that. You've been here a thousand times before, and it feels like home instead of mind-numbing banality because the Allmans have mastered the form with rare subtlety, and also because their blues keep you vibrating from one brilliant hardrock interpolation to the next.

That's why the album's pinnacle for me is "Dreams," a beautiful, aching lament in waltz-time. It begins with softly pulsing organ and throaty, movingly understated vocal all about a man whose world is crumbling because "I'm hung up/On Dreams." A familiar story, but the way it's written and delivered by the Allmans makes it poignantly realistic and universal.

It might seem strange to apply the adjective "lovely" to a heavy-white-blues album, but that is what this record so paradoxically is. Sometimes it sounds like what Led Zeppelin might have been if they weren't hung up on gymnastics. Sometimes it sounds like the more-lyrical Louisiana cousins of Johnny Winter. But what it is consistently is subtle, and honest, and moving.


This is the kind of album that gives you faith in the future of music. It is not rock and roll, but it's nothing stereotyped as jazz either. All at once, it owes almost as much to the techniques developed by rock improvisors in the last four years as to Davis' jazz background. It is part of a transcendental new music which flushes categories away and, while using musical devices from all styles and cultures, is defined mainly by its deep emotion and unaffected originality.

Miles has always gone his own way, a musician of strength and dignity who has never made the compromise (so poisonous to jazz now) with "pop" fads. It is a testimony to his authenticity that he has never worried about setting styles either, but continued his deeply felt experiment for two decades now. Albums like Miles Ahead, Kind of Blue and Sketches of Spain simply do not get old, and contain some of the most moving experiences that any music has to offer. In his new album, the best he has made in some time, he turns to "space music" and a reverent, timeless realm of pure song, the kind of music which comes along ever so often and stops us momentarily, making us think that this perhaps is the core around which all of our wayward musical highways have revolved, the primal yet futuristic and totally uncontrived sound which gives the deepest, most lasting sustenance to our souls, the living contemporary definition of great art.

The songs are long jams with a minimum of preplanned structure. That they are so cohesive and sustained is a testament to the experience and sensitivity of the musicians involved. Miles' lines are like shots of distilled passion, the kind of evocative, liberating riffs that decades of strivers build their styles on. Aside from Charles Mingus, there is no other musician alive today who communicates such a yearning, controlled intensity, the transformation of life's inchoate passions and tensions into aural adventures that find a permanent place in your consciousness and influence your basic definitions of music. And his sidemen also rise to the occasion, most of them playing better than I have ever heard them before. Certainly Herbie Hancock (piano), Wayne Shorter (tenor sax), and Joe Zawinul (organ) have never seemed so transported. The miracle of jazz is that a great leader can bring merely competent musicians to incredible heights of inspiration —; Mingus has always been famous for this, and Miles has increasingly proven himself a master of this incredibly delicate art.

The first side is taken up by a long jam called "Shhh/Peaceful." Tony Williams' cymbal-and-brush work and the subtle arabesques of Zawinul's organ set a space trip, a mood of suspended time and infinite interior vistas. But when Miles enters, the humanity and tenderness of his trumpet's soft cries are enough to bring you tears. I've heard that when he was making this album, Miles had been listening to Jimi Hendrix and Sly and the Family Stone, but the feeling here is closer to something like "2000 Light Years From Home" by the Stones. It is space music, but with an overwhelmingly human component that makes it much more moving and enduring than most of its rock counterparts.

Side two opens and closes with the best song on the album, a timeless trumpet prayer called "In a Silent Way." There has always been something eternal and pure in Miles' music, and this piece captures that quality as well as anything he's ever recorded. If, as I believe, Miles is an artist for the ages, then this piece will be among those that stand through those vast tracks of time to remind future generations of the oneness of human experience.

Between the two takes of "Silent Way" lies "It's About That Time," a terse, restrained space jam somewhat reminiscent of the one on the first side but a bit sharper, allowing more of Miles' fierce blues ethos to burn through. This is the one that might be connected to Miles' interest in Hendrix and Sly.

They say that jazz has become menopausal, and there is much truth in the statement. Rock too seems to have suffered under a numbing plethora of standardized Sounds. But I believe there is a new music in the air, a total art which knows no boundaries or categories, a new school run by geniuses indifferent to fashion. And I also believe that the ineluctable power and honesty of their music shall prevail. Miles Davis is one of those geniuses.

The Byrds came along at a time when American rock needed a shot in the arm which would raise the music to the levels attained by the British groups and allow it to meet the emerging head culture. The Byrds did it; but the subtlety and aversion to gimmick that is found in their music and in themselves doomed them as a sleeper group, always popular and musically influential, but denied the superstardom conferred on more pretentious, melodramatic personalities by an industry geared to the Image. That they have survived at all (in whatever form, despite their own internal storms) is one of those joyous accidents for which we should all be grateful.

This album was recorded in August, 1964, at the very beginning of the Byrds' career and prior to their contract with Columbia. Slightly rough and sounding a bit dated, it still overflows with that unique unschmaltzy beauty and lyricism that has been the Byrds' trademark. Four of the eleven songs appeared on Mr. Tambourine Man, and they sound like less focused takes of something that later became masterful and transporting. But place this music in perspective: suppose it had been released in late 1964. Aside from the first two or three albums by the Beatles or the Stones, there was absolutely nothing out as good, as aurally visionary, as unpackaged as this.

By the time the Byrds were released to the public, several other groups — the Yardbirds, the Kinks, the Spoonful — were working toward the same shift in the system, and few people realized what an innovation the Byrds were, both spiritually and musically. They took the basic lessons of the Beatles and the Stones, filtered them through Dylan and the less pretentious aspects of the folk scene, and came up with a big, new, visionary sound. Propelled by the ringing grandeur of McGuinn's electric twelve-string and Hillman's incredibly advanced bass playing, they created a stately, transcendent sound of magnificent brilliance, lifting listeners into bold new realms of dream, turning the stoned hordes from preachy, flatulent "folk music" to the vibrant new and old sounds of rock. And the Byrds' influence, in the years that followed, on everybody, from the Beatles to the Velvet Underground, is simply an undiminishing fact of life.

Preflyte: an album marking the beginnings, but an album of fine and fascinating music as well. Gene Clark's songs abound, and though Clark seemed for the most part a formula composer, all his songs had a certain lovely feeling that seldom palled. Declasse influences like Johnny Rivers turned to lucid, beautifully methodical harmonies in Clark's mind. "She Has a Way," for instance, utilized the "Spanish Harlem Incident" guitar lead and early Beatles composition, but like everything else the Byrds have ever done, it glided effortlessly over the puerility and crass, mindless imitation which dominated the scene in '64, to emerge as a shining, deeply felt piece of music.

Preflyte recalls the inception of a genius outfit that has contributed more to rock than anyone else on this side of the Atlantic. Even if you're not a hardcore Byrds freak, I hope you'll buy this album for that reason. At this late date, they deserve all we can give them.

The Master is back again, and this time he has come up with a record worthy of his reputation. So many grit-jive geniuses — Elvis, Little Richard, and Bo Diddley — have turned stiff in their old age. That's why it's a double delight to find Berry, the original poet and scribe of rock and roll, who in many life-worshiping ways exceeded his Minnesota son-in-law, as fresh and as effortlessly committed today as he ever was.

The first side of this album includes four of his recent compositions. You won't get tired of them. They don't relate to Sixties dope-balling, or the feel of police truncheons crunching into skull-bone but they do ring true, and two of them exude the marvelous old Berry wit, something a great many of today's owl-faced artrockers would do well to pick up on. Rock is an ailing form without its sense of humor, and Chuck Berry defined a whole comic sensibility. He has not lost that gift: "It's Too Dark In Here" tells the story of a sheltered chick who finds danger wherever her date takes her, from the party where "there's 'bout forty people dancing under one dim light" to the back seat of the luckless swain's car ("So I drive her out the freeway into the country air/She said I hope you ain't goin' park nowhere around here/ It's dark out there/Let's go back in town/ It's dark out there").

Two of the numbers are slow, rolling blues vocals in Berry's great "Deep Feeling" style. Both are good funky slow-stomps, sunk with that beautiful, unmistakably original blues feel (remember "Wee Wee Hours"? "Worried Life Blues"?) which is one of Berry's trademarks. The harmonica player sounds like he's been listening to Brian Jones and Keith Relf of the Yardbirds, meaning that he exudes not only technical proficiency but taste and imagination. The double-tracked guitars wail and moan like two lonesome Texas banshees reeling in and out of the historic American beerjoint night. That's mournful as the Berry of the yearning lament always was. It's the Real Blues the purists are always yapping about.

The entirety of side two is given over to "Concerto in B Goode," an eighteen-minute flood of instrumental interpolations on Johnny B. Goode and all of his relatives. For all the thematic and improvisatory repetition, you can't help but dig it, because it's so happy, driving, and exuberant, everflowing with the spirit of life joyously lived — the essential spirit of our music. Dig that organ: Dave "Baby" Cortez lives again! Berry's guitar lines are clear and clean, as amiable and enthusiastic and uncluttered as they were in his two-minute folk epics of 1956 like "Jo Jo Gun." For a man who has always been derided by snobs as a "guitar mechanic," Berry plays with a natural energy and sense of direction that one never finds in the solos of last year's crop of overblown "jazz-rock" super-groups. On and on and on flows Chuck Berry, duckwalking his great Gibson guitar down the cluttered corridors of rock history. I suspect he'll still be wailing wisely when the current crop of over-publicized Sensations have faded with their forerunners back into the obscure footnotes of the chronicle of our art.

Captain Beefheart, the only true dadaist in rock, has been victimized repeatedly by public incomprehension and critical authoritarianism. The tendency has been to chide C. B. and his Band as a potentially acceptable blues band who were misled onto the paths of greedy trendy commercialism. What the critics failed to see was that this was a band with a vision, that their music, difficult raucous and rough as it is, proceeded from a unique and original consciousness.

This became dramatically apparent with their last album. Since their music derived as much from the new free jazz and African chant rhythms as from Delta blues, the songs tended to be rattly and wayward, clattering along on wierdly jabbering high-pitched guitars and sprung rhythms. But the total conception and its execution was more in the nature of a tribal Pharoh Sanders Archie Shepp fire-exorcism than the ranting noise of the Blue Cheer strain of groups.

Thus it's very gratifying to say that Captain Beefheart's new album is a total success, a brilliant, stunning enlargement and clarification of his art. Which is not to say that it's in any sense slick, "artistic," or easy. This is one of the few bands whose sound has actually gotten rawer as they've maturedâ€"a brilliant and refreshing strategy. Again the rhythms and melodic textures jump all over the place (in the same way that Cecil Taylor's do), Beefheart singing like a lonesome werewolf screaming and growling in the night. The songs clatter aboutâ€"given a superficial listening, they seem boring and repetitious. It's perhaps the addition of saxophones (all played by the five men in the band) that first suggests what's really happening here and always has been happening in this group's music.

On "Hair Pie: Bake One," for instance, the who group gets into a raucous wrangling horn dialog that reveals a strong Albert Ayler influence. The music truly meshes, flows, and excites in a way that almost none of the selfconscious, carefully crafted jazz-rock bullshit of the past year has done. And the reason for this is that while many other groups have picked up on the trappings of the new jazz. Cap and the Magic Band are into its essence, the white-hot stream of un-"cultured" energy, getting there with a minimum of strain to boot. This is the key to their whole instrumental approach, from the drummer's whirling poly- and even a-rhythmic patterns (compare them to Sonny Murray's on Ayler's Spiritual Unity or Ed Blackwell's on Don Cherry's Symphony for Improvisers), to the explosive, diffuse guitar lines, which (like Lou Reed's for the Velvet Underground or Gary Peacock's bass playing on Spiritual Unity) stretch, tear, and distend the electric guitar's usual vocabulary with the aim of extending that vocabulary past its present strictly patterned limitationsâ€"limitations that are as tyrannically stultifying for the rock musician today as Charlie Parker's influence was for the jazzmen of the late Fifties.

I mustn't forget the lyrics. You certainly won't; the album on a purely verbal level is an explosion of maniacal free-association incantations, eschewing (with the authentic taste that assassignates standards of Taste) solemn "poetic" pretensions and mundane, obvious monosyllabic mindlessness. Where, for instance, have you heard lyrics like these: "Tits tits the blimp the blimp/The mother ship the mother ship/The brothers hid under the hood/From the olimp the blimp ... all the people stir/'n' the girls' knees tremble/'n' run 'n' wave their hands/'n' run their hands over the blimp the blimp ..."

The double record set costs as much as two regular albums, but unlike most of these superlong superexpensive items it's really sustained, and worth the money, which is perhaps not so much to pay for 27 songs and what may well be the most unusual and challenging musical experience you'll have this year.

Alice Cooper is a West Coast Zappa-sponsored group: two guitars, bass, drums and a vocalist who doubles on harmonica. Echoes of 1967 psychedelia in the oscillators and distorted guitars. Showing here the influence of the Mothers, here the first-wave San Francisco sound, there and almost everywhere the Beatles. But their overall texture and the flow of randomly-selected runs interspersed by electronic gimmicks place them closer to a certain rivulet in that deluge of pre-packaged groups which can be defined as marginal acidrock (references: recent debut albums by Aorta and Touch). Droning fuzz leads overlaid by droning (or is it whining?) Bee Gees vocal harmonies, and ponderous quasi-"baroque" organ wallowings a la Vanilla Fudge. Stereotyped guitar solos, a great many of which seem to derive directly (and not surprisingly) from Ray Davies' great fuzztone explosions on early Kinks hits like "You Really Got Me" and "All Day and All of the Night." Apocalyptic raveups patented by the Yardbirds. Spoken "poetry" or "trippy" declamations muttered half-comprehensibly over "atonal" guitar gimmicks (dragging the pick across the strings below the bridge, etc.).

I'm not trying to denigrate Alice Cooper's abilities: within the context of their self-imposed limitations, the album is listenable. But there is a way to do these things. I think simplicity and the imaginative use of the cliche are at the essence of rock; but the cliches have to hit you in a certain way, with a certain conviction and energy and timing, to get it on, to spark that certain internal combustion of good feeling and galvanized energies that lifts you out of your seat irresistibly and starts you dancing, balling, just whooping, or whatever — Black Pearl is the most stunning recent realization of this. And it is this that is lacking in Alice Cooper's music. Everything falls where it should, there are none of the gross, ugly, idiotic juxtapositions of the totally incongruous found in much other studio-assembled art-rock. But neither is there any hint of life, spontaneity, joy, rage, or any kind of authentic passion or conviction. As such, Alice Cooper's music is, for this reviewer at any rate, totally dispensable.

The Velvet Underground are alive and well (which in itself may surprise some people) and ever-changing. How do you define a group like this, who moved from "Heroin" to "Jesus" in two short-years? It is not enough to say that they have one of the broadest ranges of any group extant; this should be apparent to anyone who has listened closely to their three albums. The real question is what this music is about — smack, meth, deviate sex and drugdreams, or something deeper?

Their spiritual odyssey ranges from an early blast of sadomasochistic self-loathing called "I'm So Fucked Up," through the furious nihilism of "Heroin" and the metaphysical quest implied in the words "I'm searching for my mainline," to this album, which combines almost overpowering musical lyricism with deeply yearning, compassionate lyrics to let us all know that they are finally "Beginning to See the Light."

Can this be that same bunch of junkie — faggot — sadomasochist — speed — freaks who roared their anger and their pain in storms of screaming feedback and words spat out like strings of epithets? Yes. Yes, it can, and this is perhaps the most important lesson the Velvet Underground: the power of the human soul to transcend its darker levels.

The songs on this album are about equally divided between the subjects of love and freedom. So many of them are about love, in fact, that one wonders if Lou Reed, the malevolent Burroughsian Death Dwarf who had previously never written a complimentary song about anybody, has not himself fallen in love. The opening song, "Candy Says," is about a young girl who would like to "know completely what the others so discreetly talk about." The fact that this and about half the other tracks on the album are ballads marks another radical departure for the Velvets. The next track is a deep throbbing thing in which he chides perhaps the same girl for her confusion with a great chorus: "Lady be good/Do what you should/You know it'll be alright." John Cale's organ work on this track is stark and spare and, as usual, brilliant — this time as much for what he leaves out as what he puts in.

Then there is "Some Kinda Love," a grooving Latiny thing, somewhat like Donovan but much more earthy, and with words that will kill you: "Put the jelly on your shoulder/Let us do what you feel most/That from which you recoil/Uh still makes your eyes moist."

Perhaps the greatest surprise here is "Jesus," a prayer no less. The yearning for the state of grace reflected ther culminates in "I'm Set Free," a joyous hymn of liberation. The Velvets never seemed so beautifully close to the Byrds before.

The album is unfortunately not without its weak "tracks though. "The Murder Mystery" is an eight minute exercise in aural overload that annoys after a few listenings, and "Pale Blue Eyes" is a folky ballad that never really gets off the ground either musically or lyrically. On the whole I didn't feel that this album matched up to White Light/White Heat, but it will still go a long way toward convincing the unbelievers that the Velvet Underground can write and play any kind of music they want to with equal brilliance.
Untitled Unmastered
RIP David Bowie. The Legend...
2015 was incredible. 
2016 will be even better. 

Sending all our love and prayers to Paris right now.
Happy Halloween!!! 🎃⚡️
Shoutout to 75K Followers. We love each and every one of you.
Happy New Year!
Happy release day to Yorkston / Thorne / Khan, whose album 'Everything Sacred' is released worldwide today
Thank you, David. You gave us all so much. Really blew our minds.
I heard the news today, oh boy.
= two marbles

= moonlit grass

loch kishorn

loch sunart

loch hourn

inner sound

(7/11/12)
(13/11/12)
(14/11/12)
(20/11/12)
(23/11/12)
postmen

teachers

contributors

ebay sellers

record label

strangers

friends

family

heroes
S
0:09:17=
3:31:25*
rub_eye_blurry_3:31:25-3:41:13

T
0:30:03=
3:41:12*
sexy_leanin_3:41:12-4:07:25

U
0:14:22=
3:24:02*
sexy_leanin_3:29:0
make_inter_onnections[[[[[[[[[[
make_out/in_connetions{{{{{{{
make_voice_connections[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[
rotate_power_connectors_90deg]]]]]]]]]]
Happy 70th birthday Robert Wyatt!
We're looking for a software and web developer to work alongside our development team.
The show will now take place on Monday 18th November. We wish to apologise to all ticket holders for any inconvenience this has caused.
Please retain your tickets and await further information. We very much regret any inconvenience caused.
A 👏 Giant 👏 Dog 👏 

PILE is out May 6, 2016 worldwide!



Happy reissue day to Crooked Fingers!

Collect the outstanding first two albums from Crooked Fingers on vinyl with 17 digital bonus tracks!
It's official: Benji Hughes says, “It’s Time to Have a Merry Christmas”!

Which indie holiday hits are we missing? Send us your favs and we'll add them to the playlist!
🦃 happy thanksgiving 🦃

Switzerland: Destroyer's show in St. Gallen canceled tonight due to illness.
Destroyer unfortunately has to cancel their show tonight at Sudpol in Luzern &amp; tomorrow in Lausanne due to illness
DJ Patrick Stickles playing Sinatra in between bands tonight: 👏👏👏
Ten years of free MP3s with our LPs! This weekend: use coupon "LP3" for 15% off all 2015 LPs

🚨🚨🚨
🚨👮🚨
🚨🚨🚨

Mike Krol - Turkey (Full Album stream) [Limited Time Offer - Act Now!]

Times Square - The Video - August 27
Poison Season - The Album - August 28
Times Square - The Video - August 27
Poison Season - The Album - August 28
Times Square - The Video - August 27
Poison Season - The Album - August 28
Let's see those tbt pics! Post a photo from your favorite Merge 25 set or of your favorite Merge album on Instagram or Twitter w/ Merge25
TBT with us today by posting a photo from your favorite Merge 25 set or of your favorite Merge album on Instagram or Twitter w/ Merge25
Dexys announce new album, ‘Let The Record Show Dexys Do Irish and Country Soul’ 
Want to get your face in NME? Tell us what gigs you're excited about and why between Apr 8-14
DJ is fined for playing N.W.A.'s "Fuck Tha Police" during raid on bar 
Watch Miguel cover Rihanna's 'Kiss It Better' while checking lyrics on phone
Watch a very dark new video from Faris Badwan's CAT'S EYES project
Cee Lo Green pays tribute to David Bowie with acoustic 'Space Oddity' cover - watch
Beatles producer George Martin has died aged 90. Full story to follow
Want to get your face in NME? Tell us what gigs you're excited about and why between Apr 1-7
Petition started for Fetty Wap to perform ‘Trap Queen’ at Nancy Reagan’s funeral
Nina Simone’s daughter blasts "tainted" biopic movie saying it's based on a lie: 
Want to get your face in NME? Tell us what gigs you're excited about and why between Mar 25-31
Bobbi Kristina Brown's autopsy has been revealed
New Years &amp; Years single will feature Swedish pop star Tove Lo
George Clooney has some choice words for Donald Trump
‘Hey Arnold!’ is coming back as a two-part TV movie
Rick Ross has been indicted on 9 counts of assault relating to incident in 2015
Florence Welch to feature on Rufus Wainwright's Shakespeare tribute album
Rare Nirvana song featuring Dave Grohl on vocals emerges online - listen
Look who's back - Richard Ashcroft graces the cover of this week's NME. Pick up your copy for the full scoop.
Biebs in the house britawards2016
Amy Winehouse's father doesn't want her to win a posthumous Brit Award tonight
Want to get your face in NME? Tell us what gigs you're excited about and why between Mar 18-24
Have you seen any live music this weekend?
Eagles of Death Metal perform in Paris three months after terrorist attacks
Beyoncé adds extra Wembley Stadium date to her 'Formation' world tour
Overheard outside yeezyseason3: "That was INSANE. And I don't mean insane... I mean... what the fuck was that?"
"I love you like Kanye loves Kanye" YeezySeason3
The sheet went. Models under it (and Naomi Campbell). Some bangers so far and classic Kanye lines.
Yeezy's tinkering with his laptop now...
Kanye arrives with Lamar Odom and the Kardashian-Jenner clan, who are all dressed in white feathers.
We're about to watch Yeezy give us a first listen of TLOP. No sign of Ye yet. There's just a huge sheet on stage, billowing about.
Want to get your face in NME? Tell us what gigs you're excited about and why between March 11-17
Sia, Pink and James Bay sing The Beatles hits for new Netflix kids series
Want to get your face in NME? Tell us what gigs you're excited about and why between Mar 4-10
Ghostface Killah takes on Martin Shkreli with the help of his mum - watch
'Making A Murderer': Ken Kratz accuses filmmakers of casting him as "a villain"
Beyoncé creates 'Hot Sauce' playlist featuring 2 Chainz, Future and more
Elton John reveals plans to write for The Killers' new album
Hear The World Is a Beautiful Place &amp; I Am No Longer Afraid to Die's 
Massive Attack release Ritual Spirit EP, share video for "Take It There" [ft. Tricky]
Michael Stipe remembers David Bowie: "it feels as if the solar system 
"You know I got rhymes like Abe Vigoda"
Far longer than just for one day.
Be warned: the world's gonna get loud tonight. Lemmy Motorhead longlivetheking
shopsmall at a record store, meet people whose goal is to put the right record in your hands. SmallBizSat humaninteraction characters
From the largest boxset to the smallest thing at the counter, everything at a record store makes a good gift. shopsmall SmallBizSat
RSDBF
Seems appropriate in October to have a NEWALBUMALERT about a DANZIG record called SKELETONS (coming in November)
RSDGHOSTTAKEOVER
getitatarecordstore : 
What independent, local retailers have you supported today? It's a prime day for it!
NEW ALBUM ALERT: New Clutch album PSYCHIC WARFARE kicks off October.
We recommend that you eat the tortilla and play a record instead. winwin mmmtacos
vinyltuesday What it isn't: A weekly Record Store Day. Or some of the other things some people who never bothered to ask us say it is.
vinyltuesday What it is: a day during the week you can go check out what might be hitting the racks at your local record store. 2/3
vinyltuesday What it is: a day of the week when physical musical releases will be released at record stores. Some exclusive, some not. 1/3
Kinda crazy how a little blue checkmark can really make your day!
Betting it all on Danzig (moon) to win, naturally. KentuckyDerby2015
This is waiting for you at only a few record stores around the country. Can  you find it? 
Anyone who really thinks we only encourage ppl to go to stores once a year please see our socials and website from RSD14 to now. cmonnow
That disturbance in the force this afternoon was every record store employee everywhere watching StarWars trailer over and over.
Damn the man. Save the Empire.  RexManningDay
Two weeks! RSD15
Official Hashtag of RSD15: RSD15  Congratulations, you crazy set of numbers and letters!
\m/ RSD15 \m/ 
"I think it's my adventure, my trip, my journey, and I guess my attitude is, let the chips fall where they may."--Leonard Nimoy
Crying if we want to. RIPLesleyGore
Performances are great, but let's maybe find a way to let the people who just WON the award get a few words out. playedoff GRAMMYs
albumsstillmatter Muthafreaking Prince says so GRAMMYs
Hands up if you ever thought Paul McCartney would use the word "wildin''
Budget cuts are a bitch. airharmonica AnnieLennox GRAMMYs
NOW PLAYING: Jack White BLUNDERBUSS. NOW EATING: Guacamole. yum
The pom keeps the heat in. science beprepared
Hope our friends in the path of the SnowBeast are stocking up on supplies to be safe and warm. And a soundtrack to be entertained.
Take a look around the internet. It wasn't our joke.
Who IS this "Paul McCartney" guy?
What's the first record you chose to put on in 2015? startingwith
A record store gift certificate. thegreatestgift  What to get with it. thehardestdecision
Not sure I've ever been in the presence of a human who more embodied the word "charming" than Ian McLagan. --Carrie, RSD
You don't have to tell us exactly what you bought, but is anyone shopping RSDBF for gifts? Who's the lucky giftee? secretsanta
If you shopped at or worked at an indie record store this year, you are one of the things we're thankful for today. thanks
Happy Birthday to the Adamses, Ryan and Bryan.
GUARDIANS OF THE GALAXY: AWESOME MIX, VOL. 1 
RSDBF
RSDBF 
Aside from the incredible music, the things we've read today about IkeyOwens make us sad we never met him. Condolences to those who did.
Indie record stores are responsible for approx. 70% of new vinyl sales, 0% of fake bloody sweatshirt sales. shoplocal recordstores
NEW ALBUM ALERT: Pink Floyd's The Endless River 11/10 at record stores.
NEW ALBUM ALERT: AC/DC  ROCK OR BUST scheduled for 12/2. 
wesaluteyoumalcolm
You should watch in Nov because we haven't even mentioned Loretta Lynn on the Ryman stage 54 years to the day after her debut here.
Sturgill Simpson was called the "hero of outlaw country" earlier and he is also the hero of outlaw award accepting. AmericanaAwards
New Record Announcement(s): 2 from Prince coming 4U in a little more than 30 days.
Here's looking at you, kid.
Hopes for a festive Independence Day from Record Store Day and all the independents we know and love. indierules
"Keep your feet on the ground and keep reaching for the stars." CaseyKasem Top40 sadscoobydoo
Spending the last 3 days reading RSD14 record store wrap-ups. Thanks to ALL OF YOU who went and made the stores crazy, busy, happy 4/19.
The record stores we know in Boston are so proud of their city today and every day. RUN, BOSTON, RUN!  BostonStrong
Are you flying solo on RSD14 or with a group? Who's in your Record Store Day posse?
RSD14
RSD14 in case you were wondering.
Lots of people at the site doing the same thing at the same time = slow site. Thanks for your support and your patience. RSD14
Before we post the RSD14 list, and we all get excited about the titles, a reminder that we do this because: RECORD STORES. Love you guys
RIP Dr. Egon
"If you were a pill/I'd take a handful at my will/And I'd knock you back with something/Sweet and strong" -The Replacements "Valentine"
"I ain't got a card to sign/Roses have been hard to find/I only hope that you'll be mine/On Valentine's Day"-Steve Earle "Valentine's Day"
"A time to gain, a time to lose/A time to rend, a time to sew/A time to love, a time to hate/A time of peace, I swear it's not too late"
Congrats to the nominees, performers, winners and newlyweds tonight. Enjoy the champagne and In N Out burgers that await you. GRAMMYs
Join us in celebrating the culture of the indie record store. APRIL 19, 2014
RSD14
"... all I have to do is dream."
If there's a blizzard on the way, stay safe, hunker down. Find out if your record store is open for you to stock much needed provisions.
Record stores sell emotions embedded in plastic and vinyl. Here's hoping your ears and your crates are full of all the good ones in 2014.
"When I got home I bugged/'Cuz under the tree/Was a letter from Santa/And the dough was for me!!"
We triple dog dare you to have a good night.
"It was Christmas Eve, babe/In the drunk tank..."
Free Pussy Riot: Chant. Bumper Sticker. Reality.
BEST BOOK ABOUT OR BY A MUSICIAN THIS YEAR? Two birds, one tweet: RSDGIFTGUIDE RSDBESTOF2013
How much can a newbie learn in 10 minutes to join in the fun of DayoftheDoctor  School us, Who-vians! DrWho50th
We coordinate LOTS of things/people for what we consider a good cause. We are blown away by what's been done for SFBatKid holyawesome
We are US-based RSD twitter, guys. But we're very happy for our friends who have 11.12.13 to look forward to next month.
My god, how did we just notice that today is 11.12.13
May the road rise to meet you, Philip Chevron.
If drifting off into space was your destiny, what song would accompany you? (Guess what movie we saw this weekend.) RSDfloats
It's one of those crazy Monday street dates--lots of 10/1 releases waiting for you at record stores today!
Kurt Cobain's childhood home is up for sale; buyer gets Kurt's mattress. What would Kurt say about this? We think it would be: "Gross."
There is a brand new MazzyStar album out at record stores today. That's pretty exciting for some folks. Are you one of them?
All babies born today are given the middle name Voorhees, right? itsthelaw
A barista stationed all day long inside the conference room? Well played, AIMSCON2013  barhasbeenraised
Alliance of Independent Media Stores: 10 years of record store brotherhood, beer drinking and awesome store t-shirts. Cheers! aimscon2013
"Dear New York, This is a love letter..." --The Beastie Boys (on behalf of everyone else)
We're going to tell the world who the first-ever recipients of our ADAPTERPRIZE are. Tomorrow.
Ton of record stores in Chicago. Matt asked us on FB for some recommendations--we'll ask you: Where and why? chicagorecordstore
Most record stores have air conditioning.   weatherforecast
Record stores do not tend to crash, get hacked or take over your personal digital devices. magnacartaholygrail instorestoday
Monday after a holiday can be rough. What music is powering you up today? manic
We're on the downhill side of 2013! What's been the best music so far?  RSD2013SOFAR
Magna Carta Holy Grail.
Tropical storms. Tornadoes. Fires. We are done with the weather. What music do you recommend to take our minds off it this weekend?
Who picked up the special indie blue cover version of the new QueensoftheStoneAge record at a record store today? RSDAmbassadorsrock
At MusicBiz2013 looking at a montage of RSD covers through the years. Speechless at the amazing artists who have supported the stores.
Apparently today is International Tell Your Crush Day. Who's your musical dreamboat? RSDCrush
"Warm it up Chris." "I'm about to." "Warm it up Chris" "Cause that's what I was born to do."  RIP Chris "Mac Daddy" Kelly of Kris Kross
Happy EarthDay! We dig that planet--every single record store we love is located there.
RIP to Chrissy Amphlett of the Divinyls. Strong, brave woman. Think we all know how some of you will honor her biggest hit.
Big thanks to all who celebrated indie record stores yesterday! Today we're supporting a different local shop. weneedcoffee RSD13
What's the weather like for your RSD13?
"Record stores can't save your life. But they can give you a better one." HAPPY RECORD STORE DAY! RSD13
We have lots of followers in the Boston/Watertown area--check the news, not just Twitter, when you get up this morning. Stay safe.
The best band you ever saw play a record store in-store is.... RSD13
The best thing you ever got at a record store was... RSD13
What store will you be celebrating on RSD13?
Our hashtag for that big party happening on Saturday is RSD13
See you at the movies, Roger Ebert.
The next time it's the 20th of the month, we'll be celebrating RSD13
What music is setting your Irish eyes a'smiling today?
RSD ..."promotes the belief that time spent exploring a small, lovingly curated record store, discovering artists, music and ideas...
Hey record stores, are you making your plans for  RSD13 yet?
50. That's how many days until RSD13
It gets updated when our new list of RSD13 official titles is released, which will be in March.
Bassey. Dame Bassey. Oscars Bond
The 001 song from a 007 film is....? Oscars Bond
Oscars aren't the boss of us! What's your Best Movie pick of the year, regardless of whether O took notice?
What album's got you going this Friday morning? RSDnowplaying
if one is inclined to get the Grammys 2013 Nominees album, one can also get it at a record store.
Regardless of who wins rap Grammy categories (and RESPECT to you! all) it's entertaining to hear the announcer say half the words.
"Invest in a human being" says the exec producer of Best New Age Grammy
69 Days 6 Hours US Eastern Time Zone RSD13
Hey Northeast, what records and DVDs do you have packed in your snow preparedness kit?  NEMOFUN
Yes, yes, yes. Let's make this official. If you're talking about our favorite 'holiday' Record Store Day 2013, let's talk about RSD13  YAY!
Best Baltimore band/song vs. Best San Francisco band/song. You pick the teams. RSDBowl
Hey. Hi. Whatcha listening to?
And today "new" Hendrix!
Oscar nominations out. What's YOUR best picture nominee? RSDatthemovies
JT! Destiny! Bowie! 2013: The Year Everyone Sings Again!
Bowie!
The opinion that really matters: What was YOUR favorite album of 2012? RSDGHof2012
Happy New Year to all our store friends and all of you who keep them strong!
We KNOW there's an internet, thanks. But shipping &gt; Expedit, even in a state WITH a store. So more options, please. vinylstorage
Consensus on vinylstorage seems to be Ikea Expedit shelving. But if you don't live near one, what to do?
Bookshelves sag. Milk crates... eh. Someone's asking us on Facebook, and we want to know: Where/how do you store your vinyl?
Hey, Paris! Someone's asking us for the best record store to find  "disco soul funk acid deep house 90's and garage house?" YOU TELL US!
Days 7 and 8. What do you give for record store 12 Days of Christmas? RSDXmas
Dealing w/ nasty weather today? May we suggest you stay inside and listen to music? And tell us, what will that music be?
Day/Gift Six of a record store 12 Days of Christmas would be... ? RSDXmas
FIVE GOLD RECORDS? We're sure you have a more clever suggestion for Day/Gift 5 of our record store 12 Days of Christmas project. RSDXmas
Oops! We missed a day, so what should be Day 3 and Day 4 in a record store 12 Days of Christmas? RSDxmas
A record store version of 12 Days of Christmas. What's the gift for Day 2? RSDxmas
Hug your people.
Let's Twitter-source a record store version of "12 Days of Christmas" now that we've got 12 days UNTIL Christmas. What's on Day 1? RSDxmas
Dave. Kris. Paul.
Hey record stores, if you're doing anything special for election day and those doing their civic duty, let us know! VOTE
Patronizing independently-owned joints--be they restaurants, corner stores, gas stations or (hey!) record stores--is always helping.
Good thoughts and hopes for all our East Coast record store friends, their friends, families, customers and anyone who's ever passed by.
The last few weeks? Crazy full of new releases. What new music did you get at your record store?
This week, Monday is release day at your record store. What new music are you snagging today?
Debuting the next by thing in fashion: the t-shirt with a record size pocket. Gonna be huge. yr15
Working with artists and labels to have some nice things at record stores on Black Friday. Full list coming soon. BFRSD
The Beatles single scheduled for 10/5 is now on hold. Sorry.
The first of October. Help us build our spookyplaylist. What's essential?
TheSmiths reunion rumours. The internet is SO GOOD at this stuff.
FIRST: a limited, fruit-striped-sleeve 45 RPM 7" "Love Me Do" b/w "PS I Love You" in stores next week. 50 years of BEATLESVINYL
'Tis true. BEATLESVINYL remasters in record stores 11/13. 14 studio albums and a massive box set.
Random Wednesday shout-out to your favorite record store. GO!
Once again, a good day to hit the record store. What new music are you psyched for?
Nirvana's Nevermind is of legal drinking age today.
Another crazy-good release day. What's waiting for YOU today at the record store?
Whatcha listening to? nowplaying
Crazy good month for new releases. What are you most looking forward to getting at your record store today?
"The one thing I regret was that my work required an enormous amount of my time, and a lot of travel." NeilArmstrong
Jon Spencer BLUES ExPLOsion. That's how it always sounds in my head when i hear that. New "Bag of Bones" 7" in stores today.
Just saw a statistic that 63% of teens 13 to 18 listen to their music primarily through YouTube. That's just sad. We must help them.
Just trying to watch a movie. Our thoughts with the victims and families and filmmakers this morning. messedup
New Old Crow Medicine Show record says "Get free ltd. ed. tote at select record stores to 'Carry Me Home' in." itsearly weslayus
What's on tap for your summer weekend, musically?
Lots of good things making their debut at the record stores today. What are you looking forward to? newreleases
Our Last Dance will always be saved for you, Donna Summer.
Suck it, cancer. Seriously. We love you MCA.
"Record stores can't save your life. But they can give you a better one."--Nick Hornby  RSD12
Happy It's Officially RSD12 Time to our friends in Japan, Australia, Europe and RSDUK  Have a great day!
Know what WE want for Record Store Day?  To be a Twitter trend. RSD12 please and thank you!
"...human interaction in shops, with informed good people, handling cherishable artefacts is good for the soul." Ben Watt, EBTG RSD12
Know what goes great with RSD12? Food trucks. We're getting hungry hearing about some amazing mobile food coming to record stores 4/21.
...Jeffrey explains: "This is my album pick because it's the only contemporary album I bought all year. Everything else I buy is old stuff!"
...We will be revealing the rest of Rough Trade's artists' Albums of the Year later this week, so watch this space 👀
Pair of tickets to see Micachu &amp; The Shapes tonight at Oval Space. Answer this question : which living bird has the longest wingspan?
Jeffrey Lewis currently singing "Let's burn Bleecker St to the ground" at Le Poisson Rouge &amp; all is right in the world
All you have to do to win the tickets is tweet us what you are having for your lunch. I need inspiration. Will announce winner at 2pm.
...The tickets would be free. Sadly we can no longer make the show and want to make sure that they go to a good home.
We're mourning the loss of one of the great musicians of all time. RIP, Ornette Coleman, you made so much possible.
...In America and Canada it's coming out as planned on Mark Kozelek's own label Caldo Verde on 2nd June.
Not only is Soak headlining, but the whole of the line up is pretty ace, too.
Our 'A Very Rough Trade Christmas' spotify playlist has all your christmas song needs covered
Alabama Shakes have announced that they will play a very special show to 800 fans at Islington Assembly Hall in London on 19th February 2015
"PCPC is born out of an aesthetic solidarity, and will to create something new" - Andrew Savage
Parkay Quarts will release their "in-between albums album" 'Content Nausea' digitally 10th Nov and physically on 8th Dec!
... 93 Leonard St, London EC2A 4RD. Join us, Under The Sea Ball-ers!
We were set to DJ at SecretCinema BackToTheFuture tnight but due to its cancellation we are moving the party to The Griffin in Shoreditch
A Venus Flytrap? Is it vegan? The age-old question. Technically the Flytrap is not vegan, as it eats flies, but can vegans eat the Flytrap?
Really sad to hear about the closing of the The Fly - a top magazine run by top people who were always so supportive of RT and indie music.
STAGE TIMES for tonight at The Coronet, London: DJs:19:00 – 19:30 Telegram: 19:30 – 20:00 Childhood: 20:30 – 21:00 Palma Violets: 21:30
Dream lineup at Brixton Academy tonight: 
Martina Topley Bird: 7.40
PINS: 8.40 
Warpaint: 9.40 
+ Jarvis Cocker and Steve Mackey DJing!
The very talented Mica Levi aka Micachu has written and recorded the soundtrack for the science fiction film ‘Under The Skin’...
The first batch of Let's Start A Pussy Riot books have arrived! You can pre-order yours here:
Still tix left for tomorrow's Pantha du Prince &amp; Bell Laboratory show at QEH at 9.30. 7.30 show now sold out!
So excited to announce that...
For those of you wondering, 'Happy Endings' IS on Palma Violets' debut album '180' (out 25th Feb) but under the new name 'Chicken Dippers'!
Tune into BBC2 this Friday at 11.50pm for the full show, including two more tracks from Palma Violets.
... In other big Palma Violets news, the Lambeth boys are performing live tonight on Jools Holland at 10pm on BBC2. Goin' Up!
We have two free pairs of tickets for tonight's sold out Palma Violets show at Brixton Jamm to give away! First to retweet wins... GO.
The Micachu and the Shapes show tonight with Animal Collective has now moved to the Austin Music Hall. Texas, that is.
Palma Violets' last ever 180 show last night will go down in RT history. We'll miss those sweaty sardine gigs, but here's to the big tour!
...'The Business of Families': a collection of short stories &amp; poems about flesh &amp; blood written by sisters, brothers &amp; illicit lovers.
George Martin RIP
RT East will be closed this evening at 5:30pm for our 40th Anniversary Journal launch. There will be no entry without a wristband.
Please note, Rough Trade East will be closed tonight from 6pm for our annual stock-take. Apologies for any inconvenience!
The full release list is here:
The full release list is here:
The full release list is here:
Coming soon...
Thanks again to all for the love &amp; anecdotes on our 40th birthday yesterday! Here's to another 40. 'Life begins' and all that! RoughTrade40
Pretty overwhelmed by the birthday love from you lot today! Keep those Rough Trade memories coming; fave records, fave gigs x RoughTrade40
We share our birthday with Kurt Cobain, Tony Wilson and Ian Brown, amongst others. Happy birthday to all the Feb 20th babies! RoughTrade40
We're loving hearing your memories of Rough Trade over the years! Keep 'em coming &amp; THANKS for all the birthday wishes so far! RoughTrade40
What records have you got from us over the years that you've not stopped playing? What's been your fave gig? Enquiring minds want to know!
We've got some exciting stuff lined up to celebrate our 40th Anniversary this year. Keep an eye out for news on here over the next week(s)!
Rough Trade Shops | 40 Years, 40 Covers
A cover version from each year since 1976.
Rough Trade Shops - 40 Years, 40 Covers | 2CD
A track from each year since opening in Feb 76
Our condolences to the friends &amp; family of Viola Beach. Sad news.
45% of women would rather receive a record as a gift than a box of chocs. This Valentines Day, give her what she wants. Don't be selfish x
78% of men would rather receive a record as a gift than a box of chocolates. This Valentines Day, give him what he wants. Don't be selfish x
Scientific tests conclude that Vinyl is better for healing heartache than binge-eating or porn, &amp; also less messy. We're just try'na help x
69% of people meet their ideal partner in record shops. Fact. If you're feeling lonely this Valentine's Day, head to Rough Trade GetLucky x
Want to break up w/t someone but can't 'cos Valentines? Bring them to our photobooth &amp; leave them there while you pretend to buy tokens! x
Prove to the world you're not alone this Valentines! Bring your loved one to our photobooth to capture that romantic moment for eternity x
It's Singles Awareness Day. Come buy yourself a record. Records won't judge or try to change you. You'll be happy together forever &amp; ever x
It's Valentines Day. Literally no better day to drag your loved one around record shopping. You could discover "your" song &amp; everything! x
DillaDay 
Always sad when an indie shop calls it a day. Bitterly so when it's a comrade, collaborator, neighbour, a shop that inspires. musicexchange
Maurice White RIP :(
Our Amy selects new releases on the new COUNTER CULTURE RADIO.
RT East closes 6pm tonight for the FAT WHITE FAMILY gig. This has SOLD OUT! No wristband, no entry. Pre-orders advised to collect before 6pm
We now have a winner for our GUN OUTFIT ticket giveaway. Thanks for playing! x
Forthcoming: NEW 10"/CDS by LUSH, due 15th April 2016.
Please note, Rough Trade East will be closing tonight at 7pm for the TINDERSTICKS event. Limited wristbands available instore only.
STAR WARS boxset anyone?.. Pricey, but, ya know..
(2/2) Blackstar CD orders will be fulfilled over the next 24 hrs, back-cat titles are being re-pressed by the labels as fast as they can x
Dear internet. To repeat, we're awaiting a repress on Bowie's Blackstar LP which should be in next week. All orders will be fulfilled then x
Really not enjoying the frequentness of these kind of posts this year.
Glenn Frey RIP
FYI: people that ordered BOWIE's 'Blackstar', full CD stock expected tomorrow, vinyl expected early next week. All orders will be fulfilled.
MYSTERY JETS instore this week!
Reminder, wristbands for TINDERSTICKS &amp; FAT WHITE FAMILY events at RT East have sold out online, BUT 100 will be avail. instore from Fri AM.
Similarly, as to be expected, an overwhelming demand for all Bowie back-cat right now. The majority of titles are being repressed asap.
Nb: Rough Trade East has closed early this evening. Open regular hours tomorrow (8am-9pm). Apologies for any inconvenience.
Honouring the Artist. Not commodity. Fuck cancer.
2016 reveal Pt 2: We are a record shop. We are not an LA-based leather fetish wear &amp; toys store. Again though, really loving your tweets x
Starting 2016 off with a reveal: We are a record shop. We are not consumer affairs TV show, Rogue Traders. We dig your tweets though, guys x
Mark B RIP
Lemmy RIP.
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Sean / Chris, Rough Trade West
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Noreen, Rough Trade East
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Stewart, Rough Trade NYC
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Bobby, Rough Trade East
Already loads of events lined up for 2016:
If you came to a Rough Trade show this year, what was your fave?...
Rough Trade Staff Charts
RT NYC Xmas Hrs:
Xmas Eve 10am-6pm
Xmas Day CLOSED
Dec 26th 11am-11pm
Dec 27th 11am-9pm
Dec 28th-30th 11-11
Dec 31st 11am-6pm
Jan 1st CLOSED
RT Notts Xmas Hrs:
Xmas Eve 9am-6pm
Xmas/Boxing Day CLOSED
Dec 27th 11-7
Dec 28th-30th 10-7
Dec 31st 10am (NYE event til 3am)
Jan 1st CLOSED
RT West Xmas Hrs:
Xmas Eve 10am-5pm
Xmas/Boxing Day CLOSED
Dec 27th/28th 11am-5pm
Dec 29th/30th 10am-6:30pm
Dec 31st 10am-5pm
Jan 1st CLOSED
RT East Xmas Hours:
Xmas Eve 9am-5pm
Xmas/Boxing Day CLOSED
Dec 27th/28th 11am-7pm
Dec 29th/30th 8am-9pm
Dec 31st 9am-5pm
Jan 1st CLOSED
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Sonny, Rough Trade East
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
George, Rough Trade NYC
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Freddi, Rough Trade NYC
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Nick, Rough Trade East
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Sophie, Rough Trade Nottingham
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Ellis, Rough Trade East
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Ed, Rough Trade NYC
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Jono, Rough Trade Nottingham
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Stan, Rough Trade East
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Dennis, Rough Trade NYC
Rough Trade Staff Charts:
Nail, Rough Trade Nottingham
Rough Trade On Tour crew.
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s:
Melanie, Rough Trade NYC
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s:
Sarah, Rough Trade East
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s:
Leah, Rough Trade Nottingham
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s:
Talulah, Rough Trade West
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s
Adrian, Rough Trade NYC
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s
Kyle, Rough Trade Nottingham
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s:
Sid, Rough Trade East
Rough Trade Staff Top 10s:
Nigel, Rough Trade West
(2/2) These are available online and instore at Rough Trade East right now. Rough Trade West &amp; Nottingham will have copies end of the week.
PATTI SMITH came instore yesterday &amp; signed a load more books! 
Now playing at Rough Trade East 
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
Counter Culture 15 | 2xCD OUT NOW!
More Rough Trade Shop comps here
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
Counter Culture 15 | 2xCD OUT NOW!
More Rough Trade Shop comps here
Counter Culture 15 | 2xCD OUT NOW!
More Rough Trade Shop comps here:
For those asking, there's been delays on the LUSH boxset, but been told we should get the majority of our stock within the next few days.
Rough Trade Staff Charts coming soon!...
Rough Trade's Top 20 Reissues of 2015:
Rough Trade's Top 20 Compilations of 2015
Rough Trade Comps of 2015
1. Back To The River: 'More Southern Soul Stories 1961-1978'
Rough Trade Comps of 2015
6. 'Greater Manchester Punk 1977-1981'
Rough Trade Comps of 2015
8. The Amorphous Androgonous - 'Wizard Of Oz'
One of our Top 10 Gifts for Christmas. 
It's now December so we feel like we can talk about Christmas gift ideas. 
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
A selection pack of tasty Chrimbo gift ideas here:
Rough Trade Book of the Year 2015:
Carrie Brownstein - 'Hunger Makes Me A Modern Girl'
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
Rough Trade Book of the Year 2015:
Carrie Brownstein - 'Hunger Makes Me A Modern Girl'
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
Rough Trade Book of the Year 2015:
Carrie Brownstein - 'Hunger Makes Me A Modern Girl'
Check out our Top 20 Books of the Year 2015 here!
7pm at Rough Trade Nottingham, it's the very first RTN Record Club!
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
Rough Trade's Top 20 Books of the Year 2015:
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
Rough Trade's Top 100 Albums Of The Year 2015:
FYI Bjork Live pre-orders: All CDs have now left the building, LP orders shipped nxt wk. Pls allow 15days UK/30days Worldwide for delivery.
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
The Rough Trade Top 100 Albums 2015:
So, various toys were thrown out of various prams, but eventually the dust settled. Here are the Rough Trade Top 10 ALBUMS OF THE YEAR 2015.
It's that time of the year where we reveal Rough Trade's ALBUMS OF THE YEAR 2015! Top 10 countdown starts in 5 minutes!.. exciting AOTY15
Sending our thoughts &amp; love out to our friends in Paris right now. Horrible news x
Fresh heat for the weekend: Dusky, Tee Mango, Greg Beato, Fold/Kassem Mosse, Spaces, Anthony Parasole, Loonie Bin, Bloom, Auntie Flo + more!
LUSH.
Jack Name will be Live in-store at RTEast today at 1pm. Free entry. castlefacerecords jackname
We will be closing RT East earlier than usual today at 6pm to set up for an event.
Back in stock! Greek label Nous Ethos Series Volumes 1, 2 and 3! 
We have a few Cassette Store Day titles still available, inc. Girl Band, The Maccabees, Alex G and Gengahr. All limited supply so be quick!
Reminder, the John Cooper Clarke event scheduled for Rough Trade East today has been postponed due to exhaustive tour commitments.
Reminder, due to tour commitments, this Sat's JOHN COOPER CLARKE gig has sadly been POSTPONED. We hope to announce a rescheduled date soon.
Due to exhaustive tour commitments, this Sat's JOHN COOPER CLARKE gig has sadly been POSTPONED. We hope to announce a rescheduled date soon.
JOHN GRANT on-stage 6:30pm tonight. We recommend pre-order customers collect their wristbands asap to help speed up entry for the event.
EXCLUSIVE: 'Brown Acid' - a 60s/70s proto-metal comp.
For folks asking about photos from the Lana signing, have spoken to our people who are speaking to her people &amp; so on but no news yet-sorry!
This weeks New Releases are here:
More New Releases here:
OUT TODAY: Morrissey - List of the Lost
Shout to the guy trying to sell a signed Lana Del Rey LP for £500 on eBay already &amp; using our staff photo. You are the worst kind of person.
(3/3)
- Wristbands have SOLD OUT
- no more will be released. If you don't have a wristband or pre-order you will not be permitted entry.
(2/3)
- Pre-order wristbands advised to collect from the shop between 8am - 11:30am
- The signing starts at midday.
(3/3)
- Wristbands have SOLD OUT - no more will be released. If you don't have a wristband or pre-order you will not be permitted entry.
(2/3)
- Pre-order wristbands should be collected from the shop between 8am - 11:30am
- The signing starts at midday.
A few things about tomorrow's LANA DEL REY signing at Rough Trade East, London:
- Rough Trade East will be CLOSED for the signing, 11:30-2pm
Star Wars: The Force Awakens’ 
RSD16 celebrate the amazing J. Williams score with a ltd 10"
Cavern Of Anti-Matter
So where will you all be on RSD16?
What's on your RSD16 list then?
RSD16
ROLL ON RSD!
Lorde. You are wonderful. brits2016
We're on Snapchat! Add us: recordstoreday 👻
It's that time of the week again: indiefriday! Which new releases do you have your eyes on today?
RECORD SHOPS: The deadline for RSD16 sign up is THIS Friday.
RECORD SHOPPERS: If you're out today, remind your local shop to sign up!
So many exciting new releases today. Savages, Suede, Shearwater, Coasts, Chairlift, Tortoise, Fat White Family &amp; so many more! indiefriday
Planet Earth is blue.
We've got that indiefriday feeling! Check out the first new &amp; indie-only releases of 2016:

Congrats to David Gilmour + team for Rattle that Lock album cover winning 2016's artvinyl award!
It's Monday! We're all back! What are you listening to to get you through the first day back at work? mondaymotivation
Merry Christmas! We hope Santa has been good to all of you record collectors out there! 

As 2015's nearly over we want to know what's been your record of the year? Send us some pics of your favourite releases! 
recordoftheyear
Big release day today. Who's got their hands on Adele25? 
ICYMI: Black Friday UK titles are up on the website now RSDBF
Happy indiefriday. There's a deluxe Bill Ryder Jones LP + bonus 7"  in stores today!

Indie-only vinyl isn't just for RSD!
Take a look at what's out in your local record shop this week:
indiefriday
Enter Shikari fans. Have you seen what's out today? indiefriday 

This week's indie-only releases are all up on the website. Lots of exclusives! 
indiefriday
It's NationalPoetryDay. What's your favourite line of a poem/ lyric of a song?
Also landing on indie shelves tomorrow is Youth Lagoon's 3rd album 'Savage Hills Ballroom' on gold vinyl
HUGE indie-only release tomorrow.


What are you spinning today for some mondaymotivation?
Info on all of tomorrow's indiefriday releases can be found here:
It's the best day of the week! 

Head down to your local record shop for some indiefriday buys. 

We want to see what you find!
Heavenly Records At 25: Stunning Black &amp; White Portraits From Label’s Anniversary Exhibition
*Drumroll Please* 
We reveal the UK's smallest independent record shops...
Jack White hides secret postcard-shaped vinyl in Third Man Records' release of Jay Z album
Let's see your indiefriday buys today!
Let's see those indiefriday hauls!
What have you got your eyes on this indiefriday? Send us in pictures of your latest record shop buy!
I guess it's safe to say there's mixed opinions about Kanye then... Glasto2015
Thoughts on Kanye headlining? Glasto15
Placebo announce first 5 albums will be getting vinyl releases – including ltd ed coloured LPs
I'm sure there's lots of sad Glasto faces this morning as the Foos have had to pull. Who do we think will be a replacement? Glasto2015
What releases do you have your eyes on this week then guys?
It's Monday! Time for a round-up of this week's limited edition indie exclusives...
What did people add to their RSD15 collections this weekend now releases are online?
Ready for RSD15 round 2 tonight? All remaining stock goes online at 00.01 tonight!
Here's the ten most valuable records in the world... any of these hiding in your collections? 
Make sure you follow your local indie shops on Twitter/ Facebook as they're constantly updating us on RSD15 stock. No need to go to eBay.
Get your records off eBay and keep em on your decks. There's still hundreds of RSD15 titles available at your indies right now..
RSD15 is the top trend in the UK right now!
If you're in a queue already send us a picture and let us know where you are! We want to see you! RSD15
Shout to the shops who work tirelessly to make Record Store Day what it is. How are you all getting on today guys? RSD15
So the madness begins as people are sending us pictures pitched up outside their local indie already! What time will you be out? RSD15
We're hoping it stays this sunny for Saturday ☀️☀️☀️ RSD15
What shops are you all visiting on Saturday then? RSD15
Two weeks.... RSD15
Is it really Monday already? What are you spinning to wake yourself up this morning? RSD15
What are you hoping's going to be announced tonight? RSD15
The list! It's out! Tonight! RSD15
I feel like Santa on Christmas Eve getting ready to deliver lots of vinyl treats for you all tomorrow RSD15
Who wants to know where and when you can find out this year's UK RSD releases? RSD15
So, there's quite an important list coming out soon... RSD15
Launch event announcement coming up RSD15
It's the midweek hump. What are you spinning this week to see you through til Friday? RSD15
It's the official Record Store Day ambassador announcement day! Not long left to wait... who do you think it's going to be? RSD15
Make sure you remind your local record shop that they only have ONE WEEK left to sign up for RSD 2015.
This is a reminder to independent music retailers across the country that sign-up for Record Store Day closes on the 30th January! RSD15
Merry Christmas everyone. Hope you get all the records you deserve!
Who picked up some cool blackfriday vinyl today then? Send us in pictures so we can see who got lucky!
What Black Friday releases are you guys gonna be after tomorrow then?
Would you like to know this year's UK Black Friday releases?
We have a VERY exciting competition announcement for you today...RSD15
Who's going to win the Mercury Prize tonight? MercuryPrize2014
Well done to our AIMawards vinyl competition winners who have now been contacted. If you were unlucky, they'll be more comps to come!
We are very sad at the news of the passing of Robert 'Throb' Young today. What a legend x
What do you make of those?! MercuryPrize2014
... Damon Albarn, Polar Bear, Kate Tempest, Go Go Penguin &amp; Royal Blood MercuryPrize2014
Nominated for the mercuryprize2014 are Young Fathers, Fkatwigs, East India Youth, Bombay Bicycle Club, Anna Calvi, Jungle, Nick Mulvey...
Are you ready to hear the MercuryPrize2014 short-list?
Goood Monday morning! What have you all been listening to this weekend?
We have got some goodies to give away for you today! Make sure you keep an eye on Twitter today guys...
We are already starting to think about our RSD 2015 releases. Which artists would you like to see release exclusive RSD vinyl? RSD15
Good morning. Who managed to catch Arctic Monkey's fantastic performance at Reading and Leeds this weekend? I was lucky enough to be there!
So who would you like to see as the official 2015 RSD ambassador? RSD15
Record Store Day are pleased to be back after a summer break and we’re already working hard to make sure 2015 is the most exciting RSD yet!
Many stores still have a few RSD14 products knocking about so pop in stores this week or look on their online store at midnight 26th April!
Thank you everyone today was very special.  Every shop appreciates your support on RSD14. Same again next week? ;-)
Happy RSD14 everyone!  Where will you be today? Tweet us your pictures and share your stories.  Good luck
Ppl across the UK already queuing 4 RSD14 madness! If you're out &amp; about waiting tweet us your pictures.Let's form a vinyl army MusicUtd
One sleep to go until the big day RSD14 SupportYourLocalRecordShop
What time are people starting to queue on Saturday morning for RSD14 ?! Or do we have any Friday night campers?! :)
2 Days to go until RSD14 .. We can not contain our excitement!!! records vinyl exclusive releases happy sunshine
3 days to go until RSD14 .. who's excited?! and where is everyone heading? :-)
Happy Monday Everyone! Who's been warming up for RSD14 .. tweet us what vinyl you have indulged in this weekend!! vinyl record collector
One week to RSD14 !!!! why not visit your local record shop this afternoon and get some practice in 7DaysToGo
Good morning! Who's struggling to decide where to go for RSD14 ?! Tweet us your location and we will tweet back a few shops in your area!!
Dear World,
yes it's real!
We love you right back! 

Christ, Corbs is all business today
Michael Owen really can't get his head around the fact the referee is not English. Wait until somebody explains the offside rule LFC
I just sarcastically did some work. I wrote some imagemagick to make sparkle text and polaroids. I got big rave cat gifs. I installed fonts.
How I can tell its coming to the end of a project: I'm writing tooling in node. Why does that signify end? No idea, I just write node at end
Like so white
It was only as I did my ironing that I realised my entire work wardrobe is blue chinos and white shirts. Just variations and shade.
Tried to cook fish-fingers and now the flat smells of bleach. Should not of cleaned with bleach. Smells tasty  though.
Does Milner want to win?
Good to see the people in the posh seats are enjoying their day or visiting the Wembley concourse bars
Streaming quality of sky go is crap today. I bought a 100mb line for this
England Ireland is on itv? Why? They've never had a sport where they've provided good coverage or insight. Wales France more their speed.
Bye bye beard. My face feels... Cold.
iterm3 will have an image renderer built in? Cool... so its emacs?
Bought a massive attack EP on their website, makes me sign up, mails me my password back. That could easily be a massive attack hurr hurr+
Hearing Flower of Scotland belted out at Murrayfield makes em think England are going to get murdered: on the field or off anyway
The --debug flag to puppet module build tells you the tar command and nothing else. *slow clap*. Fucking puppet is for fucking twats
A service at $client returns a 200 for an internal service error. Or: the code is 200, the logs say 'Internal Service Error' anyway
Things I didn't want to spend an hour on a Monday morning fixing: irssi
Just seen a man run past in a West Ham shirt. Very brave, this being Millwall country, and perhaps a bad omen for the cup 4th round later.
Someone is full-on growling at her screen in the office. Scary.
Anybody fancy a pub lunch near London Bridge? I've had a rough puppet morning
Bloody kettle blew, fused/melted it's self to it's base. This is a catastrophe.
Bad omen. My 'This Is Anfield' poster just fell down
People on the train using their respective phones or tablets to watch stuff. I'm feeling smug; I'm using my respective to read a book. Hmm
Enjoyed my jaunt to Scunthorpe for the afternoon but I am looking forward to going home.
People used to criticise football for being low scoring. I'd take a 1-nil quite happily.
Dude at work reckons he invented social networking but nobody believed it'd work. Yeah mate, and I invented the horse.
Sneaking out for a bit to go shopping. How verrryyyyy metrosexual (or whatever the term is these days)
Binning all the puppet written by predecessors and re-doing it again. Including specs and linting. I'm just too nice a person.
Some times its a "Listen to slayer and pretend you don't have to write puppet" kind of day
this place is full of stupid bastards
At $client some puppet mods prefixed with client name, others not. However Modulefile(s) all specifically omit that. How? Custom forge, duh
Went from Snow Leopard to El Capitan this weekend in a surprisingly risky upgrade. Net result: colours suck, middle mouse button works
Just found myself whispering "C'mon  Everton". Any more of that and I'll be stricken from the will, I think
Definitely time to look for a new job. Maybe even getting out of IT for a bit
Villa: all a massive Football Manager-esque ruse, player one just got bored, wanted to make it interesting
Never met Bowie, so it feels weird to feel sad he died. I am considering going home and blasting out as much of his back catalogue I can.
Real joy is walking into a grooming session and being told I'm not needed in it. Bye lads!
Internet's fucked at $client. Not bad for an international newspaper with millions of online subscribers
Not really ready to go back to work, feel like I haven't had much of a holiday. Maybe if I do a fortnight's worth of cocaine tonight perhaps
Why the fuck is `make check` failing on libtool? It does fucking three things
New Year, same broken BT internet.
Don't know who the local scout troop is but they're all fat sods with untucked shirts. Bloody falling standards. Bring back national service
It was nice to be back in Scunthorpe. Almost as nice as being in a cab home
Strictly xmas special. I'm going to massacre everyone in this house
I can't wrap more than one gift without having to tootle off and do something less tedious for 5 minutes. Anybody looking to make some cash?
Christmas Holiday goals: marathon the shit out of the Gilmore Girls; from the pilot to Rory going off to Bum Barack
Somewhere Jose has turned off the TV and has gone to go potter about in his shed instead.
Simply Red were cracking
Its Pep. Definitely Pep
Woah
Far from the only person sitting alone here for the opening star wars. That's either awesome or sad
Fucking star wars!
What if Star Wars is shit?
Kicking off my awesome 24 hours with a giant steak. Then Star Wars at midnight, in late to go to the pub with team tomorrow, then Simply Red
Surrey Quays has Star Wars tix. Got mine for midnight
Lightened some of the letters in this standards guide I'm writing ever so slightly to spell out 'You sad bastard'.
What the fuck is moments?
So many times watching spinal tap I realise 'oh right that's where i know this song from'
I forgot I bought this, but I now have a watch with a compass, altimeter and barometer. I'm literally a tactical turtleneck away from Archer
Its not even lunch on a monday and already I think I'm going to end up in a fight today
Just found a dead fly in my beard. Form an orderly queue ladies
Saturday afternoon run was a great idea poorly executed. At the 2.5km mark (**max**) my ankles hardened and I walked a chunk of the rest.
Nobody noticed my haircut today. Fuck you all then. Tomorrow I'm shaving a massive knob in the back of my head.
The so-called death threat to the Tory MP was from 'Rusty Shackleford'? Thats ace
Need a new project. You want something built and I want to build it. You can even pay me in food if you want. I don't give a fuck.
Chin up Cumbria. Literally.
Got to a mate's, someone asks "Whats that in your beard?". It was a noodle from dinner
if /r/unixporn has taught my anything its that everybody uses arch and i3wm. Also, I guess, everybody likes terminals that look like GUIs
neighbours having a loud party. This is not how I wanted to live my life
Theres a dude in the office looking at a list of the best bars to drink alone in. I should say something.
`$ cd /usr/ports/**/tmux` &lt;- there has to be an easier way. I'm missing something fundamental here
Lesson learned at lunch: nobody can walk down a windy street eating an egg and cress sandwich with any degree of dignity. Nobody.
Unless I can get 9fs opened on the corp firewall (yeah, right) then plan9 isn't going to work here; I need sources tree for SSH v2 for git.
I wonder how many plan9 machine hostnames are a variation on Bela Lugosi
Just put a seatbelt on on a cab. It took a night away to turn into a tourist
First class deserted on a Sunday, I'm going to drink like allll the free tea
Bought my dad a drone for his birthday had a go, flew it in to the house and broke it. Not a skill of mine.
Stuck in smoggy london  traffic en route to the country for fresh air, and not being in traffic
Early train tomorrow (11am) so home to sit and stare at the walls all night. Might do the crossword.
Just had a play with my grappling hook in the office. I am so not mature enough for something this cool. I'm also too bearded to be a ninja.
Duck, kale and avocado for tea. I want pizza.
After an afternoon trying to play guitar I can honestly say the women of the world probably wont be after me just yet
Yawn and think about a nap. Puzzled. Look at clock; its nearly 3 and I've only had one cup of coffee today. Huh.
Charity that lets you bequeath money to the dairy industry. Where there's a will there's a whey
Greek toasties: feta off bread
Bought a guitar today. Girls had better like me now or I'm out of ideas
Christ almighty; tampon tax to pay for women's refuges? How do you even parody a parody? Bleed-to-bleed?
There is no part of java development that is fun, simple or easy. What the fuck is maven and why is it xml?
Problem with working from home is that the kitchen is just down the hall
This week I'll be largely writing dropwizard APIs. Seriously: fuck java
This is the latest I've been in the office for a long time. Mind, I did slink in at 1045
Yeah! Meeting Time! ...said nobody ever
SOME OF THE REFUGEES MIGHT BE TERRORISTS! BAN REFUGEES! SOME PEOPLE WITH GUNS KILL PEOPLE! DON'T YOU DARE BAN GUNS!
Going to go poke around Hawker House, eat too much and, spill sauce all down myself, and try and not drink the gallons I know I will
"Yeah I'll have a gram of big-bloke, please" -&gt; gets shot by drug-dealer who has seen brass-eye too many times
Hungry House just emailed to remind me that I spent last Friday night in eating Chinese, and to see if I'm that sad this week. I probably am
YES! Smash Mouth's first album! How did I forget about this?
Sit down to watch King of the Hill season 10 on prime, realise "Holy Shit I've spent about 150 quid on King of the Hill last few weeks".
Treating myself to friday night minicab home in rush hour was idiotic
Poor addison lee driver. Its not even six and I'm in his car breathing beery fumes everywhere
Took longer to clean than to make. Sit down time, dream of beers. homebrew
Got a good hoppy boil on, kit disinfected. A lot of mess homebrew
Brewday 2015: home smells like bullion hops
I AM THE GREATEST PROGRAMMER WHO SITS IN MY SEAT
Something I just realised: because I was off sick when it was taught in year 3 I have no idea how to do long division. Just never needed it.
Me and two girls getting ready. Smells like a whorehouse in here, but thats because i wear this aftershave when i go see your mum.
From the Daily Mirror. "How to make a FREE lifelong carrier bag by using your jacket to avoid 5p charge"... yeah...
EMERGENCY: THIS WINDOWS VM AT WORK HAS LOTUS NOTES PREINSTALLED
This morning's work: hammer windows until it looks like linux so I can use bash, emacs and cli git. Or I'll go nuts instead
Weird trip down memory lane: searching keyservers for my old gpg keys
Can't imagine standing in a stadium full of pissed up people singing a song about my Grandma but Wills and Harry seem happy enough RWC2015
Crying baby at Monmouth before I'm caffeinated. Second worst place and time for a crying baby, behind getting methadone at the chemist
Just got my dockerised emacs running via gotty so I can edit from my browser. I'm not sure why, though.
Has somebody swapped out the coffee for decaf at Old Trafford in BT sport studio? Seen more enthusiasm in a hospice
De Gea would have had that
I'M WATCHING SPACE JAM
Jobspec through, 350 quid/day. RHEL 5 and Solaris 9. You're missing a 0 on that rate, that sounds terrible
Presumably if you pee on one of those hydrophobic walls at an angle it wont hit you. Seems like a waste of money.
Figure out the difference between what people are asking for and the actual problem they're trying to solve sysadminsecrets sysadminDay
ooerr:

Step 2 : ADD 001_esg_startup.patch /tmp/
 ---&gt; dead185980a9
Can't patch something properly because this fucking stupid config file has a load of lines starting with a minus sign.
oomkiller kicking in, grep the logs: 'grep: memory exhausted'. Oh yeah, that seems obvious
Disabled 0/ins key on my numpad. Benefit: no longer accidentally put emacs in ovwrt. Drawback: can't type 0 on numpad
Those are England's best cricketers? Ashes2015
What the fuck? A graphical installer with a big ol' ad on it?
Datastax opscenter installer is an ELF binary. Get stuffed.
I think my neighbour has bought a penny whistle or a recorder. BUGGER OFF, IT'S TOO WARM FOR ME TO COME AND SHOUT AT YOUR STUPID IDIOT FACE
In the pub playing a game of "daughter, young looking missus, or paying for sex with children" when middle aged men and teen girls walk in
First time the fans on my meaty, beefy laptop have really whirred was generating a comparatively small amount of rdoc just now.
Metasyntactic variables in tests: good or bad?
GO ON ENGLAND. stick to hockey, Canada, you were done
Fucking Bronze
Cracking goal that
I actually managed to get both monitors working on arch first time. What is this magic?
Python/pip is painful on arch; pacman craps its self when it finds files installed by pip when its trying to install.
Getting a cab home from Soho is such a pain. They always assume you're a tourist. WHY ARE WE GOING THIS WAY OVER ALDWYTCH???
I don't like to see hold-up play at all, but England are bossing it in that far corner
What a strike
How on Earth have I never played around with llvm/ IR Builder before? This is crazily simple
From Wednesday to being big in Japan. Good fucking work England
As with every hungover project: "i should probably write a test for that". Screw it, I'm drinking
Policeman on a bike reading the riot act to a motorist at lights on Tower Bridge road. Pulls out right in front of a car and gets bipped.
Blatter gone? Didn't expect that
Error: Task compile requires a function that is a function

Yeah okay gulp
chmod u+s $(which npm).

What could possibly go wrong?
I find my self turning more and more into Ignatius Reilly as Boondock Saints goes on, shouting "what the Hell is this?" at the screen.
I've eleven or twelve micro-usb cables but the one time I actually need a mini-usb? Not a one. Why does my camera only have micro-usb?
Christ Georgia, cheer the fuck up Eurovision2015
Romanian yewtree have been looking for this guy. Somebody call Interpol Eurovision2015
A hot Latvian love injection. Where's the microphone stand coming from? Eurovision2015
Ilsa, she wolf of the Eurovision2015
Christ, I nicked a biscuit as a kid too but you don't see me on a stage pissing and moaning about it Eurovision2015
It's never a skinny blonde singing about what's inside,is it. Eurovision2015
Are all Armenians Satanists? Or just this coven? Eurovision2015
Will this has winner written all over it. See you in not London next year. Fun though. Eurovision2015
Estonia's premier George Michael lookalike got lost on the way to Estonia's got talent. His mate has talent. Two of them.
Wahey it's 2002
The French reminding the rest of Europe what an Austrian did to them in the 40s
I swear we used to have those net curtains growing up in Westcliff.
I have never, ever, ever managed to get wanderlust to work on emacs.
If we can get another 13 or so we night just setup next season
Neighbour just came to pick up a parcel. I had my flies down. And not in a subtle way. Hiya Neighbah!
Anybody know of same-day coffee delivery in London? I had some on delivery thats gone missing
Did Theresa seriously just say that now the coalition is over they're going to push through more intercept powers for intelligence agencies?
Carswell is a saggy faced twat
Clacton: where everybody is a fucking racist, apparently. Had hoped otherwise, doubtful as it was.
Simon Hughes is about to cry. Justice minister gone after 30 years. Christ
How stupid do you reckon Cleggy feels?
Christ Gove is dull and evasive. Probably a good whip, just a terrible talking head
We've all voted that Nige should bugger off, right?
Power nap and election coverage I reckon.
How is it that none of the national outlets seems to explain that in a representative democracy you vote for an MP, not the potential PM?
I'm done with catching-up with puppet. What a piece of crap.
Every time I write puppet I think "What the f- have you done to make ruby look like perl"
Not much to say about that really. Villa just looked like they gave a crap
Hit a macro key when trying to create a rackconnect config and named it "git push". "This policy already exists". Obviously not first time.
TIL: uptime is the kernel uptime, not the machine uptime. Thus kexec resets this to 0. Guess start time is stored in kernel mem.
Doing The Dark Side of the Moon test with my new cans. Already 'Speak to me' is vibrating and knocking my head around into travel sickness.
Just passed a little tug pulling Thunderbird 4
Rotherhithe: young, in love couple serenely sniffing flowers on river bank. Little boy runs up, starts booting the Hell out of the flowerbed
Got home to find I'd left my keys at work. Of course I don't have weekend access to office anymore. Phone dead booked into hotel for weekend
Putting a load of internal RPMs into S3 has turned into me sitting writing Tcl and wondering how I go there.
cold baozi is crap
dhcpd stopped working on my arch box. Had to manually setup IPs and routes. It never leaves you
This is why I don't bring my work laptop home. I'm sitting in front of the tv, building cloudformation stacks. I've been working 16 hours.
I suspect somebody clever and/or funny has put decaf in the coffee maker. Everyone looks half dead and I reckon I'm about to pass out
Just bought my first grown up shoes ever. No more walking boots or trainers. I have shoes.
I put a disclaimer up about our project using a lot of Navy metaphors. That should do the trick.
Pub quiz, only got three of the four inns of court. An a level wasted
My desk drink: a strong latte with a double espresso on top. I call it the James special because, its hot, strong and nothing like me
Fuck. We were going to go to West Ham tonight
Writing my own container specification because I'm awesome. Anybody have any suggestions beyond "tar'd chroot, text cgroup schema'?
I've come back from Xmas holidays a day early. Oops.
Hoppy IPA and a couple of drops of Tabasco. Tastes great. I call it a Bloody Skippy.
*Definitely* regret using my wok to smoke sausages.
The average person has sex 94 times a year. I can't wait for today.
Cab home. Nice to leave the quiet, peace and fresh air of the country for the noise and congestion of the city.
I reckon it's worst to lie across a couch and feel someone's residual arse heat than sit on warm loo. Especially younger step-sis' arse heat
The annual 'bugger, my clothes have holes and I'm seeing family tomorrow' sew-and-darn-athon evening. Rock and roll.
I should *not* have left my Xmas shopping until the last possible moment. Its going to be a long afternoon
Xmas project (Since football is over for the season). A honeypot that just takes everything and nginx mod to redirect users there at will.
Being off work I've only just realised its Friday night. I'm sitting in shorts and tshirt, headphones in, trying to get my stuff to compile.
I can't believe I'm the only person who thinks that having to install devel packages and gcc on a prod box to install json.gem is mad
Reason 37 why I can't wait for Xmas time off: Arguing a rails whenever/cronjob  should log to STDOUT because 'Unix' and caring.
I missed baking and making sandwiches. Today: fresh bread filled with last night's koftas and smeared in mustard.
I really wish I could exclude live albums when playing artist's back catalogue in spotify.
Whenever I face that problem that can only really be solved with some kind of webapp I have to psych myself up to use rails. Then I love it.
Just got home from work. Back in first thing. Luckily I have Friday off
It astonishes me how many people in the office iron a sharp crease into their shirt sleeves. Looks cheap and like it just came out packaging
More tv or bed and a book? Trick question: jar of bostick and slumping in a corner. Looking forward to time off.
Email from my gitlab box telling me somebody added a key to my account when at pub. ssh in, sudo poweroff. What a time to be alive
Working from home: The only time I'm still at my desk past 6 on a friday
TIL: My computer speakers suddenly work again. After blasting metallica to the office when my headphones weren't plugged in
How I know its a friday: strace -f /etc/init.d/pgpool-II-92 start
To this day I'm still both massively surprised and a little giddy whenever a query with weird joins that I've hand written work first time.
I'm definitely doing something wrong. I wonder what....

tail -"$(( $(wc -l $F | awk '{print $1}') - 2 ))" $F
Just got F'd in the A by POSIX compliance and, to an extent, rvm warning messages.
Gluten free flatbreads always look like horrible plasticine before they go in the pan. Then, suddenly, indistinguishable from the real deal.
Its my day off and I'm sitting at home hoping that work don't realise I'm not unwell. I booked this off a week ago for christ's sake.
Tomorrow's lunch: spaghetti sandwich. Because I just don't care anymore.
Just made flatbread and hummus. I'll share if anybody brings beer or wine
Today I think I'm going to do nothing but eat lentils, drink tea and watch cartoons in my jammies
Top 20 in the pub quiz. Suck it Bamber
Cheers for the deflection. Again.
Got our new awesome mesos production cluster up. Its a pity I can't get anything to run on it
What is it with fucking java developers and fucking config control? How can you fuck it that bad? I'm looking at you Apache Zookeeper.
3rd of November and I've already got a bit of a ginger moustache going. I can stop now.
Today's sandwich: bone marrow, steak, lettuce in chili oil and garlic sauce. No clue what I was doing when I made this
Has anybody ever actually bought somebody a Skype gift card for somebody's birthday?
When it comes to web development I'm anti-semantic
Despite different parts of the atom install obeying different combos of $TMP, $TMP_DIR and $TMPDIR I'm quite impressed. Next: emacs bindings
New benchmark: how long it takes emacs to fix the indentation of it's own autoconf configure script.
According to google Christopher Wren designed the Churchill Museum. In Missouri.
Balo is dogshit in front of an open goal
Bloody hell, I only nipped out to make a cuppa
I can't figure out whether QPR are playing out of their collective skin or Liverpool are terrible
Sunday morning is a cup of tea and toast from fresh-from-the-oven bread
Phone just auto corrected 'Danish' with 'sammich'. Awesome.
Just set my kitchen on fire; had to do the wet tea towel on a pan trick. DRAMA! I definitely almost died
Walk home? Nope, after work drink means a rickety cab home
9 hours, production stack moved to an entirely new architecture and set of kit.
Aaaand... first one in the office. Do I win a prize?
Nearly got beaten up by a hairdresser. A lot of hairdressers could probably beat me up, mind; just not this kid
Atkinson you bottle job
You, madam, are an insect and a platypus.
Fourth time starting Carmen today after not managing to finish it yesterday. If I have to restart it today I'm going and working from pub
Hitler's speech writer: grammar Nazi. Boom.
This afternoon I will mainly be listening to Maria Callas in Carmen and fighting redises
Another night at the windmill
Harry Potter and the time he made Jesus shout his own Dad's name out
There *has* to be a more semantically correct way in varnish to send a 200 than 'error 200 "Some message";'
I do not feel *as* bad about to losing to West Ham yesterday.
Oh cool the fortnightly ninja-github-permission-revoking happened on Friday, right on time.
Writing seed data. Almost as fun as rspec.
Goodbye hangover, hello spunge
Plan was to watch the results until 1ish, sleep, wake up for results, go to work. Its now 4am
A recruiter just emailed about 'that illusive(sic) greener grass'. I felt duty bound to explain what 'the grass is always greener' means.
Oh look, once again we have no working rackconnect
The cleaners moved my keyboard an inch overnight and I haven't caught up. Its a day for 'git ass .'
Today is definitely Yacht Rock Friday
Twitter is brilliant today; indyref coverage containing a nod to one of my favourite films (Titfield Thunderbolt) and books (Scoop).
Another Funding Circle app gets the Docker treatment. An hour and a half from rake and cap to production ready.
$ unalias rm

Strap in love, I'm Devops and Disorderly.
Just seen a helicopter carrying a sports car with another chopper with a frontmounted camera. Unfortunately the car didn't drop in the river
Hammy!
Arrested Development has all of favourite cartoon characters
The non-locking door at work is like an intelligence test. Some ring the buzzers, some try to swipe. I, and a couple others, just pushed.
"How about we get you out of those wet clothes and into a dry Martini?" "I'll just have a dressing gown and a mug of whisky if thats cool"
Got absolutely drenched on walk home. From now on its raincoats and hats
My cabbie is listening to radio 3. THANK YOU JEEBUS
Old Victorian Proverb: A watched iptables output never gets yanked out by RackConnect
Watching rugrats and seeing the year... I'm the same age as Angelica
Stay up all night eating tasties, drinking Jura and watching rugrats? Sounds sensible to me.
App idea: people post their postcode and what match they have on and people come round to watch it bringing beer/ food.
Ocado man just ID'd me at the door with their new Challenge 25 thing. I reckon it was more to do with my West Ham shirt and his Milwall tat.
When you're using a mix of socat proxying and 'puts c.ord' to figure out why something is broken you know you're wasting a bankholiday
Why do recruiters always email: "I've a role, get in touch if interested". Money. Location. Bonuses. Thats all anyone wants to know.
Balotelli, but made of cheese. Why always brie?
Cats. But that like burying bones.
Found in old code:
scorers = Array.new
Oops
Today I have been a desktop support guy, a security forensics bod, a (poor) developer, a hardware guy and mucked about in docker. Knackered.
Why the absolute fuck are openssh and openssh-clients dependencies of fucking GCC?
Just asked cabbie if he was listening to Chelsea match and he turned it down. Ta mate.
"That's a great head you have.. it would go really nicely on my wall of heads"
Christ, United are already in the relegation zone.
Fighting java and cassandra can only mean one thing. Steel Panther day
Another Sunday night in front of a pile of ironing. I used to be so much cooler
Just got in with the nicest cabbie
One of the things I love about emacs is that `replace-string` will swap 'format' with 'collect' and 'Format' with 'Collect'.
Nothing kills my enthusiasm for a project than sitting and writing rspec
Just had an email from a recruiter: "My client use all the latest Open Source software including java"
People watching 5134: a ginger couple sitting opposite one another on matching iPads with those daft fold-out-covers-cum-stands.
They're now doing trivial pursuit.and mentally I'm getting them all. UNIVERSITY OF LIFE
Since effete sounding student twat with a Oxbridge uni drawl is talking about dessert wine tasting. This is it; I'm going to glass the idiot
I count three of us, all sitting alone, all nursing our pints, all staring out the window in a row of four tables in this pub. Anti-social.
The pub I'm at does a burger called 'the Big Ben burger'. I'VE JUST COME TO CAMBRIDGE FROM LONDON, IDIOTS; SELL ME THE BRIDGE OF FRIES!
There are only two types of people in Cambridge: middle class white girls with that horrible Oxbridge drawl, and tourists
TIL: You have to press the steam button on the iron when filling the tank to avoid air-bubbles. TEFAL R&amp;D YOU BASTARDS
Irons are one of *the*most poorly designed and engineered things ever. I'm going to have to do a dyson I think.
What I like to think of as my Mediterranean day: couple of beers out, sleep in the afternoon, bottle of wine on the balcony by the river now
Just seen a pigeon try and fly between son's railings in the pub and bounce back, looking confused. That's why we're top of the food chain
This is what happens when you hire a Stewart Pearson over a Malcolm Tucker ConDemNation
They keep saying 'learnings' in this three hour meeting. THAT'S NOT A WORD!
Sysadmin time: using pushd and popd to avoid broken shell builtins on a box at work. Good interview question?
In most languages shelling out with an exec() seems like cheating. In golang it is so delightfully awkward it feels acceptable.
Spent an hour in the rain to watch the TDF2014 riders pass by work. 25 seconds of lycra. Cracking.
Not only have I scored as many goals at the 2014 World Cup finals as Fernando Torres I'm probably more likely to score in 2018 World cup too
Listen son, I was working in this industry when we called it IT &amp; everyone thought we were weird. Peddle your social working crap elsewhere.
"What are England doing wrong Glenn?" "Well they obviously haven't hired the right team spiritualist".
Jagielka has been our Casillas. ENG
Iraq insurgency predictable? Well thanks for shouting up, dickhead.
I've got Summertime Lovin' (Lovin' in the Summertime) from RegularShow stuck in my head.
If the ref thinks it's a penalty he has to give a red there. Goalscoring opportunity and in on goal bbcworldcup
Pity about Rik Mayall; I really liked him in the first series of Pop Idol
Has anybody ever realised that the world cup practise matches aren't as important as world cup matches? Crazy!
How dull do the AQA books look? There is a great legacy of good, funny and accessible 20th century lit. missing. Wodehouse? Waugh? Sharpe?
I'm sick of French bread taking the place of honest crusty cob at Waitrose WhyImVotingUkip
This weekend I learned a valuable lesson in homebrewing during summer. I feel an engineering project coming on.
Oh Putin you sent little 17 year old girls in? Lambs to the slaughter Eurovision
I could see the idiots at ukip getting in after this debacle Eurovision
How are the blooming Dutch ahead of us? Eurovision
Send the Fucking troops in Cameron Eurovision
Oh Christ, please no votes for Russia anymore....the boos are ruining my buzz Eurovision
Fuck's sake France Eurovision
Awww Molly! Eurovision
At what point does this become racist? Eurovision
Oh this guy has never been proven have fucked a child then what the hell have we been paying taxes for? OperationYewtree
TeamIceland Eurovision
Boudicea is doing quite well Eurovision
If San Marino get an entry then I'm putting myself forward to represent Southwark next year. Eurovision
Are they going to pay sting his royalties for singing over "every breath you take"? Or just tell him to tantrically frig off? Eurovision
This is saccharine bollocks. Eurovision
Do they go in for scrumping in Malta? Eurovision
Go home Graham, you're drunk Eurovision
I'll bet this guy whistles while he pees at a urinal twat Eurovision
Soft engine? That probably means something different in Finland Eurovision
Wahey! Keytar time! Eurovision
Unless Russia bust out some Putin masks and spit on one another they're not going anywhere Eurovision
No wonder the Germans got in 70 odd years ago. Just managed to walk right in Eurovision
Ulrika-ka-ka-ka Eurovision
Germany not looking to host next year? Eurovision
Getting a real buffalo bill vibe Eurovision
"This is for the hetero men out there whose partners well let them vote for us! Watch us churn butter" Eurovision
Something for the dad's Eurovision
If this guy was your teacher he'd constantly tell you he was proud of you Eurovision
This guy wants to suck. Your blood. He wants to suck your blood. Eurovision
I don't think he is playing that piano... Eurovision
WHERE THE FUCK DID MISS ROMANIA JUST GO??? Eurovision
Next up, Daz from Iceland. Eurovision
How fun are Iceland?? Eurovision
Sergeant Iceland's lonely hearts club ZZ top Eurovision
Oh look, enya brought her pan pipes to Eurovision
Wow ! Everyone? European, Asian *and* Australians?
Before I go through the hell of compiling does anybody know if firefox with X11 exists anymore on OSX? Want to sort xvfb and cucumber
When is a senior developer not a senior developer? When every other developer is a one too. We've more seniors than an mid-sized OAP home.
England's women playing a big match in Shrewsbury? Oi, Greg: we have B teams.
Sick of 'sugar-free/caffeine-free' soft drinks. I'm not drinking this muck for it's health benefits. I'm drinking for the sugar and caffeine
Oh Liverpool
Do let new know if you were at Hogwarts at the same time as me and had to deal with the so-called 'peeking pervert' in the school loos
Liverpool have been dog shit today
I can't be the only person to find sky go consistently bad, can I? I've just didn't the last twenty minutes clicking okay, then refresh.
Sit down Chelsea, nobody is listening
ITS EDAM AND CHIVES NOT EDAM AND CHEESE, EDAM AND CHIVES NOT EDAM AND CHEESE
Whenever Bon Scott sings "You had my picture on your bedroom wall, next to Gary Glitter" in 'Little Lover' I always wonder "How little?"
Good session teaching the codecrafters today; 'everything is a file', character devices, named pipes, inodes. Had them chef'ing and cap'ing.
Next Weeks MoS; Our reporter rounded up an armed govt militia to protect non-existent sheep from Wolf that wasn't even there! Taxes at work!
Anybody fancy coming over for a pizza and bottle of wine?
Don't get cocky James, don't get cocky...
5...
Has to be said, looked a crap corner until it went in
Come on Liverpool jft96
Hole in the bedroom window, storm coming in, emergency glass fitter not answering his phone
Unclogging a compacted vacuum cleaner hose should always be done *outside*. Living room is now destroyed.
Chromium? Opera? Which plays better on ArchLinux? Pretty sure my laptop is at least bisexual; too many male-to-male connectors for Firefox
/etc/ssh/sshd_config has no 'includes' directive? You mean it wasn't written with people in mind? Really? You shock me voice in my head.
Deja vu: if anybody sees my wife please tell her to come or let me know she is alright
24 hours after getting home from Scotland and my wife is still humming 'loch lomond' and 'flower of Scotland'
Three rivers, two countries. Today I have driven over the Clyde, the Nith and the Thames
Virgin trains cockup puts me into euston at 10 past 10, to late to get dinner in and having to get breakfast on way in tomorrow
Part two of the journey to Scotland begins. Let's hope tonight's hotel is better than last night's
Me: is sausage a pet name you can get behind? Wife: no, I've never liked any of the pet names you've given me. Like dickhead.
Always an exciting match
Just got a call from a recruiter on a Sunday afternoon, during the football. There's a firm I'll never use again.
If the kids next door keep playing such crap dance music I'm going to take the hoover bag I just replaced and pop in it their face(s)
After a busy week I've spent the night dreaming in chef and capistrano.
Took my wife out for dinner. She threw up in a glass
Yo Russia, did you not get the joke? Men's only double luge? I thought the double toilets would be a tipoff SochiFail
"Come with me if you want to live in a three bedroom semi in Poole"-what I'd day if I was a terminator estate agent in Poole
Danish bacon, Danish bacon, yummy yummy yummy yummy yum yum yum
Digital ocean, openvpn, Netflix US. It's all worth it to watch Good Burger.
Flipping heck
Dear advertisers, please stop saying "interweb". You sound like idiots and it puts me off buying from you. Put it back wherever you got it.
Hopefully I'm not alone in this, but if I stop out of the way of someone walking the opposite way down a narrow space I'd like a thanks.
Cabs can use the bus lane? Hell yes! Soon be home!
Taking a box down for maintenance which has an uptime of 359 days feels like it should be a sin
Eli: "are you being racist". Me: "...no? I'm being funny. What race did you think I was insulting?" Eli: "I dunno, chinese, indian, french"
I can't overemphasise how much I hate target='_blank'.I Decide when I want to open a new page/tab/laptop lid. Not you, bad web designer.
Now I remember what I was badly doing before my holiday: raise Fuggery::Rackspace::DoingStuff, "Already snapshotting something"
Back to work tomorrow. I've not been up before 11 for the last week or so. Bugger.
Not only did I win a line on musical bingo I won a bag of sweets for getting an after eight from my forehead to my mouth handsfree. BUTLINS!
A quick curtain twitch shows six dinner jacket/ bow tie combinations in the flats around me.
You know the problem with your opensource program? Nobody wants to compile it or install the interpreter. Now go outside you sad weirdo.
Cat, car and penis; the three English words I can say in Russian. Or at least that I can shout at my mother-in-law at the dinner table.
Ending christmas with two or three pints of water. Too little too late, but hopefully the placebo effect will balance it out.
Only had one and a half christmas tantrums round my house today. One more and I'm sending my wife to bed.
Is led zep 4 a good choice of album to play your wife/ mother-in-law on their first english xmas morning? Asking for a friend.
Wish me a happy christmas and I'll smack you in the gob
Load of fat yanks just walked in, all loud mouths and baseball caps. That muggy toothy mouth that never manages to close properly.
The man at nisa just put a copy of the s*n in my bag. Don't think so mate
The great porn filter blocks childine? Good! Stops the little buggers grassing.
And even before that: Van der vaart, Pieenar, Kranjcar. Its a series of bad choices from the board down. Spurs haven't the team
Hell: Bale for Paulinho, Soldado and Lamela? None of them have looked close to performing how they used to
I think sacking AVB was a bad move; with the way their last two/three transfer windows went how can you expect any better result?
Two nuns on a bus, one turns to other and says "these cobbles make me feel weird", the other says "we'll have nun of that". wordplay
What if instead of wobbly strings the universe was made of tiny chains of dinosaurs? Also: this glue is amazing.
But it turns out everyone is dogs. All dogs, all the way to the top. Canine false flag. And its not tuna, its dogs
Tin of tuna, rooftop, cat v dolphin. Maybe a speedboat chase.c
Definitely a ginger beard day
Oh brilliant. Italy.
Sometimes I do stuff in capistrano and can't work out whether I'm a flipping genius or a flipping prat
Flat: cleaned. Dinner: booked. Tea: refilled.
The next time I walk down St Saviours at half ten and its locked I'm going to burn down every building after locking the residents in.
Holy shit, one turned to his mate and said "what times the evening fair, Gareth?" The CoE is brilliant!
There are two vicars at the pub drinking triple gins.
Could have come early, but noooo.... I had to be big, hard and clever and join a 3mile queue at the post office.
Headphones fell out of my phone, treated the street to a blast of Goldfinger. The band, not the bond theme.
Sunday roast: done. Washing: done. The afternoon is mine!
Marked the wrong horse, got a tenner on Keen Eye at Exeter. Would be a bit of a fairytale that one.
Poppies... Didn't these things used to not suck? Now they last two days before falling apart.
Surely there has to be a better way: "rseed := rand.New( rand.NewSource(  time.Now().UTC().UnixNano() ) )" golang
Has anybody found a good Go mode for emacs?
I had a bloody ticket for this
Arang on Golden Square. Christ they do good beef!
Sitting in Microsoft's London office on my mac, using google and playing with my android phone. I feel like I'm taking the mick now.
Just leaving work. Its been... Emotional. What a day. What a busy, difficult day.
"Interrogate a running process' env vvars' 'redirect stdout on a running background process'- two evil questions I just asked an interviewee
Treating myself to dinner out. I miss my wife. In less depressing news I hear that syrian stuff is working its self out.
Need the loo badly but there's a large american lady with a large camera taking photos in the way.
Out for dinner and drinks after two days laid up poorly. This may be a really stupid move. Haven't decided yet
Can't work out if Kreayshawn is a two dimensional parody or skincrawlingly sincere.
New rule: you blow smoke on/near me I'm going to trump on you. Get *that* smell out of your hair.
TIL: If I leave the headphones in my Blackberry Bold the alarm plays through them. How did that not get found in testing?
Wednesday evening. A bottle of beer, some crap sitcom and emacs full of python. I'm 17 again. Its ace.
Never stayed in a hotel with a phone next to the loo. Its the little things.
St Pauls, a family of tourists ask me where Russel Square is. There is no chance they remembered my directions...its not the simplest walk
Was going to do a "today I will be doing..." tweet before realising how twattish my day sounded
So apparently not only are the City Police real coppers but female officers really, *really* don't like being called sugar tits.
Pepe Reina loan is just stupid
Office closed for powercut, no laptop, forgot to push my work yesterday. Great start.
Postgres has no lock database? What the fuck is this shit?
At the sort of italian when you have to apologise to the owner for not finishing your pizza.
Fielding is terrible; legside needed for Rogers
First day at work done!
Dear anyone developing for Linux. Write. Fucking. Man. Pages. I can't stress this enough. Man pages. Write them. You fucking turds.
Party boats are the worst part of living on the Thames. They should be better regulated; especially for the volume at which they play music.
Le pont de la tour, good wine, my beautiful wife. The perfect end to my unemployment week.
I am the slinky on the bottom step. I fall, I pick myself up but one day it will end.
Every Wordpress bug I read my first thought is "Its FOSS: just fix it". Then I read the Wordpress contribution guide and laugh instead.
Today I've been a prick with a camera. I'm putting photographer on my linkedin now so people know I'm artsy.
One of the best parts of feeding word lists to your computer is watching it come up with phrases like 'Mutinous Bitch'.
Leaving drinks were good; definitely going to hate getting up tomorrow!
Rocking the geek credentials: my handover docs are being distributed as latex files in a git repo.
Even more clever; she has stopped saying my name and keeps repeating "angry birds"
Ah ha! Sneaky! Now she keeps dropping my name in...I reckon she might be onto me
I love when my wife pretends to be speaking Russian. Flubbalibski shibbadibba. She doesn't realise I know she's making it all up.
Casting integers to strings to pass test but make more work casting back later. THIS IS TDD BITCHEZ
Friday night in, no drinking is going well enough. Not sure how people do this, though.
Why must people constantly and consistently misuse the word 'amend'? If you mean change then use change. Mean correct? Use correct. (etc.).
Just put in a four hour shift in the kitchen. Lots of food for the next week/ 10days and half way done.
Just so you're all as aware the US Govt. Today I plan on looking at some very sketchy/ graphic pictures, then look up smoke bomb recipes.
When the hell did the Welsh turn into a drinking nation?
Tom Sharpe died; thats a pity- he was my favourite novelist
A load of people with tents and bags on Finsbury Square again. Who wants to go smack some hippies?
I might have a little bit set a small child on fire. Has anyone a foreign passport I can use?
Is there anywhere as unlovely as Stevenage?
"There a £10 limit for card so can I put that through and give you change in cash?" Yes! YES! Why don't all pubs do this? Only in Yorkshire.
Afternoon at Jorvik and a big hot chocolate/ choc fondue. Now a bath and read my Bradshaws.
Walking into the hotel to find a ready bottle of champagne was the summing up point of the week
Claustrophobia and a packed train! Touring the loos now to see if I can get some time and start chilling out.
Sennheiser CX299s and the AU Lab app on my mac just smashed the Dark Side of The Moon test. Highs a little disappointing on Time, though.
Tomorrow morning is going to be a struggle; I'm up too late :(
I am Poop. James Poop.
Today's plan: buy a job-lot of foil food containers for food storage/ packups. And then make a job lot of food to go in them.
Mary Poppins and Bert... What was really going on there?
My wife now thinks we won WW2 with magical suits of armour, witches and murder she wrote.
Apparently windows 2k3 doesn't support SNMPv3, nor does windows 2k8. One more reason this piece of bloat OS is not fit for purpose.
Commons backs Gay Marriage? Excellent, no longer are we scum we also can look the French in the eye again. The French.
QA is a lie!
Perhaps a misunderstanding of the process but why can't a mortgage site ask my earnings, savings and give me rough ideas on what I can get?
Social media accounts for one's pets: cry for help? Or sign of a fucking mental regression?
Strap yourself in love, I've had a redbull, two Es and my curry is still too hot to eat. One friday night special coming up.
We've 'helped liberate' so many Middl Eastern countries but at no point have we decided to talk about sending anyone into Syria.
Bugger: please disregard that, it was meant to be a text to my wife
Strap yourself in love, I'm going to nip for a poo and then we'll have some sex.
Oh for fuck's sake John Terry, again? Jesus Christ!
skint on C4 is almost exactly how I remember being a teen in scunthorpe. Remarkable!
Thank god for 4+1!
Stoke v Spurs is very tasty and its still early. Might go 2all
Just paid Arti Mathanda some money
Simplybot! *THIS* is a sweaty nerdgasm tweet. Sweaty. Nerdgasm.
Someone at work gave away my graze box. On the one hand its a graze box. On the other it was mine. I might fuck today off and go to the pub.
On a day like this we're waiting on the washer repair man. We've been waiting a month for this idiot. Between 12 and 6. Awesome.
A weekend long orgy for charity: "Fuck Cancer". I'm kicking arse at this marketing event.
Almost half of the dinner bill went on a bottle of pop. Times like this I'm glad my wife drinks slowly!
Cinematic starts to games: no! Let me grab a character and just get on with it
Standing in my pants doing my best Bob Dylan impression. My wife looks at me laughs wryly and says "I can't wait for you to meet my parents"
The Great Gatsby; shot in 3D with a Jay Z soundtrack. BAZ LUHRMAN! ONE JOB! ALL YOU HAD WAS ONE JOB! I'm going to burn the cinema down.
Whenever I get a receipt which curtly reminds me service charge is not included I smile to my self and say "Yep, you're damn right its not"
Statement from the FA: "Sod racism, its biting which is the largest threat to Football in 2013"
Two police in *gloves* manhandling a drunk. They threw his bundle in a skip. The audience are baying for blood and the manager calls peace.
strace -f $command - thats how you know a sysadmin is stuck. Rabbitmq on centos is a Chinese Finger Trap
The French have allowed gay marriage. THE FUCKING FRENCH! Aren't we supposed to be better than them? Fucking Agincourt? This is terrible!
Would somebody tell that guy to watch his mike? Boston
Boston Police: two suspects pulled over, handcuffs, bomb squads. Five tactical units deployed to the streets, officers told to ditch hi-viz
Oh bloody hell Rolf. All you had to do was shake a bit of a card. A BIT OF BLOODY CARD.
To the people who changed the code and gave me a dud fob for the front door: I hope you die horribly.
In the pub and a Russian person said something Russian. AND I FUCKING KNEW WHAT THEY SAID! Even my wife was impressed. And she is Russian.
A group of rich white boys sitting in the park, drinking vodka and listening to Bob Marley. Isn't that the babylon reggae fought against?
My wife is stuck in the toilet after I told her me asking what she said wasn't aggression and was me not hearing.
Reading want a minutes silence before the Liverpool match for Thatcher. On the 24th anniversary of Hillsborough.
Blimey Malaga! That wasn't a strike that was a Winter of Discontent. ThatcheriteHumour
No minutes silence at Old Trafford for Thatcher? I am shocked and appalled!
Everything I won yesterday wiped out; I don't know why I bet on the national
My wife has gone her entire life having never seen grease. That's about to be changed.
What on earth is that line oxford are taking?
Why can Javascript dweebs not write documentation? Is that sense replaced with how to wear plaid shirts and write everything with crayons?
Anyone know when I should expect the boats at Rotherhithe? boatrace
Is it me or does Spotify now only allow you to shuffle in the album you're in, instead of an artist's back catalogue?
Sunderland proving once again that there is something in the water up there. Incest, I think they call it. Sacking O'Neill- idiot move
Today I shall mainly be nursing my hangover.
Around the time I decided 'to quickly build a sinatra app' I realised I've replaced perl as my go-to language. Which is an end of an era.
Wash up and clean and before you know it the place is a shithole again. No wonder feminism took off.
There's a fucking yank here "just touched down" from the airport because his leg "is a little discoloured". Fuck me this guy is a twat.
No matter what I've done when I'm sitting in casualty I still feel like I'm moaning/ faking britishproblems
NHS closures absolutely fucking did my on my foot. Thank you so much- there will be a tax rebate, yeah?
Now I'm not saying I have, but were I to have spiked the tea urn on the train how much trouble would I be in should the driver drink some?
This carriage is all men in shirts and jeans and jumpers. Myself included. Feel a bit of a ponce.
Why I dont travel first class everytime is beyond me
Edinburgh: the place where dinner costs less than the tourist attractions. Sorry state of affairs.
Could someone ask my wife to get out of the bath? I want to go see some royal mile
Drinking a pint of heavy, as I believe we tourists call the stuff. Like syrup.
At the risk of being 'that guy': "Woo! Holiday starts now!" Also: trumped in the lift.
Earliest I've left for work in years!
"Please un-tick any methods by which you don’t want to be contacted." - Deliverance website.
10mins into England v. Wales and my wife turns to me and says "oh, its rugby? I thought it was football!"
My wife and I with drowned rat hair are sitting and eating korean bbq like a fucking boss and bossette. YEAH!
Ah The Grapes; can always rely on them having a pint of Doombar at a price my mother would pay.
The boss from The IT Crowd is in my local. Aaaaargh!
The one thing  music players need more than anything: a shuffle mode which excludes live albums.
Cyclist just told another one off for being on the path. Very much admire that; faith in humanity restored.
Call it whatever but seeing several monitors filled with big ncurses graphs makes my inner geek grin like a bitch.
Homeless people who look hungry and tired depress me. I wish they would lighten up a bit. Like the rest of us.
This match needs a try. Just not from the Paddies.
40 quid already on this match. A win and thats my night.
Jordan Henderson looks like Lee Evans when he puts on his idiot face and sticks his lips out.
SPIDER?! I 'ardly even know 'er!
Saturday night in rebuilding my Mac. In my defence I did get married yesterday.
Come home to find somebody has left egg encrusted pans in a sink full of bleach. They make them smart round my house.
This referee is an absolute bottle job.
Flower of Scotland is a far, far better anthem than God Save the Queen. Sorry Your Madge
Shouting during a minute's silence for the Busby Babes and Bobby Moore should be a banning from Wembly
Whenever I see a group with cameras in my way I pretend I'm the star, and they the press. Makes it less of a thing to punch them out.
Dzeko you tart
Just been messing with treetop; written a grammar for defining how directories should look on Unix in ruby. Saturday flipping night.
Switching trains at milton keynes to get home quicker. Shrewd.
Step One in out of hours work. Don't set all the alarms off.
Just edged the worlds worst guitarist out of his own band's inlay photo. Fuck you shit guitarist.
These guys would be good if the guitarist wasn't a fucking twat. Running up and down the bar with a wireless kit? No. Rely on your talent.
All this football and I'm at a student gig.
Eli doesn't know jimmy eat fucking world!
My consultant just walked out of one door and back in through the front door. He is supposed to be doing my follow up appointment.
Why did I push you off your bike? Because you shot through a red and it was you or me. Next time I'll stick the boot in too. Stop snivelling
Dear LibreOffice, if I hit the 'change colour' button and start typing I expect to type in that colour. Unbelievable.
No more running. I don't care how fucking good I look in tights I'm done.
An afternoon of Ealing Comedies. Terribly English.
You can do The Macarena to We Come 1. The world must know! (Eli assures me the song is the word 'Wanker' over and over, though).
Can't stop telling offensive jokes with people round. This is really awkward. Grab my phone and tweet instead.
I am the king of VBScript. (Which is something akin to being Head Cattle Botherer or Bus-spotter In Chief)
You can always tell when someone is on a call with a pimp in the office; they walk to the entrance/ stand outside and talk rapidfire.
Chris Foy. Well done that man for not being a coward.
Its okay kicking a 14 year old boy if you get the ball first. What a wanker; ref's report- has to. Scum.
That's my monthly shearing done; head and face very cold but a haircut you could set a shelf to.
Get up Wilshere you tart
Tights: check. Sunglasses: check. Baseball hat: check. Vodka: check. Powerballads: ch-ch-ch-ch-check-cha-check it out
That Ryan Donnelly loves scoring against Dumbarton
That John Baird loves scoring against Hibs
That Shaun Whalley loves scoring against Mansfield
This night has turned for the cultural. Friday night with a choir. They're really good and I feel an scruffy slob
So many students with the next big thing
Being all lean at a startup thing at UCL.
Say neigh to Horsemeat.
All this save HMV bollocks. I'm sorry for the staff but the blame lies with the management. I'm not bailing them out for their mistakes.
"Bugger. *sigh*. Fuck it" - Thats how I know its home time.
Blandings was everything it ought to have been.
Out for dinner. Screaming kids. MUZZLE YOUR WOMB FRUIT. I cannot stresst that enough.
Just got a single whisky in a *shot* glass. A flipping SHOT glass.
I absolutely hate it when people get in a lift to go up a floor. It takes as much time for them to walk and more for me to wait.
I'm done with this cold. Done.
Bradford were spot on; well played. Villa on their best day couldn't have beat them
Bradistan!
Full of  cold, losing voice. If this happened to anyone else at work I'd be leading the piss taking. Its all karmic; must be a big boy.
In Network Engineer mode today; my arm is already covered in switchports and IP addresses.
I just boiled rice for an hour. Fire, smoke, flan like black brick. Burned rice. Yummers.
Norman Bates is his mother. Bruce Willis is dead. ORION IS THE NAME OF THE FUCKING DOG!
Some scally 10 year old girl with the innocent face of a cherub tried to sell me a stolen kids bike.
"The Generation Game" suddenly seems really sad and a horribly foreshadowing name.
Lot of fun, that
Starting to get boring, robot packed away. Obviously not serious
Controlled explosion. Sounded like a firework
Clearing the bridge. Scary stuff.
Bomb robot on Tower Bridge it looks.
Tower bridge locked down, road blocks. Police van at funny angle on road. No clue; looks scary.
Met some absolute characters last night. Saw the night in with the fireworks and then a bottle of bubbles on the southbank.
My bedroom smells like a boudoir; my living room smells like beer. I fear the bathroom will smell like vomit tomorrow.
I love hearing a northern accent; some girl on Embankment just said "chuffin' hell"
Two ladies asleep on me. Pimp or boring?
The more drunk I got and the fewer people there were meant this party of scarily effete got way less Evelyn Waugh
Ah the 'yah, mummy and daddy' people have fucked off and now I'm being the boring one. Time to whip my shirt off and start the conga.
Three cans of stella in and my girlfriend has left for her saturday job. Suddenly fewer evil looks and the reigns have been loosed. Easier.
I'm at the fucking shittest student party. Wine, canapes and blazers. Act like students
I'm not used to being up at this time on a Sunday; I've gone straight to the fridge for a beer and now I have to drink it. Too early.
When everything is all clean and tidy I feel so relaxed.
I just tipped about 7pc. That's embarrassing
Early trek back to London and work. Boxing day service from Scunthorpe (lack thereof) makes coming up a pain in the arse over Christmas.
Dean Whitehead could have killed Reina there. Shouldn't be allowed to play again.
Bob Crow is an absolute waste of skin and life. The man is utterly irredeemable. tfl
Drank far too much last night, still very drunk. Very, very poorly
Me and my 8 year old cousin are trying to settle the great Shanks v Paisley argument. YNWA
My phone doesn't have the word penury in it's dictionary. What on Earth is the... Earth? coming to?
Passing the Emirates on train used to make me feel all Londony. Now I think "for fuck's sake. I could have walked down Upper Street instead"
Standing in the lift scratching my head. Woman in reception thinks I'm waving at her and starts uncomfortably waving back.
Accomplished a lot today; a bag of fresh food, a new plant for my bedroom, a fresh baguette *and* some walking in. As days go its been full.
Enjoying a bottle of bubbles before dinner with the ever beautiful Elizaveta
How many shootings have been stopped by armed good guys? NRA
Toffee is flipping brilliant
Nearly won a prize at work for naming 10 famous gingers. But for naming Ryan Giggs instead of Paul Scholes I would have won.
Next time I hear 'learnings' in a meeting I'm leaving and coming back with a gun. *pop* *pop* "add this to your learnings motherfucker"
First day back at work; hope I remember where they moved my desk.
Trying to act arty and cultured at the Tate Modern. I suspect Eli is about to see right through me.
Will somebody make sure Nasri has his glass of milk in a morning? Starting to get ridiculous.
Little wine left from last night; as soon as midday comes I'm becoming a Lady who Lunches. With a penis (I have one, not lunching with one)
After being sick of having a beard full of food I made the mistake of shaving without having had a haircut. I look like a Mario Mushroom.
"Frank Sinatra: The Vintage Years" on Sky Arts 2? Better go warm up the vocal cords; this is about to get noisy.
These log island iced teas taste like lemon pledge
The plan was to have an early night. I'm up with a fine bottle of the macallan, "Decline and Fall" and a Kate Bush cd. Don't judge me.
I went to bed three hours ago. Here I still am, sitting on the window ledge with my face in a book. Another week off to fill.
I think this entire Elf thing must have passed me by. I really can't find a positive thing about it. Hopefully I'm not the only one.
The Last Starfighter is on Syfy! One of the greatest scifi films ever
The Death of Patrick Moore broke physics. How else can that goal of Rooney's be explained?
Massive dent in my foot where someone stuck a heel in my foot at the christmas party. Was a good night though.
Definitely looking forward to sleeping tomorrow
Two weeks in and several arguments later I finally have a flat pack chest of drawers.
DiMatteo still fucking Chelsea about from beyond the (employment) grave
Neil Lennon looks like he is about to throw up
Gary Hooper you awesome bastard
Oh no, RIP Dave Brubeck. Theres a Take 5 joke in there somewhere.
Just used my Alan Taylor story and my Superfly story to a fit barmaid. May not have worked.
Hey AVB - not looking so smart with the Suarez diving comments now, are you?
Went to go buy flowers; the lovely florist saw my look of confusion/panic and sorted me out. Walked back with a starbucks. Middle Class, no?
There is a strange man looking into my window
Jeremy Irons in Brideshead Revisited on Sky Arts 2? Finally I'm in holiday mode.
Cleaning is done. Now to sit and watch tv and pray for death.
Christ I love football
3am, can't sleep. Nessun Dorma
La boheme, rooibos tea, playstation. A relaxing end to a day of walking.
It always takes me five or so songs listening to Jimmy Eat World before I remember I only like their songs that don't sound like them.
There's a lot of 'MK Dons are bad for football' sentiment. Who sold the team though? Whose fans actually cared, or indeed do now about them?
Latvian folk music is fucked up
Its beaujolais monday; can I go to bed content? Will I be walking to the shop later? Who knows? Who cares?
Determined to get something planned for tomorrow
Bored of my holiday. I want to go back to work. So bored.
Fantastic race; well fought championship. A good year of racing but Vettel deserved it more.
"...Anyway love; now that you're my girlfriend can my mate watch?"
Pouring ones drink before others. Faux pas or major faux pas? Is it important these days? Is chivalry dead? Napping off a beer on the couch?
I've seen more foetuses in formaldehyde today than I ever thought possible.
Half the fun of going to Wasabi for lunch is spending 20minuts rearranging and unpacking the various plastic wrapped components of a meal.
Bloody hell QPR - Mark Hughes was the best manager you could have afforded. You really, really screwed that one up.
River crashing on the old sea wall outside, nice breeze coming in, cartoons on tv, belly full of fry up and a lager. I'm in my happy place.
Feinted a headbutt at him; he soon backed down. A quick whisky will calm my nerves.
Some stupid bitch tourist tore my headphones off and then her idiot boyfriend had the gall to square up when I swore at her.
Chelsea.... What the fuck?
Just mullered the fuck out of the old, smelly mince in the fridge. If there is anything left alive its welcome to kill me/ make me poorly.
"Oh look at me, I'm a dickhead who throws liferings in the river as a joke" - why?
I Don't know who this Dr. Congo is but he is starting to sound worse than Shipman and Mengele put together.
Legally Blonde 2 makes me happy. (Chances are its the bottle of Highland Park)
"find . -type d  ! -wholename "*.git*" -exec touch {}/.gitkeep \; " - There must be a simpler way.
Repent of your wicked ways or sod off
Steak and kale in home made foccacia. Now I'm going to drink beer and watch Dude Wheres My Car. Challenge perceptions.
Whenever I'm on the pavement and there is a moron cycling behind me I purposefully slowdown. Its a path; walk it or use the road.
Joe Hart was a waste of space this evening. Each goal was down to him turning off.
Ten green bottles hanging on a wall
Clattenburg exonerated as expected. Should we expect an apology from Chelsea? We should, we won't. Racism on the brain over there.
Fuck off navy, and get that fucking bridge down
Bit poorly this morning but all in all a good showing at SMR
Oh and now some cunt is talking about Entwhistle. I'm going to hit someone.
Security guard at threadneedle is watching "You've got mail". Good man
Its stupid AM, I'm tired yet every song we play keeps me up a bit longer
Triumphantly strutting out of the shower to Another One Bites the Dust has just made my morning
I've hijacked a coach trip and will execute a tourist on the hour until all tourists leave the city. Incl. The driver you have 83 hours.
"It is not only a hobby; it is a pleasure" - a Cheeky Girl
Sky users. For God's sake put channel 281 on. Bloody hell put it on. Its both the best and worst thing ever. The Cheeky Girls exercise show!
Boom; went for lunch and walked out with the barmaid's phone number.
Not a single looker in the new intake; I was looking forward to playing the big city boy and giving the big city tour
Somebody asking "are there any questions?" Is not an invitation to pull something out of your arse. It means shut the fuck up.
There is not a single barmaid on who I've tried it on with at the Kings Arms this evening. How weird is that?
Absolutely just knobbed vegan enchiladas. Take that cholesterol, nice to know I only need to kill animals to satiate my bloodlust.
Mimed getting my winky out in front of a nun. Definitely going to hell.
If I can't shift this Colchester flat soon I'm burning it down
5 mins... What was the ref playing at?
Just walked past the car whose lights were on this morning. The owner is standing there jumper cables in hand. Oops.
Holiday booked; three weeks of sitting in my pants and getting drunk here I come.
Halfway to work and have to turn back for the on call phone. Nicely done.
Kings Arms have reimplemented their swear jar. Retroactively. I'm screwed.
Linesman... what a shocking decision. I didn't think it was offside at the time but I reckoned that was my bias. Shocking.
Some kid saw/ heard me strut down the road to 'Try a little tenderness' - had to go over the top so I wouldn't look a tool. Yeah... I won...
Halfway through my first pint and the website and call center app goes down. Back to the office like a man who wants a good bonus.
Jordi Alba you cunt
Must start managing my property portfolio better get a new tenant in. On a side note who wants to live in Colchester (stupid question.)
I am now a letting agent- who wants a shithole flat in Essex?
The world needs pie and mash home deliveries. Actually fuck the world: Rotherhithe needs it.
There is only one thing that is going to get me through my hangover; a CD of Andrew Lloyd Webber songs. "Memmmm'ry....!"
The new product manager is teaching us about... products
Thought for the day: Pants are proper rubbish
Walking home from the office last night with a bottle of wine was a really stupid move. I have a very furry tongue.
Fuck the football, I'm going to listen to new found glory singing movie themes
Using conference wifi to do a 500MB portage update. Boom!
Farringdon: closer to home than I thought. Nearly an hour early for the first and last stop od conference season this year. Thankfully.
Kyle Walker is arse
England are fucking shit
Flu-ridden James definitely approves of Mean Girls being on tv.
The guy at the bar next to me's punchline: "and it was arial 12"
To commemorate this being the first time I've written a Makefile in 8 years I shall now be listening to Deftones as I did 8 years ago.
Perl positive: It does exactly what you tell it. Perl negative: even if you misspell what you tell it.
"My harpic is a shield of steel" - Loofink.
Brimstone curry and homemade naan: done
Broke my legs this morning- I am not a morning runner I don't think
Simpsons fucking questions on this motherfucking quiz
Never a pen. Never.
Cheeky 5k run then back for red dwarf and curry? Aye, can do.
Sliced my thumb open cutting chicken because I'm an idiot. Loadsa blood, loadsa shame.
Clattenburg lost control of this match about an hour ago; not one of his best matches at all.
Germans in a shootout- never any doubt
Fucking golf? Why did nobody tell me? Watched the entire weekend, getting into this albeit with a degree of football twattishness
Sinuses buffed by sandpaper- that pho was definitely necessary.
Some girl just chatted me up over the golf- that's how you do it lads; women always mix up confusion for concentration.
To all the hard kids of Rotherhive: you live in fucking rotherhive. Fucking relax.
Certain amount of pride when coming up with a stupid project name and having people using them seriously in meetings: enema and fatwhitecop.
We have bacon thieves at work…. Who the fuck steals another man's bacon?
Referee an absolute bottle job- match of the day to confirm but he lost control of the whole thing. whufc robbed.
You know what I hate? Fucking bodmas. A failing line of code due to not encapsulating some sums in brackets. Honestly; fricking maths.
I have just somehow listened to the entire Kate Bush backcatalogue on Spotify over the course of the day. How it happened I'm not sure.
How fucking bollocks is ruby for Sys Admin tasks? In a best tool for job situ let ruby do dynamic sites and templating. Not powerful enough.
Thought for the day: did Jesus shit?
Tesco shop: done. All in a (hungover) days work. Now to sit and watch red dwarf all day.
New haircut, girl at Pret asks for my phone number. Gave her a fake one because I don't date cafe workers. I'm old fashioned like that.
Kelvin Mackenzie is an odious fucking twat. I can't wait to see what happens to him. jft96 ynwa
Perhaps the sun will lead with a new headline tomorrow; THE TRUTH: We lied like the rats we are. The police lied like the rats they are.
Vindication jft96
Very good pasta dinner, bottle of prosecco, Bizet on the speakers and a book. All while overlooking the river. Fuck you paupers.
Sitting on my balcony watching the boats go by and drinking a cuppa. Quite happy about this.
Best mobot yet
Sea shanties at the last night of the proms with the sound of the thames on my private beach outside :)
Locked myself out of my old flat which is stopping me getting sorted and going to my new flat. Its like tenancy limbo here.
Delivery guys forgot to take most of my clothes- how I'm going to fix this I have no clue.
One of the removal men carried my desk by himself. Fucking hell
Why do people not know the difference between sat and sitting? It was on the fucking syllabus when you were 10, how do you un-learn English?
Just found (and thrown out) a cache of condoms and lighters. Y'know, fish and chips, port and cheese, condoms and lighters.
Should anybody be on twitter on a friday evening I would be eternally grateful if you'd call my phone. Fear I've tossed it.
